<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b3a1c09d-4b5c-36fb-bdf7-029fbb45eec6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are many kinds of funny activities that we love to take part in.
such as joking,sports,dance,playing the piano,ect.It seems that we have a colorful life be-
cause we can enjoy so many entertainments.
In fact,some entertainments are good for us,including bodies and mental health.As we
know,playing balls,swimming and cycling are good activities.But each coin has two sides,with the development of the society,some bad or unhealthy entertainments appear.For example,over-drinking is become some adults' ralaxation and it does really bad for health and society's safety.
As a student in high school,first,I am glad to see the development of our country and the
happiness of people.I also enjoy some entertainments--playingbasketball,playing football and
singing because I enjoy them and they are really good for my body and mental health.So I
think sprots and arts are good entertainments,of cause,you can't disturb others.In the other
sides,I think gambling is a bad entertainment,because it make many people lose money and
families,and it really make people addicted to it.So I think it is not good.
May we choose good entertainment!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5f61d556-942e-377e-8a12-424263ebbea2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our modern life, different sorts of  relaxation can be found everywhere.In home,you can
watch TV.If the programs don't appeal to you,you can turn to a computer.With the little
wonder thing, you can always find your cup of tea.On the other hand,if you go outside,
cinemas,shopping malls,courts are always there for you and you don't need to be a moneybag
to enjoy all these entertainments.
Though some relaxions are good for us and bring us laugher, there is no denying that some
kinds of relaxation is not so appropriate and even do harm to us,such as gambling and
smoking.The most widely known unhealthy amusement should be the movies or other TV grams
with violeve and eroticism in them, which is becoming more and more  affective with the
development of information technologyl. In fact, long exposure under these unheathy programs
has already affect teenagers' psychologic health and leads to unsteadiness of society.
As a college student, I think it is an unreversible trend of the development of IT.As a
result, what we should do is to take advetage of this flat.We can make annoucement and call
for healthy thought in TVs and computers, as the saying goes "Where there's an evil,there's
a hero." However,the aim to protect teenagers from unhealthy programs cannot be achieved
only by individuals or government, it takes the effort of all society.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c2943732-e3cf-34df-a998-bee7ffa32017> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are lots of different activities in my daily life.Some activities can help us more
healthy and happy,but other activities may be bad for me,they can infulence our study and
life.So we should have a right attitude to judge our activities.
As a college student,I have some opinion to share with us.In a college,we have more free
time to do lots of interesting things,such as playing computer games , singing songs and so
forth.Though these activities can make us more happy and have a good memory,these activities
can take up too much time so that we don't have enough time to learn.If we work and we will
be so sorry to not study more in our college.But I don't think  activities are all bad,we can
do some activities to relax our body and can help we more study. So we should have a right
attitude to treat our activities in our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5e6e0ac8-7d26-33b1-8aa3-fa93035812f5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various relaxation in our life, such as playing sports outside, watching TV
and playing computer games at home or drink with friends in bars, all can make us fun
as well as release our pressure.
However, relaxation will generate very different effect.It's good to play some sports
after study or work due to the fact that you will feel quite relaxing and improve your
health. On the otherside, if you drink outside when you are stressful and being drunk, maybe
you will feel relax that moment,but it will soon make you worse.Not only the pressure cannot
realease,but the alcoholic will hurt your body. It's the same when you playing too much
computer games.
As a students in university, I think choosing the right relaxation in life is important,
also, we should limit the extent in a certain kind of relaxation.Only with limitation in
relaxation can we really enjoy its fun and relax ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ea5cca11-b260-33d7-814c-3580159611ab> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are so many relaxation and amusement in our life .But every
coin has two sides

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0939fce2-6a99-3890-b637-59cfe584dadc> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the increasing development of technology,the relaxaton in life are becoming more and
more varied and attractive.You won't be surprise if you see a little child play with an Ipod
at home;You will get used to being amid at a noisy street...
Many people do approve that they should have a relaxation after boring and tiring work,which
makes their life more colorful and meaningful.Some relaxation,like having a trip and watching a
movie,they do play a crucial role to relax oneself.But not all the ways relaxation do good to your
amatuer life.For example,playing computer games and going to the pub oftenly may do harm to
one's health and waste time.
As an university student,I am supposed to develop a suitable ralaxation for oneself.Not only can we
ralax ourselves after work,but also irritate the consuptions when we consume the relaxation.But we
also tell the bad relaxation from the good ones and get away from the bad ones.Because what we do
is to keep happy and healthy, and it is clear that the bad ralaxations can't offer us the real happiness.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b28cd016-3629-3db8-a2aa-eeda94170711> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the great development of society, many people are so hard-working that
they need to take various entertainments such as doing sport,going to entertainment
places and so on  to relax themselves.
as saying goes,every coin has two sides,although there are many benificial
entertainments for us to desrease our stress,some relaxation  still do harm to us.
For the example, teenager will be abundanted to play so-called relaxation ,computer games.
improper relaxation can take up our time all and harm us tremendously.
as far as I am concerned,it's essential for everyone to take relaxation ,but in another
hand,we should make  balance between our work and entertainment.What's more ,everyone also
try our best to distinguish useful activities from other.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9374cbfd-e55f-37df-9606-def66172d893> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are more and more entertainments in the modern time. In our daily life, different
amusements can make us relax from busy works or all-time hard homeworks.
But everything has advantages and disavantages. In nowadays, children are always too
to study. They surf in the internet and play the computer games day and night. Even though
relax can make us far away from stress and some sicks, it is bad for kids.
As for me, I think we should balance entertainments and works. We must over our works or
homeworks, so that we can begin our amusements. And we can make our amusements more funny.
We can take an active part in effective sports, and not only stay infront computers. What's
more, we can sing a song instead of watching TV. Besides, we can have a game with our families,
Which can make us closer. In my opinion, there are more and more mathors can relax and make balance
between works and entertaiments.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 21f1cc40-694f-34e8-a436-845e2e17538e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,since the pressure in our daily life become heavier and heavier,all kinds of relaxation activities have arisen contineously,such as computer games,exercises,KTV and so on.However,although most kinds of relaxation activities is good for us,they may sometimes become inappropriate and even do harm to us.For example,we can play computer games when we feel a little tired,but one can also lose himself in games if he play too much.As we all know,every year there always exists someones who leave school for playing too much computer games.For my part,as a university student,almost everyone is an adult,so we should have the ability to distinguish good or bad things,and know how to control self behaviour.What's more,the most important is that to take reponsibility for self behaviour.In our daily life,we should take part in some relaxation activities which can widen our heart and adjust our mood.And then,you will find that every day is fresh.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2ae51fc8-ed08-3738-b10b-862945e9e4ca> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
there are a variety of entertainment activitiies in our lives.some of them make us more relaxed and
comfortable.But alse some of them are harmful to our mental and phisical health.
There are several advantages of the relaxations.first of all,the deleloped relaxations make us enjoy
more of our lives.Besides,relaxations enrich our lives as well as widen our views.last but not the
the least,it can release our pressure which may come from our word or study.
Despite the fact that relaxation has many positive aspect,it alse has some negative aspects.
for example,many people have been addicted to the relaxations in our lives such as computer
games or chating on line.In addition,it is said that many people cannot balance the work and
relaxations so that it lmay lead to a bad life to some people.
As far as I concerned,we need to find the balance point between the work and the relaxation .
Only by this way can we enjoy the joy which the relaxations bring and protect ourselves from
its bad effect.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 29ac1757-dd9f-3214-bd1c-030f6837935c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more entertainments come up with the development of the technology.For example,with the development of the  touching screen,playing "Fruit Nanjin"has been a fashion in the crowd of students and officers.What's more,with more and more people owning iphone,ipad,itouch,and HTC,peoplecan play 3D games everywhere.People prefer to playing games in their spare time,instead of go hiking or any other sports.
Although some of these games can enrich our experence,and some of them can even train our ability of reaction,but most of them are only used to kill time.On the opposite,some activities such as going hiking,climbing mountains,going bicycling,can strengthen our body,relax our nervous life,change our surroundings,which is do more good to our life.
As a university student,I am one of the iphone games players.I like playing games,but I also like doing sports outsides,even if it is only a walking around our school,just enjoying the fresh air in the woods.Only phone games or computer games can't enrich our spare time.They can't even relax ourselves.Some of them will make us more nervous.In a word,I am not against playing phone games or computer games,but we should do other things like going for a walk which can really relax and enrich our self life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b98ed837-e742-3a85-959d-a499545d2e8e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, our lifes is becoming  more and more difficult,as more and more work squeezing our time,though,with variety of relaxations to deal with our work pressurre,such as dancing,
exercising,playing computer games,and so on.
So it is really important for us to seek a good way to relax well.
In fact,some of these relaxations are good for our physical and mential healthy,such as dancing and sports,as well as playing computer games.But ,as an old saying goes,every coin has two sides.Some of are not  good for us,even do great harm to our physical andmential healthy,as taking drugs and playing computer games too much.Once you are additided to playing computer games day and night,you may have lost interest in study,which is harmful to you healthy at the same time.
In a word,there are advantages and disadvantages in same relaxations,depending on how you make it.As a colleage student,we must choose the  relaxations which are good for our physical and mential healthy,and deal with them in a proper way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8da615e9-0df2-3f13-9394-1ac3f19c6fc0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is no doubt that our lives need various of relaxation, but nowdays what is appropriate relaxation and what is healthy relaxation make a great doubt. Many relaxation are suitable for special person ,like a baby can not enjoy swimming in a pool alone,an adult is able to go campping by himself. Because some special relaxation may do harm to someone who are not supposed to tale such rexastion, running is a kind of relaxation ,but if a pregnant woman can not enjoy it,the reason is simple, she is a pregnant woman.
so what should we do when Choosing a relaxation? In my opinion ,we can do like this :
firstly we need make a good sense of ourslves ,ask ourslves what do I want to get through this it ,can I be addicated to it ?,if you get the answer,then secondly we should what others behaver in it ?and get some advice.Lastly we are supposed to ensure the time is suitable.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3ce26385-8021-38ce-9db5-344913c65fde> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In today's society,the pressure becomes biger and biger.Becouse of this,relaxation is going to be mroe important.but how to relax is still a question for many people.
As all known, sports can be a really good way for relaxing.After a whole day's work,playing some sports and sweating makes us feel exhausted so that after that our body and mind will be relaxing and we will have a sweet sleep. But pay your attention on what sports you play,some sports is too intense to do for relaxing.For example,tennis is a sport that many people like to play and easy to learn,but if you don't konw how to play it or play too much,you can be hurt badly.In one word,sports is almost perfect to be as a relaxation as long as you play it in the right way.
In addition,listening music is also a good way for relaxing.In a sunny afternoon,make a cup of tea,read a favorite book and listen some soft music or in the weekend,call some friends to go out to singing songs at KTV.Both of these are the relaxation I often have and is really useful for me.But sometimes,there are somebody play music loudy at night.Not only the persent who playing the music won't be relaxed,but the neighbours also connot sleep.
All in all,people have their own way to relax,the most important thing is not to puzzle others and not to hurt ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 211dc20d-fb9e-36ff-94d5-6b7640e9ab6d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life there are all kinds of relaxation.Such as playing basketball,swimming,play computer game. Witnout realation,
our life will become very boring.
So ralaxation is the integral part of life,
Relaxation let us relax ourselves.Play basketball not only exercise our bodies but also bulid up our team spirit.When you feel unhappy,
singing can make you feel better.
However not all relaxation are good for us.everyone knows that many students addicted to online games,they spend much of their time on the game,
and less time on their study.Finally they were out of school.
As a student ,we have a lot of pressure.So proper relaxation is very important for us. Only good health to better learing.But we can not addicted to it.
We must have a regular relaxation.Only in this way can we live more health and happy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9b4885db-5c57-3542-8c50-aa219ab6bcd2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation is an important part of our life. In my opinion , no one can live without it.
because we need a balence between work and relaxation. And we will be more powerful in our work  when we are happy and relaxed.
There are various entertainments,such as spors, singing, reading and so on. We can take in some activivies in our spare time .On the one hand ,we can made ourselves relaxed and happy,on the other hand we can make many friends in the activities. And we will get some usefull information and learn some skills.
Many entertainments are good for us. However,some entertainments have some bad influence
on us. for example, many college students like playing computer games, and they don't do thire homework,miss the lessons,and keep in thire dormitory all the day. And then they  even can't graduate.
As a college, I think we should take a good use of entertainments. Don't waste too mach time on some bad entertainments,and have more exercises.Put our schoolwork in the first position. Then we will live healthily and happily.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 64a7ae41-a31b-3629-9bda-1e8757c07949> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life ,we can participate in various activities.But before we do it,we must
consider it's advantages and disvantages carefully for the reason that some activities do good
to us while others are improer and even harmful.
For example,after study or work time,we can play basketball ,tennies,running or do other sports
which will not only be good to our health but also enable us to relax ourselves.Also,we can play
computers,surf the internet,chat on line to relax ourselves.However,we must do  these activities
in a proper time ,or it will also be harmful to us.On the contrary,some activities such as
gambling ,and so on will definitely do harm to us.We will easily be addicted to them and then
it will exhaust our energy and money which will destory our beautiful life finally.Therefore,
if we want to relax ourselves,we should consider the activity carefully.
In my opinion,as university student,we are supposed to particitate in the activities good to
us such as the sports mentioned above and insist on not joining in the harmful activity.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1ad1cb02-a751-3c86-976d-214b798f561e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, there are all kinds of activities in our life, especially for we university students. We can just say, entertainment is to us what water is to fish.
However,faced with so many activities, we just couldn't stop asking ourselves, are they all benefit to us? And, the answer is absolutely not.
As the saying goes, every coin has two sides. For one thing, no one can deny that some Relaxations do good to us. Such as running , going hiking, travelling, and so on. Not only can they relax ourselves, reduce our tension, but also they can broaden our mind, develop our friendship. The good points are obvious.
However,for another thing, it is not all the activities that do good to us, even sometimes some activities which look good do harm to us.  For example, in most parents' eyes, palying computer games may be a harmful relaxation, but  it is when we lose ourselves  that we can say that, and it do. and although an activity seems good, if we spent all our time in it, it can influence our normal life.
In general, we couldn't define that which activity is bad, and which is good. It is how we deal with it that matter. And without relaxation, it is like that our world lose colour. So make full use of our relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a73d5ebf-916b-3810-aca3-0d95940a4fd3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of stress from life and work,various of activitives that relax people appear,
such as singing,dancing,doing sports and so on.
However,although some of the activitives are good for us,others are bad.Worsemore,they
will endanger people,for example ,some people like to play football on road.It is very
dangerous,which will causes traffic event.
In my opinion,it is necsssery for people to do some activitivrs to relax themselves.But
we must choose appropriate activitives,which is save and healthy.we can play chess,play basketball,
and so on.Going to party is a good chioce,too.
All in word,we should choose appropriate activitives.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3a1dbe5b-6810-3d59-9d54-b45bbd9001c1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Personally speaking ,many of us will do sports .not only can build up our body ,but could
train our character .However ,as a college ,we all know that ,too much sports or do some
dangerous sports ,may make our muscle hurt .
According to some of my classmates ,I want to give some sportsmen a bit of suggestions .
First of all ,before ,you play ballgames ,you’d better do some jogging or walking ,so
that ,you could give your body a message that you have do all ready .Second ,please not do
too much maximal exercises ,we just want to relax our body in busy daily life .Third ,you
ought to do sports with one or tow cooperates ,don’t look down this cooperate is a
necessary of you .
Generally speaking ,if we are busy with doing our work ,we  should take a relax ,but
please remember we just want to relax .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5db271df-b413-3155-b181-2fe0b6fa4f86> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society develops,today we have a voriety of activities for fun. We go cycling and we go singing ,also we can do a lot of other activities.
Some activities are good for us. For example, go cycling can help us keep healthy, go singing can make us relaxed and happy. But some others are not proper and they are even bad for us.You know a lot of students are addicted in computer games today, games take up much time in their life,they give up studying and even drift apart their families and classmates.
So they cannot be a healthy person.
As a university student, I think we should be responsible for ourselves and we can distinguish what is right and what is wrong. So we should choose some good activities to take part in, and not be addicted in some activities which are bad for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID be738992-cfa2-3b72-a6ba-978eadcb9293> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all, life is colourful and we can not be always in working.So how to relax ourselves is important. There are many entertainments and we need to open our eyes and choose the one that really relax us.
Some of the entertainments are healthy while some of them are harmful. Please look aroud us. It is not unusual to see so many people choosing playing computer games as their major entertainment.But is it really relaxed you? Some of them choosing drinking and eating a lot to relax themselves and forgetting their work. What I want to say is relaxing like that is not relax you at all. It is like alcohol just let you forget the trouble you are facing to. So what kind of entertainment we should choose is very important.
I completely favor sports like basketball,pingpong,swimming. Or you can just go out to climing or have a short trip.That is the way that is healthy and relaxing. Sports not only relaxed us but give us a strong body , that is the true meanning of relaxation.
As a colledge student ,I am standing here and wishing everyone can choose a healthy relaxation. What we need is not the instant dizzy like alcohol, we can not just because we do not want to facing the trouble so we choose a way to forget it in a way that harm ourselves. Forgetting does not mean the trouble the preasure is disappeared. No! It is still there and will be harder because your fearness.
Let us do not harm ourselves again and choose a healthy way to relax ourselves. And you will see sun shining birds singing.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 537e2e4e-bf7d-3cd8-b5ea-7b3171843010> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As a saying goes,all work without play makes Jack a dull boy.In today modern day,relaxation is inevitable.There's a variety of entertainments to relax.But every coin has two sides.Not all recreational activities are beneficial.Some activities even do harm to our soul and body health.So we need to have a wise choice to relax.
Nowadays,every moment is important for us just because the world changes every second.It makes the modern people stress.Therefore,they try all kinds of ways to release the stress.Some people like to do some sports such as swimming,running,playing basketball,ect. At the same time,they can get healthier.Some people like to trevalling.Tourism can not only lead us put our matter down ,but also broaden our horizon.These are healthy activities.But the unhealthy activities are exist either.In our live, we all kown that there are always some people sleep all the day on the holiday to relax.They can eat nothing.Also, there are some over outgoing people who go out to the KTV or pub all the day even forget whether it is  day or night.These are extremely harmful to our body.
As for me a college student, I think we should choose the healthy way to relax and control  ourselves not to do some harmful activities.When I have free time, I like to dance and play  basketball to make me release the stress.In front of the temptation, we should think twice and then take action.Entertainment has its regular.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9f4b780d-3c63-3624-9835-ff58188cc366> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are kinds of relaxation in our life .and these relaxations cann't be shorted of;
because there are many pressures in our life ,we need these relaxations to release pressures.
Now ,because of rapid life ,people has lots of pressures ,so relaxatios become needs in our life ,
there are many relaxations in our life ,some of are in favor of  us ,but others are in favor of us .
for example ,many people like  athletic sports .such as basketball ，football,swimming and so on .but  some people like play computer games and gambling,
as a university man ,I think athletic sports is a good way for us ,it is good for our healthy.however ,play comeputer game and gamblilng is bad for us ,it is will infection our study.
so  I think our should elect good relaxations to release pressures .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f0d9eb0f-33e5-3fdf-92a2-3a1b448667f3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainments in our daily life, such as basketball, football, computer games, shopping.
But different way to relax can let different result. So we must choose the healthy way to relax
The healthy way to relax, such as basketball, football can not only let our body become stronger, but also
let us make more new friends.  By doing sports, we can relax ourselves, as well as be more spiritedly to continue
our work or study.  We can make new friends by play together,
because of the same hobby.
The harmful way to relax, such as playing computer games too much, shopping addictively are not only
wasting our time, but also do harm to our daily life.  For example, playing computer games too much affects our
study. It make us can’t pay attentions on study. Shopping addictively waste our money on it.
In my opinion, we should choose healthy ways to relax ourselves. We can play basketball or football, go hiking.
That can make our life more interesting and healthy .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6bc9acfb-8f12-39b4-a375-e55281f2ac6d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As it is known to all,life is filled with difficulties.There are lot's of different
things which give us pressure to make us depress.The only way for us human to live a happy
life is to know how to relax ourself.
first of all,we should know how to deal with the difficulties we meet.No matter what
difficulties wo go through,we should have a positive attitude to see it.By this way ,we can
easily relax ourself when we come up with difficulties.
Secondly,we should relax ourself at the free time actively.When we have time,we should
leave our daily work alone and do something that we think can make us happy.Because to do the
things you like can make you feel not only happy but also easy so that we can relax ourself.
Last but not least,we can relax ourself through talking and playing with our friends.
our friends can listen to us and share the pressure we have,so we would think become easy.
However,affter we have relaxed ourself, we should get our faith back and do our job
better.With relaxation in our life,our life will be more bright.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f2340073-ab43-39ac-ab5c-11e0280a8416> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more university students,so the pressure on university students
is becoming larger and larger. It is very necessary for us to learn to relax in the right way
in life.
As to relaxation ,we have many ways to relax ourselves.For example, we can watch TV which
is relaxing,such as the"Happy Family".I think it is really helpful to relax.In addition ,play-
ing basketball,computer games and going shopping and so on,are useful to relax.There are so
many entertainments around us.Whichever it is,only it is relaxing for us,we can do it.
However,we should do it in the right way.As a university student ,we should realize that
there are good and bad entertainments around us.For example, we shouldn't go to the "desikou"
which is bad for us.And we shouldn't concentrate on the computer games.It is bad for our study.
In my opinion,it is necessary for us to relax in life.If someone never takes relaxing work,
he maybe do some stupid things.On opposite,we will have a healthy heart.Relaxation is important
not only for the university students but also for everyone.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a8ab73c4-a92d-3416-a6d2-e8c2ee06030a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of entertainment in our life, such as sports, music, movies and so on. We can enjoy the interest in them to relax ourselves.
As the saying goes, every coin has two points and the relaxation in
our life is not exception. On one hand, some relaxations are good for us.
For example, w can do more sports to keep fit, we can listen to music to
relax our emotion and we can read books in our spare time to broaden our
view. As a whole, these relaxations play an important part in our life.
On the other hand, some relaxations do harms to our health. Some students
are addicted to the video games. They play games day and night, as a result,
their study climbs down continuously and they become negative to their life.
From the analysis about relaxation which is mentioned above, we can draw a conclusion that we should keep a balance between relaxation and our work.
In my opinion, as a college student, we should do more sports to keep health and don’t play more computer games .Only by dealing with the relationship between relaxation and work well can we live a health and happy life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4e70868b-f3b6-34e2-a65c-073e8e154095> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there are many kind of activities to relax ourselves,such as travel,playing games,listening music and so on.However,are all these activities helpful to us?Evidently,not all relaxation activities are healthy or good for people.Especially the activities which take a lot of our time and make ourselves addicted to them.All relaxation has their virtue and weakness.It all depends on which way we make use of it.Like playing computer games, if we spend appropriate time on it,it will improve our mind.In the oppisite,we may be addicted to it and take a lot of study or sport time ,even it will do a harm to our body.That is only one aspect of the problem,if we are addicted to computer games too deeply,it may result in some social problems.So,in my opinion,relaxation is a double edge.If we make full use of it,we will gain a lot.In opposite,it may hurt us.As a college student,we should learn how to  relax,in the other words,we should learn to make use of all the relaxation to achieve in positive effect we need.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2bb29d95-e86e-3958-9144-9c7d3679dd30> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are so many relaxation in our daily life,such as sports,computer games,travel and so on.
Most of them are aim at relaxing us.For example,when we are playing basketball,or singing songs with friends in the KtV,we can have fun with our friends and make us comfortable at the same time.However,the relaxtion can be a harm if we do it in a wrong way.For example, Somebady play comeputer game in order to reduce the press from work or study .But some of them abandon themselves to it.They do it over 5 hours everyday ,and even pay a lot of money for it.
I think that relaxation play a very important role in our life. As college students,there are no doubt that we have much work to do .I sometimes feel tired after a sprite of work,so I play soccer or chat with friends online as long as I have time.And then I can do work with energy again.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0036a5c7-ef6a-368e-be16-3f9672b3220f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many relaxed activities in life,such as playing football,watching TV,playing computor games and so on.We know that studying and working to long would make you tired so that we indeed need some activities to relax ourselves.
Relaxed activities can make us far away from tired.For example,if you work for too long,listening music and haveing a coffee can make you comfortable.Some activities can keep you fit,like playing basketball,which is good for your health.
But in my opinion,relaxed activities is not always good for us.For example,playing computor games is a good activity to relax,but playing for too long is bad to us.Because when you play computor games you do not move your body and your eyes would be tired,which is bad for your health.Some news have been reported that some people died for playing computor games for too long.
In all,relaxed activities are important for us,but we should choose the right activities,which is really good for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0373c158-440b-3754-8bf2-166d308e6597> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
I like reading novels to relax in my life.Because of being a engineering course student,I have little time and  few chances to feel the literature in my daily life, so the relaxation in my life is very important.There are many activeties to relax in our lives,such as listen to music,watch movies,surf on the Internet and so on.
Some activeties are benefit for us,but others are not good for us.
In my opnion,Some students can't control thierselves well,they are easily addicted to the entertainment activeties even affect thier study or lives.They will be lazy and have no passion for thier jobs.But the relaxation also have the good side.The relaxation in life can help people reduce the pressure in thier lives and make them be happier than before.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 85a3c5df-9438-38f1-b921-7a2c4b5e570f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It`s not hard to see that there are various activities for us to relax ourselves.However,not all of them are good to us,like gambling,drinking,smoking and so on.If you are not careful enough to choose the right way to relax yourself,you may fall into trouble easily,which is no doubt harmful to your health.
As far as I`m concerned,it is very important to find a right,or in orther word, a suitable way for everyone to relax ourselves,cause there is so much stress in our life.Doing some exercise regularily is a good way for us.You can go with your friends,and enjoy surroundings,which can give you a healthy body with good feelings.
Other ways to relax yourselves,like taking part in parties,playing basketball with your partners,playing healthy games,debating and so on,are also useful ways for you.As a college student,I`d like to lead a healthy life and try to avoid unhealthy tempts.But that`s not all I want.Only if everyone of us gets it wiil the society become more beautiful,as well as our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6fd7200d-efe0-3331-8e62-a65759afb336> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various kinds of relaxation in life such as reading, playing sports,
playing computer games and so on. Some of them are benefic to our lives, but in the
meantime some of them may badly affect our lives. So it's important for us to
identify which kinds of relaxation is benefic.
As a university student, here is some of my opinion about relaxation. The benefic
relaxation help us relax form the burden of life as well as improving our ability like
reading and playing sports. The bad relaxation is the relaxation that waste us much time
and make us hard to left it like playing computer games which waste a lot of time
and it won't be benefic to your study.
To sum up, we should learn to identify which kinds of relaxation is benefic and
keep away from the bad relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0d9b4240-a20c-3363-91d4-3e297a76f458> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society, there are more and more entertainments for us, such as sports, computer games, movies and so on. However, all of them are not benificial for teenagers'growth. Some of them do good to human's health, happiness and even success, while some are inappropriate and to some extent, are dangerous and harmful like smoking.
As a college student, I think we should consider that whether it is good for us before we devote into the entertainments. To improve our calibre and quality, the kind of relaxation like sports, music and books should be taken into consideration. Oppositely, taking drugs to relax and getting addicted to computer games are harmful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 10a56459-dfb9-32b1-85a8-bd7ffff8161f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Work Should Be With Entertainment
Work without entertainment can be unbearable.Therefore,as human,life is always
fantistic with all sorts of amusement,like doing sports,watching TV,playing games
and so on.
We all know that works make people tired,worried and blad.At this monment,we have
work all day long,we lack energy,we are driving crazy,we need relax.Amusement show up,
to some extent,people need to amuse themselves.No doubt that no matter whichever kind
of activity,it do helps people reflesh themselves.According to research,people can't
focus their mind on one thing for a long time,which make them lose thier energy at a
high rate.So,in order to work longer and more healthy,we had better wolk with entertainment.
However,a coin has two sides.For one thing,too much amusement makes people lazy,leading them wolk
less and worse.For another,some amusement can do harm to peolpe,for example,drugs,adult video,computer
games``````Though they can relax people,more they bring to people is the damageto health.
As a college student,I consider we should work with proper amusement,we can't be addicted to
any kind of bad thing.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2a9cd612-81f4-3285-868b-a0b56c1e7dc1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are many relaxations in our life, such as some sports, games and other activities. However, relaxation is not always good to us.
As we know, relaxation like some sports and activities can relax us and make us keep a bright brain. We do exercises for strengthen our body and keep fit, at this time, though we will be sweating and feel tired, we get a mental relaxation and we have a mood of pleasure.  However, some relaxation like playing computer games or watching TV too much, although it can relax oneself and make him or her happy and pleased, it also do harms to our health. Many younger do not realize this, so it’s easy for them to be addicted to playing computer games or watching TV. This makes them study not hard and be tired about studying.
In my mind, we college student is an adult, we should think more than other younger. We should know what we should do and can't do and how to do it, not just do as what we want. For example, it’s time for us to relax, we should talk some activities to relax, but when we should study, we should do our best to learn more knowledge.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3f881ff3-1b8e-3963-8dc3-efee3f68f573> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is a common knowledge that the life not only consists of work, but also has  relaxation.
With the help of the relaxation, people can reduce the stress which they meet when they are
concerned on their work. In a word, the relaxation plays an important role in our lives, so
there are plenty of kinds of relaxations in our lives.
Although we usually think the relaxation does good to us,  every coin has two sides, we can not
ignore the harms that the relaxation maybe give us.For instance, some relaxations like diving in
the ocean contain lots of dangerous.
As a university student in the modern society, I hold the attitude that we should take some quiet
relaxations,such as joging,listening to the quiet music and so on,which can calm us down and help
us get rid of some troublesome feeling.But we should choose the relaxation that fits to our
lives in university,in a word, the relxation fits to us, not we fit to the relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4058fcaf-226d-3e48-a198-8e51ac0e2ea7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we konw, as the same as the work, relaxation is important for our life. In our life, there was many kind of entertainment activities. Many of them was good for our relaxation, but also have some was not appropriate. And maybe those not only don't relaxe you, but also do harm for you health.
In my opinion, relaxetion was important then working. if you keep working all the time without relaxation, it is only keep you tired and you just have a low work efficiency. So if you want to keep a good state, you must relaxe youself.
As far as I am concernd, there was have many relaxtion way in our life. some peple like to do some sport. I like lisning musie to relaxe myself. These are all the good way. But one of my  classmate, he didn't those this, he just paly computer game. I think this is not apprproiate. And also a few people would do other things may harm for their health. So I hope every one can chose the right way to relaxe and keep their body healthy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 637fbeee-a959-31ae-b27f-604f741bf38a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are lots of relaxation in your life,such like playing sports,reading books,watch movies,play computer game and ect.However,some are benefit to you and others are harmful to you.
The most significan thing I want to say is that we are not supposed to stay up late even all naight whatever we do and whenever.The reason is apparently,staying up late do harm to our health and effect our spirit next day.The second thing we should not to do is playing conputer game for long time since you will be seated on seat for a long time when you play a computer game and it will destroy your bady.For example,there is a report that there is a man who had played computer game for more than 23 hours and at last he was dead.
Therefore,it is no reason for us to hurt ourselves.At last but not least,relaxation doesn't  mean allowance you can do any thing you want to do.Actually,it means you do some things that won't do harm to others' health and benefit ect to relax yourselves.
On the contrary,there are lots of things you can do to relax yourselves and they do good to you too.Reading book you are interesing in is a exciting thing,I think,In addition,watching a movie is also a good choise because it won't late too long and it tell a lot.The most thing I considerablely suggest is playing sports,we all konw sports can help you relax yourself and it will better your next work.
In a world,relax yourselves but don't release your selves!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 02b3ca23-caa5-3741-82b7-407717529976> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the improvement of living standard, There are all kinds of amusement in our lives.
Of course,some activities are beneficial to us,for example,listen to music,play ball game,but on another way,some activities are not,
even some danger like gambling.
As for it,we should take a dialectic view.Well,with the development of society,the pressure of life gets more.So how can we deal the balance of career and amusement? Maybe different persons have different oppions.
In my oppion,we should be concerned at our work or study when we are doing it.Also,we should get some Relaxation,that is real life.The key of this problem is that we should control ourselves.And I think we should chose as much activities as possible because that will broaden our horizon and wilden our interes.even if life is complex,but we will grow up gradually,and we will chose our own life style,the most important thing is that we should be happy with our family and friends.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fdc2072f-b99b-377b-87ec-c5dec75d178c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
I think everyone is familiar with relaxation,because there are many kinds of relaxations
in our daily life.such as playing different sports,singing an active song,or maybe computer
games and so on.
As we all know,relaxation can relax ourselves if you choose right kinds.That is to say,
some relaxtions may bring disadvantages to us.Take computer games for an example,we may
be addictted to it if we don't assign our time suitablly.SO, all of us should be serious
about it.
As an undergraduate,i think relaxation is essential for us all.Not only because it can
remove our pressure both in physical and mind,but it may expand our view of this beautiful
world and make our spirit more and more richness.But what i mean is not that we can have
relaxation all the time.The first thing for a student i think is study.Actually,we should
assign our time appropriately,we can have ourselves relax when we are tried or in low
spirit,but don't forget to change your heart in time to make your homework done.
In a word,proper relaxation,beautiful life!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e8eefe4f-fb14-30a3-a003-f4e4218c9c50> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As human being who are no longer naive enough to image life to be some kind of paradise, we are forced to confront with numerous obstacles and challenges in social life. We may feel oppressed and over-burdened when tackling some complicated trouble or extremely petty daily problems. And it is the time that we should turn to relaxation.
Countless variety of relaxations are alternative to us. We can do some sports such as football , basketball, tennis which can not only ease us tense but help develop our physical health. Listening to music or go shopping are also good ways to relax ourselves. However there are some kinds of relaxation that do harm us without giving relaxation to us. For instance, playing computer games and watching TV for a long time won't refresh us but harm our eyesight.
As a college student, I see the outdoor sports highly which will not only benefit our mental but physical health. And we should make our own choice to have some effective relaxation in life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a384de1b-368e-3670-9e44-ca12655176ac> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid development in our society,  there are a lot of entertainments in our daily life.As we all know, there are quite a bit healthy activities, but also some inappropriate activities which have bad influence.
So what can we do for these entertainments, especially as a university student.  In my opinion, as a positive youth, we should choose some activities which are healthy and consequential in order to improve our stamina and flexibility, such as playing basketball, running, swimming. Of course ,we can even join in debate team,  and some good speech compitation to improve our knowledge .Learn to release pressure , and make yourself young and positive.
On the contrary, we should not choose activities which are bad for our health or just for fun and have no sence. Be relaxed in life not means let things drift.You should love yourself,and give you a wonderful life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4d35bbaf-9243-3448-ab8b-081282407cf5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are kinds of entertaiments in our daily life.If you are alive,you are participating
in them every day,no matter who you are and what you do.But every thing has its two sides----
the positive one and the negative one.As it is to our relaxition in our life,we should pay a
lot of attention to it and make it clear what we can really get from it.
Some relaxations do a lot of benefit to us.Taking reading for example,it can enrich our
knowledge and improve our written ability.If we can relax ourselves as well as do something
meaningful ,it is surly well worthy being done.But there are also ones that is harmful to us.
Cigarette,as far as we know,can make people feel relaxed though,it destroys our bodies more.
It really pollutes your haggis and increase the chance that you put up with cancer.
As a college student, I think study is still the major task we should pay a lot of attention
to.So we should try to refuse some bad relaxation such as computer games.In our spare time ,we
are supposed to read more books,take part in sports and do some jobs that can benefit
others, which can make our life meaningful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b314d4cf-2801-3dbb-a553-fd55edbe0ba6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
as time flys away ,many people feel depressive in their daily life.So they are searching for various activities to relax themselves.yes,maybe they will feel satisfied ,but things always has two sides.
For example if you are addicted to playing computergames to relax yourself ,you will do harm to your eyes ,body and energy;but if you think listening music or doing some sports make you fell comfortable,you will get more  then it.
now we are university men ,personally,various activities is beneficial to us.In the mentime , sometimes It will let us forget ourselves ,right or wrong, all depond to us .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d2b452a6-cda1-3c68-a7d4-0582aff8c5a3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainments and exercises in out daily life.Different people enjoy different entertainments. Commonly boys like play basketball ,which will strong our body,and girls like dancing.
People will get a lot fun from doing exercises.But the point is that some will benifit us,  and others will hurt our body or even our mind,then make us lose the courge to go on in our life .if you play sports , you will get a health body ,if you always singing , you will fell excited. but if you like drugs, you will lost you life.
As a college student , I like playing beasketball,watching movies ,reading and so on .I think that people should have the ability to control to do what is really good.I want to learn more and get more ,so I have some proper way to relax myself . buyI always see that some boys are play games very excited and absorded in it in their dormitor to relax themselves.They spend all their free time to plays games ,sometime until 2 o'clock they were still playing, which do huge harm to themselves.but them don't care about it. I wonder how they can fell so high when playing games such crazy. it is not good for ours life.
So to keep our self health and get more energy ,wo should find something really good to relax outselves, something you may fell well ,but don't absorbed in.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3c417d05-c1e3-382f-8d93-07fa11042ad1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainments which can make
people relaxed in our life.But Are all activities helpful
for us?
In fact,some entertainments is good for us to relax,
exercise and improve.For example,doing some sports
can make us healthy.it can not only product happiness
but also strengthen our body.What's more,we can enjoy
ourselves with friends.Besides,outgoing,games,movie and
so on,are also good ways to relax.
However,there are some activities which are not fit for
us even harmful for us.Such as KTV,ballroom,or Cafe,of
course we can go to these place at times,but not often.
The other things,such as drinking,smoking,betting,we had
better be far away from them.
In my opinion,we should not addicted to entertainments,
do more healthy activities,and say no to harmful fun.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID af9e05e5-cc16-3230-8f18-7c03655df47e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
I want to use my own experience to talk about my understanding about relaxation in life.Before I started my university, what I thought university was a wonderful place full of entertainment and happiness just like the heaven. In fact , when I have studied for some time in SCUT ,my opinion changed. University actually is a place for study,and is filled with competition and challenges. At the begining ,I felt very tired every day as I dedicated myself to all kinds of books and a variety of works which were held by some clubs in our school. I was so busy that I nearly had no time for any relaxation.
my friends besides me always said to me that I should find time to relax myself and just as the saying goes ,all work and no play makes Jack a dull boy. They said if I still not relaxed ,I would sooner or later got ill.
After some time ,what my friends said became true.I became weeker and weeker just not like a youth. I always get ill not until a long time .During a time ,what I faced every day is either homework or medicine .After that ,I realized the important of relaxation .From then on ,I placed more emphasize on relaxation .I played football with my classmates after class ,I went to KTV with my roommates, I ran every night, I listened to music ,I played some computer games.I feeled very happy almost every day and I also have made many friends from the relaxation. Besides, to my surprise ,what I thought my score in many classes will felt down but I did better in various classes.I also get rid of the medicine become I had a very good body. Relaxation benefited me a lot.
There goes a saying that every coin has two sides , relaxation also have some negative effect.Take one of my roommate fo instance when he was in dormitary, he always played "World of Warcraft" ,a kind of RPG computer games .He almost spent all of his time on it.He can't hand in his homework on time and he slept very late every night .As a result ,he failed many classes .
In conclusion , we should take relaxation seriously ,as a student ,we should study first .But when we are tired ,what we should do is not study any more ,is relaxing!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f51df37b-57c0-399b-ae5e-3753121711d0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, there's variety of activities in our daily life for us to relax. For example, sports like basketball, running, playing computer games, chatting online, etc. Most of them actually do good to our body and mental health. But it's obvious that some of them can cause problem or even be harmful.
As far as I am concerned, when I taking part in such a kind of activities for Relaxation, what I should pay attention most is that I may be addicted to it, which means I would let it take up most of my spare time. When I fall in this situation and stay for a long time, my concentration will be distracted and my grades will be decrease. There's an old saying speaking that every coin has its two sides. It's fine to do some activities for relaxation and fun but do not let them take up your time for main tasks.
Anyway, when we enjoy relaxation in life, bear in mind that we are still students, so we should raise our main task, the schoolwork, to the highest priority.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2222d0be-edb7-3a95-b6c0-5627dab8b824> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are various of relexation in our life, and we often choose the way by our interests. After one day's busy work or study, we'd like to find some way to make our body ralax. Maybe most people will choose surfing the internet, watching TV and so on.when the weekend's coming, we may go out for breathing the fresh air or at home witn our family. when we hear "relaxation", we usually feel happy, becuase it's a good choice for us to get away from weak working or studying.
However,not all kinds of relaxaion is good for us.Some activities are unhappy even harmful to us.For example,being addicted to computer games will make person lazy and be dangerous for health.Therefore, it is really important for us to choose a healthy way to relax.
As an undergraduate, I usually choose reading and surfing the internet for relaxing. Some of my classmates choose to gou out for a meeting or shopping. In my opinion, one energetical week needs a perfect relaxaion. The proper relaxaion will give us the power to meet the whole week. But worthy of attention is that we must learn to contrl ourselves, we should realize our major life is studying.You see, it is important to keep a balance between relaxation and daily work.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f7263ff6-68be-3bc9-b9fa-cbc65b2c2952> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are many kinds of entertainment relaxation activities in our daily left,such
as sporting,singing,dancing and so on.Nowadays we lived in a busy and crowed world,we need to relax
relax ourselves ,so relaxation entertainment relaxation activities are very essential for us.
But we should keep it in mind that we have good ertertainment relaxation activities as well as some
impropel or even unhealth activities.For example ,sports can help us build up a strong body,then we get
enough energy to do our work.But as we can see,somebody gamble for their main ertertainment relaxation
activities,it's of course not a good way to relax themselves and they may addicted to it,which affected
their health and their money as well.
As a college student, I think we should select some relaxation activities that are benefit of our
health and can really relax ourselves.I think sporting ,singing and dancing are good choice.Maybe we
can see some good books,some films in our spare time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 32bdf734-a4c6-3834-b75d-4904b3f5a1d0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Under the pressure of modern life ,we need to do something to relax
from the work .That is why relaxation comes .It is no doubt that relaxation has play an important role in our life.
There are lots of relaxations and different people may have different relaxations. Some relaxations such as taking part in sport games ,listening to the music and reading books are good for our physical and metal health. But at the same time ,every coin has two sides, we must realize that not all the relaxations are good for us. Like  gambling ,it may sometimes relax you form the work when you are gambling ,but it will lead you to be addicted to it more likely. And when you drop into it ,you may never get out. Other relaxations like drinking , druging ,whoring are also unhealthy things to do. They will hurt us and our family.
For us college students,I think we should stay far away from those unhealthy relaxations .Only do we stay away from them can we take an healthy life and achieve in our work. In the meanwhile ,we need to have some good relaxations to relax ourself from the heavy study.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f5a9c64c-d499-3336-8852-3f53b5706831> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the space time of life,we always need to have a relaxation.Choices are various,and the  popular relaxations now are playing computer games,playing chess,listening to music,having a panic,and so on.There are so many relaxation styles to be chosen.The question that what should be chosen is just depends on what you like.
Some relaxation ways are pretty good.We can feel moved,happy and relaxed in them,furthermore,we can do some thinking about life.For example,we all know that listening to music is a good way to relax.When we're listening to music,it seems that we enter an amazing and wonderful world.Except for music,we can also relax by doing sports,just like playing basketball,playing football,hiking,swimming,etc.We can find passion in sport.It's not only a way to release the pressure,but also a way to build a stronger body and promote the mental health.There are many other ways to relax,drawing,playing games,and they're good to us.
Nevertheless,the relaxation ways have differences.Not every way is absolutely benificial to us.For example,in someone's opinion,addicted to the SNS website like Facebook and chatting over days is the best way to relax.However,it sometimes will be a waste of time.And someone will think playing in the pub is nice,but it will eroll us sometimes.Something is harmful to us,in fact.
As a college student,my opnion is that we can choose some relaxation ways by our hobbies and the requests of building a correct degree sight.No doubt that we should relax,and there're many benificial ways to relax for us to choose. We should choose ways carefully,but we don't need be carefully all the time.When you choose a good way,just enjoy it and relax.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b6550210-f143-3030-a137-2c14df263d79> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As a student, we have not much time compared to the world, we must let our life be filled with happy, so the enough relaxation is extremely important. Relaxation is not only to our life, but to our work. when you suffered a long period of hard working or studying, it was obviously that you would be so tired and not capable to do the next task you teacher offered you. And you should relax for a while that you would recover.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 79ac0473-42aa-3ea0-a77b-3c631d1cec67> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of relaxations in our life,for example,reading books,playing football
and playing computer games.
Among these hobbies,some are good for us,reading books can make us feel relaxed,widen our horizon.Playing football can make us healthy,it also can let us make more friends.But some
Relaxions could do harm to us, playing computer can make us relaxed,but being addicted to computer games can not only make our body weak but also waste our time and draw away our attention.
As an undergraduate,I can feel the life in university is quite different from before,
we have spare time and there are no parsents and teachers who can press us to study.Some
students spend too much time on relaxtion and spend a little time in studying,in the end,some of them didn`t pass the final exam.In my opinion,we students need to have some relaxtions but we shouldn`t pay too much time to them.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 06b29e82-09c8-36cd-9d8c-91a8d35c5dc3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various of entertainments in our life.For example,some like doing sports,some like playing computer games,and what't more,some like reading novels.
However,not all the entertainments are good for us.So,we should learn how to choose the good ones so that we benifit from them.
In my opinion,we should have some entertainments to enrich our college life.As a undergraduate,not only should we learn from the lessons,but the life itself.Doing sports is a good entertainment.By doing this,we can build up our body.And when we are doing sports with our friends,we are communicatong with others.Our communication skill is improved.What's more,we can also learn from others.Reading novels is also a good entertainment.When we read a novel,we can broaden our view.We can also learn the thinking from the author.By doing this ,we can learn more and think more.However, many undergraduates like playing computer games in their free time.Playing computer games benifits us in some way,but playing too much is not good for us.
In a word, we must learn to choose our free time activities.Choose what benifit us,and get rid of what do harm for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 02f1a6c8-4d49-3d3c-b87e-67a0814cc546> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many ways to spend one’s spare time, some people go shopping, some people do sports, some might spend their free time surfing the Internet, still some others may choose to hang around for relaxing. As university students, I think that it is very significant to choose right ways to spend our spare time, as we don’t have too many classes to attend, and not all the ways I listed are good for us students.
Personally, I consider going outside a fantastic way of relaxing. Whether you like going to some natural scenes to get close to nature, or if you prefer some crowded places for sightseeing, I think, they are both beneficial. Playing sports is also a terrific way to enjoy yourself as well as to build up your body. However, if you spend almost all your free time playing computer games, in my opinion, you are wasting your time. Virtual things don’t have much benefit to one’s growing up. You may feel happy when you play the games, but believe it or not, there will be one day when you will be regretting having wasted so much time which can be used more efficiently.
Go to some meaningful places and do some meaningful work to enjoy your spare time, and you will find your life much better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6a804fcb-5329-3417-bc56-3ea7f5110ee2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life, we have many entertainment activities to relax ourselves. Set our
dormitory for example, when we won some prize, or, when the final exams coming, we often
buy some drinking for entertainment. Set our class for example, we have some activity last
week——playing basketball and running. Actually, entertainment activities have many forms.
But as we all know, entertainment activities have benefits and also be harmful for us sometimes.
Some activities can make us strong, and some will destroy our body. For example—— drinking,
the form we usually used to relax ourselves. When we only drink a little, it make perform it's role
greatly, but when we drink without abstention, we may do something badly. What's more, if we entertain
for a long time, we may lose the heart to study, which is the worst thing we don't want to see.
As a college student. In my opinion, entertainment activities don't absolutely benefit us.
Some are ok, and some are inappropriate. Of course, we now can't go one a day without any entertainment,
but we need to judge how to entertain ourselves, and what activities are appropriate for us. Also,
we have to deny ourselves, because, more entertainment, more power to study we lose. In short, I mean
entertaining when you need, and stopping when it takes affect.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 760d09ea-92ea-3630-baee-0735c9638cee> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of activities in life.Some are useful,but others are unsuitble and even dangerous,such as skiing and so on.
Every coin has two sides.As a college student,I think we should not only get knowledageble but also become strong.We should have some comnumication with others.Because we will work with our partners and workteam is very necessary in our sociaty.In this activity,we can meet many interesting people and broaden our view.We can learn many things from these activiyies,what we never can learn from the text.What is more,we also can challenge ourself and do many tries that to improve our social skills,which is important for our furture.I belivie that a successful man is who isn't afraid of difficuties.Courage is needed by our stutends.
Of course,we should do some prepation before the activity.It can prevent us fron getting hurt and is helpful to do activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 09a220b7-e029-3225-a8c9-9bee577d404f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,we live in a rich and colorful world.
There are a lot of entertainment activities in our daily
life.As the old saying says"every coin has two sides.".
Some entertainment activities are good for us,but others
are inappropriate and even do harm to our health,both physiologically
and mentally.
For example,we can take part in some sports activities,
which can improve our corporeity.On the contray,if we join some
unhealthy activities such as grambling,we will be addicted to it
and use up our energy,as a result ,we can't study or work normally.
As a undergraduate,I think we should keep a clear mind to distinguish
these entertainment activities.Choose the good part for us,and learn to
say no to the bad things like drags. I suggest that we read some good books
to relax our mind and expand our knowledge,this may be the best entertainment
activities for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 43aa65d1-8a3f-35e5-a9a5-b76fc67dce2d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is no doubt that a person who wants to have a cocolorful life must have a ralxation.
And there are different amusements in modern life.But are those benefical to us? I dont't
think so.Therefore we should learn to choose.
For example,nowadays many people consider drink as a habitual relaxation.They addict to
alcohol,and they are accustomed to drink with their frinds in spare time. It is a harmful
relaxation which harms health.I can give more examples that some relaxation are bad for us,
like being addicted to computer games or seeing some bad films.On the other hand,many relaxations
are benefical and we should choose,like playing sports,reading books,doing some sightseeing.
we not only can relaxe ourselves by that but also learn more and experience a healthy life.
As a university man my view is that althogh the ralaxations are different,but we must learn to choose the healthy
one,not only want to follow the bad vogue.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8b8f1d8f-b102-3b68-a4e6-9f53f770e2b8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
After we get into university,life is becomeing richer and richer as well as more and more colorful.there are always different activities to join in,such as playing kinds of balls, running with somebody you tink would fall in love with, playing computer games ,dancing in the bar,singing in the ktv with classmates and so on.but not aways all the activities are advantage for us.
When we do some sports, we can build up our body and strenghth ourselves, which have  many advantages. When we sing and dance, we relax our mind, strenthen our friendship between classmates or just waste our time which make us far away from negtive emotions. But if we get addicted to comeputer games, what we lose is not only our time but our healthy body.
In my opinion,we should do some acctivities which are meaningful for us,just like playing sports,trvalling, which are good for our body and mind. What we choose depend on who we are and make what kind people we are.we should do less unhelthy activities and put our mind on meaningful thing, only then can our life be truely rich and colorful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7ee70d6d-9e6b-3a70-a732-55efd9a9783d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
with the development of our society,our daily life become more and more interesting as a result of more and more entertainment's appearance.
But from where i stand,as the saying goes "every coin has two sides",the entertainments have both its advantage and disadvantage.as a high school student ,i think,entertainment is a good way for us to relax ourselves.in our study life,we may meet many kinds of stress which we can reduce by doing some entertainment,such as ,playing basketball or football,singing song and so on.though many entertainment is good for us because we can relax ourselves by joining it,there are also many kinds of entertainment are improper even bad for us.for example,many student may choose playing computer game as a way of entertainment to relax themselves.But in fact,many student may lose themselves in the computer game if they think that playing computer game is a way to relax themselves.as we all known,staying before the computer for a long time is bad for our health.
so in a word,entertainments have both its advantage and disadvantage.As a hihg school student,we should controll ourselves well.we must know which kind of entertainment is good for us ,and which kind of entertainmetn is bad for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0f2b5366-85ca-34cc-9369-825597f5ce1c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there's many things we can do to relax ourselves,like playing computer games, doing some sports and so on.
Some of the entertainment can really help us a lot.Such as watching movies,reading,playing sports,etc.Those entertainmentcan make us really learn something or keep our body strong.And sometimes even gives us inspiration with our study or work .But there still be some bad relaxation in life.Such as wacthing video which there are too many violent in it.It is no good during our growth and also wasting time.And playing too much computer games also destroy our health.
In conclusion, good amusements do good to people, which we could enjoy them appropriately. At the same time , it is advisiable for us to stay away from the bad amusements which may destroy us very easily.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c17dc899-9bb7-3263-ad84-62811051e5d6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Even though the world is similiar every day,every hour and the burden on our shouders
is hard to stand,we'd better be good to ourselves.
Nowadays, people have so many ways to relax themselves from the stress.For example,most
Japanese to drink some beers after work.In the college,some students play basketball or run
after class and some others like to go back the dormitory to play computer or even fall asleep.
However,not all the relaxaion is good for us.In fact, most people like to watch TV or play
PC games after work and study.Of course,it can really be fun,but I dont think it's a good
relaxation.An 8-hours-work make us so tiredof the minds,but our bodies still need some sports
to keep healthy.Men will feel more excited in the unhealthy games,when they finish the relaxation,
they find themselves even more tired.Even worse,some games will get someone addicted in them,and
then forget the real life.
In my opinion,the best way to relax is sports.As known to us all,exercises can not only
get free from the stress,but also strength our bodies.No exercises will make us easy to get
sick.Actually,moving our bodies can really let us get smarter and work better in the next day's
work.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9c297601-e241-374d-86c4-cf9e963c366c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
If we only work and study everyday,we will be crazy.But we will be happy if we have some
entertainments in our life.
As a undergraduate,I also have some entertainments in my daily life.Sometimes I watch a
film on the Internet,and some times just play some desk games.And I feel happy while I
having these.
But there is a problem,as we know that there also are some bad entertainments in somebodys'
life.For example,some people like gambling,or some people just addicted to drink wine.Something
like these are not good for our life,even for our health.In my opinion,I think that everyone
should be clear what entertainments are fit to do,and what are bad.
Everyone should not despise these bad entertainments,they would have a huge hurt to us.
But also,if we play some good  entertainments and we will get benefit from them.Just like play
some sports,like football,baseball and so on.These games are healthy and funny.
We have entertainments just for relax,just to get some fun,not for money or crazy feels.
So we should not to gambling or drink too much wine or some else bad entertainments.
So let these good entertainments to make your life be more relaxing and funny.Attention,we
have entertainments just for fun,not for others.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a443edab-8838-324b-8fa9-2022015a5bb5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our modern life,everything is going faster and faster,and people feel tired.so,what they can do to release
thier stress is that enjoying the happyness from amusement.however,there are so many amusements in our life,which is
the best choice?
There are a lot of choices for people choose to release thier stress, such as watching TV surfing in the internet,
doing some sports,enjoying the soft music,and so on.some of those amusements can release your stress,but some of
those amusements cannot relaxe yourself,contrarily,they may do something bad to you.for example,doing some exercise can
strengthen your body,and makes you relaxed,but doing much exercise will makes you feel more and more tired,and it's harmful
to your body.
As a university student,I think it's really necessary to choose a appropriate way to relaxe you body.if your feel tired
you can listen to the soft music,or enjoy a interesting movie,also you can surfing in the internet.Playing computer games is
also a good way to release your stress,but some students are crazy about computer games,they are addicted to the computer
games.it cannnot release thier stress,but do harm to thier body.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b304e23a-0989-3f3a-bd2c-601db161e9cc> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
None to say,There is plenty of entertainment in our daily life.As a university student,we are surely in need of this kind of things to relax ourselves afer a daytime of hard work.But are all of these is suitable for  us ? Maybe not.That is,something is not so good for us student to regard it as a way of relaxing.Just have a deep look at computer games,for example.Addicted to playing computer games ,fixed before the computer for sevaral hours and even throughout a daytime,igoring the lessons,will of course damage to your health,as well as your study and mind.
So,we can easily draw a conclusion that some relaxation ways is good,such as playing basketball which has a positive effect to your body.While others like playing tooo much computer games mentioned above,is terrible,not suitable for students at least.We must be aware of this kind of so-called relaxaion in life,keep it away,and have a health lifestyle.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 64694228-630d-359b-8bc1-763a1988c98e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society develops,our lives get very busy.In order to relax ourselves,a variety of entertainments have been created to help us get rid of the busy work.
As the old saying goes,"every coin has its own two sides",entertainment has advantages as well as disadvantages.On one hand,some entertainment does good to us when effectively relaxing our lives.For example,you will get relaxed as well as build up a strong body when playing basketball.Listening to music also can relax you,and it's good for your mental health meanwhile. On the other hand,sometimes we will take some wrong measures to relax ourselves,which may even cause severe result.Some people take drugs when they'e stressful,which will not only damage their health,but also damage their lives.It's not surprising to find that many people who are addicted to drugs lose their families at last.
As a college student,I think that we should not emphasize proper and healthy entertainment more.We should strike a balance between the entertainment's advantages and disadvantages.We'd better to choose relaxation like exercising and art activities rather than some harmful measures.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9d54ddcf-5c3e-3c5d-8dc5-04c24cbbe10c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many modes of relaxation,which bring a colorful life to us.
But relaxation can be two sides,that is,some of relaxation can benefit us a lot on our
daily life or make us feel good when feeling tense,others can do harm to us.
For example, doing exercise, like playing basketball or football, can make us stronger
and healthier,where we can get a sense of happiness. But,some entertainment,like gambling,
which you can also call "relaxation",can make us addicted and even destory one.
As a college student,I consider that the good relaxation should be advocated because
of its benefition to us,but the relaxation which makes us feeling restless and addicted.Moreover,
relaxation is nessessary.So we should have a clear eye on those relaxation to distinguish the
good from all those complex relaxation.I think that only in this way can we gain the most.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 79882283-dc1b-3157-bd89-c4617ef72abe> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There were various form of relaxtions in our daily life.For our busy living style nowadays,
there's no doubt that proper relaxtions are necessary especially to our college students.
With our growing up,more and more kinds of activities are known to us,some fo which are
valuable and no harms,just like go cycling,swiming,or goto KTV.But there are also some kinds of
activities have bad effect to people .For example get drown in net bars or drinking,some even do
drugs,which can destroy their bodies and even their family.
As a college student ,I think we should develop the true attitude of life.No matter we succeed
or failed some time,we should not let ourselves in our own way.Instead of that ,we should keep a
clear brain every time.Be responsible to ourselves and the people who love us and we love.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a3d9b448-2141-32f7-9c7e-0c9d6c232905> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many different entertainments in our life. In our spare time, some would like to play basketball, some would like to go to the KTV, some would like to play computer games, etc。It depends on us to select which way to spend our free time and relax but actually the way we choose will have a great influence in our life.
If you are choosing a good way, it definitely can benefit you a lot of. Take reading as an example. Some people enjoy reading books and never look it as a burden. They read a lot after finishing their jobs. From these reading, they can not only weighten there eye sigh but also improve their ability which will surly help them work better. In contrary, Some only want to play when they are free. Many of them are just addicted to computer games without realizing it. So they start to put more and more time on games and even set the main job aside. By this two comparison, there is no doubt that choosing a good relaxation way is important.
After knowing how important the relaxation is, we should know how to create a good habit to make your free time more valuable. Spend the spare time more on which can do well but not harm to you! Reading, doing sport, charting with friends are all good options. And stay away form those will make you stay at home or don't have to think. Keep doing this, I am sure that you can get a good way to relaxation and enjoy a great fun from your spare time while also making your life better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 66b26921-04b4-37cf-b8ce-ded446ee91b1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
"The one who can not play well, he can not work well." as is always said by people. That's true, and we do need some appropriate relaxation which adds color in tasteless routine of every life.
However, things may not be as idealistic as we thought. Entertainments are enable us to relax as same as doing harm to us. Despite so many advantages they provide, they sometimes exert bad influences on people's life---say, online games which made boys addicted to, leading him to fail. But we still can't convince ourselves that entertainments do good or bad in our lives.
That depends, as far as I can consider. The crucial point lied on self-discipline. We should focus on how to handle the time and method to take privileges from entertainments instead of stick on whether we need relaxation. As a under graduated student, I suppose every one come and find sorts of relaxation to suit him. And it should be really likable from which enable people learn something (music is great, huh!). No one can resist the temptation of relaxation, but at least we could make good use on it and that's enough.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a61d3da3-5fe6-30db-928a-ee0910fa5c4c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern society, the ways to relax ourselves becomes multiple, it occurs various entertainment activities in our daily life. With the advance of technology, more new and interesting services have been created during the recent decades. For example, People learn to use ipad to play exciting games ,watch film in the Imax theatre.Meanwhile,the old style of entertainment still plays a major part, in the sports center, you can also see many people playing ball games with each other.
However, among all these kinds of activities, we should tell the bad ones. Since some of them neither relax our spirits nor teach us something valuable, which even do more harm than good.Some people, mainly students, choose to play computer games all day or sit in dormitory watching teleplays. I can't say that these activities do only harm to us ,but I'm sure that it's improper for us to just keeping play games or watch television the whole day.
As a college student, we 'd better go outside to relax our heart. It does good to us if we would get more close to nature but the computer screen.So,why not ask a few friends of yours, take a camera, and have a nice short trip!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e3ab47f1-ec2a-3f44-a5de-a33799446079> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is more and more busy in our life now. We always under a great stress and feel disappoint in our daily works. So we need many relaxation to relax ourselves.
With the develop of the technology, too many new kind of relaxations apprearing. People has more and more choice to relax. Relaxations also become much easier then befor. Such as computers are smaller and easy to take. You can surf the internet, watch movies or play computer games everywhere. There are also many new kinds of machine for relax. Such as psp or ps2 for game. It is also much popular that some machine can relax your body. Example for relax your eyes, relax your leg, etc. People also choice some ways to relax by some active. Such as make partis, chat to someone, do sports, go shopping or just have a walk.
Most of those actives are useful to make you relax and also can make you have a good life.But there are also some that is not good for people, even bad for one. Such as some computer games has some things bad for people who is playing the game. There are also some activaties are bad. Such as smoking.It real bad for your health.
I think the man who develop the way of relaxation, should make it good for who use it. For the users, we should sperate them by ourselves. And be make far away from bad things.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID efa3d543-cc5e-3aac-b5a4-35500875e482> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We are human beings,not machines,which means keeping working is not our ways of doing things.We nend relaxattic no and then.And that's how relaxatic of variety developed.Gaming ,exercise,and surfing the Internet,that's means of many of us to forget the unhappiness and pressure of daily life.
But another fact is that some ways of relaxatic is not recommanded and even worse,harmful.Very a few people( luckily )drink alcohol drink or spirit to forget all their unhappiness or sorrow,which, obviously,harms their own health and causes many social problems and crime.And as to gaming,considered as evil by many,attracts people mainly of young age,to drown in it to play day and night and cost much money.
As a university sudent,I have to admit some ways of relaxatic is actually dangerous,but at the condition of overdoing.Just like
drinking,appropriate drinking does no harm,and actually does goods.
The focus is whether you can do it properly.The rule is "Relaxatic is always relaxatic,not your jobs or your career".

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e44c2fda-1258-33ea-8bee-7503425cc96e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As China's development in economy,the standard of living has been a big difference now.
Various of relaxation in our daily life become more and more popular.
On the weekends,people always go to play some ball,sing or dance,have a party,drink
something,or maybe just go out for walking,they even can do nothing but be relaxed.
Some are helpful and meaningful for us,like doing sports,you can exercise,while singing
songs,you can get a good intention.But we can not ignore the fact that sometimes some
relaxation are hamlful to our health,for example,playing computer games too much.
In my opinion,relaxation is necessary for all of us.However,every time we decide to do
something,we have to make it clear if it is better for you to do such things and what will
be caused.We can not simply devide something into ture or false.So being responsible to
yourself and others is the most important thing.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6b6a7cc6-06a5-3bb6-99da-a555ab3e7c1c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation is an important part of our lives.There are many types of relaxation,
someofwhich, such as doing sports, reading, watching movies, dancing, are of great advantage.By
doing that, we can not only have a good relax but also gain something good.But some way of
relaxation is harmful to us. As we know,many people take drugs as a relaxation,which hurt
their health. If we relax ourselves in a wrong way,we may not be able to be relaxed, and that
'relaxation' may have a bad influence to our daily work.
As a college student, I think we must do something to relax ourselves, but we should
do it collectly. When we are free,we could go to the library to read some book which is not
of our major so that we can read them delightedly. Besides, we can do sports so that we can
have a good mood and we will have more power in our daily study. Also, seeing movies is a good
way for relaxing.
Relaxing collectly,and we will have a good mood and we can grow up healthily.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f8f0650f-33e2-3e99-98f5-ab0b4c336696> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
People can not live a happy life without relaxation.Playing basketball after work
may relax ourselves and we will have a stronger body. In face , there are many ways to re-
lax ourselves in life, such as doing some sport,playing games,reading,and watch TV.Actually
many of these ways are good for us.However,some of them is not proper for us, some can even
do harm to us.
In my opinion , we should do something to relax in daily life. Because keep working
for a long time can hurt our body and mind.If we do someting to relax ourselves, we can work
better.But we should not do some relaxation too much,such as playing computer games immoderacy,
have too much sport , and reading for a long time, which will hurt our body.What's more, we
cann't do someting like having drug to relax ourselves, because it will not  only  hurt our
body but also hurt our mind . Anyway we should do something proper to relax us and keep away
from the relaxation that can hurt us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f556d83a-bb4a-3c7d-ad23-fd8b90cab0f7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There a lot of relaxation activities in our life, such as doing sports, playing games and
doing volunteer work.. Different people have different choices, which is resulted from
their different characteristics and experience.
And as we all know that not everything is safe, some relaxation activities in our life can
be quite dangerous and harmful for us though some are exactly good for us. In spite of
this, finding some relaxation is quit necessary for our undergraduate.
In my opinion, doing some relaxation that really relax us is quite a good way to reduce
our study pressure, which will riches our life in case of making us become a dull guy.
As for the danger, a little caution is enough, because if we think about too much about
the danger, there almost no relaxation suiting us.
So please don’t be afraid of taking relaxation activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID af6bd497-0f07-39d2-9d86-efad53d33b92> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In recent years,our society develops quickly.Because of this,our social life become more
and more colorful.After our daily work,we can enjoy lots of relaxed activity.
Which relaxation do you enjoy depends on what kind of person you are.As for children,
they may like to play games.As for teenagers,they may like to travel to some places.As for
old people,they may like to play chess or drink tea.All these activity are benificial to us.
We really need relaxation after busy work,which make us energetic again.People who only work
without any relaxation will become more and more weak.But it doesn't means that we can do everything to relax ourselves.For example,some students think drinking can relax themselves and they always drink a lot.It isn't a good way to relax.Even worse,some guys take drug to get relaxation,which is harmful to our health.Besides,I don't think it is wise to take relaxation without limitation.Play computer games can relax you in some way.But if you play games day and night,it would lead to side effect and make you more tired.
As a university student,I think that we really need relaxation in lifes.What we should consider is the way which we choose to relax and the limitation of relax.We should choose a
proper way to relax with limitation so that we can keep work and relaxation balance.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 893ebd70-97d0-3213-9698-110567b07f8b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of relaxations in our life, which provides us with various choices to relex ourselvse andd set our mind free for work and study we'll be faced with. But somehow some of these activitise are not proper even harmful to us, while the others do lots of good to us.
As a university student, I think it's necessary for people to do more relaxation but also do the right ones, so that they won't get harmed when they try to relax themselvse. And as far as I'm concerned, light activitise such as joging, riding a bike, hiking and the enjoyment of books, music and movies are absolutely good for people to refreash themselvse and gain a graet mood. Furthermore, they can also build up their bodise or learn something in these way. For another hand, every extreme sport is not a wise choice for daily relaxation, activitise that takes a lot of energy away and put people in risk. We do relaxation to relax ourslvse but not to break ourselvse down. For our own good, make a wiser choice, we'll earn more.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d9f23d50-9376-3a80-8b6c-51b4d2b7f9e8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kind of ways of relaxation.Like watching movie, listening to the music
and so on.Everyone has his own way to relax. Many ways of relaxation is good for people's
physical health and mental health, but some kinds of the relaxation ways is harmful to
humanbeings especially the students.
Swimming , walking ,listening to the music and many other acts can improve our health.
But some students prefer to playing computer games to relax himself, it can be bad to our-
self. There is a student who felt upset to the study, so he played computer games day and
night to relax himself from the stress of the study. Finally he get ill. Many examples like
this happened around us. So we must pay attention to the problem about the  harmful relaxation
ways.
As a college student, we are dependent and we should respect to our actions and our life.
Many students make playing computer games and some other bad actions as their relaxation ways.
I don't think they are the best ways that fit us.To relax, we can go to riding bike with some
friends in a sunny day,and we can talking with our best friend with a cup of tea. The reason
we take relaxations is to release the stress of life. So why can't we do some healthy things
not only to relax but also to communicate with others and train ourselves. In conclusion ,
we should choose some healthy ways that are good for our physical health and mental health.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6d412335-3a38-326f-9cf5-b16a5f03e802> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
People at different ages show their distinct preference when it comes to choosing a relaxation for their spare time. Youngsters, especially college students, tend to go out occassionally for a crazy KTV night with dozens of beers, or driving at an exciting speed at midnight. On the contrast, the elder ones prefer more time for sharing their experience with their friends and families.
We should regard this change as a growth of wisdom, since some of these activities is meaningful while others are not proper and may even do harm to us. The choices of the non-slept-nights, for example, may overuse our energy and thus leave us tired for the next whole day. On the other hand, having a wonderful talk with our families and friends helps us to keep a good mood for the period of time.
As an energetic college student, I prefer to rest more and save my energy for further study, compared to that having an exciting but meaningless night awake.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 807c0b9a-7a35-33e9-b370-5ef17979a78b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,we have more and more entertainments .when we are free,we will always want to relax ourselves and make us a better condition of work coming on .Maybe we can have some sports,lieten to music,watch a movie,go shopping or play games and so on. Which kind of entertainments to be chosen  completely depends on you .
However,just as we can see,some entertainments actually bring something bad rather than
benefit to us.For instance,some people choose  gambling as their entertainment.This can cause terrible things happen,like murdering,robbing,and family broken up, not only just losing money.
From what have mentioned above ,I think people should really jugde by themselves,whether the entertainment they choosing is good for them.As a college student ,I will always tell myself who I am,who I am going to be,then I will ask my self what to do to achieve it.And finnaly ,I will know clearly whether I should choose the entertainment,and what entertainment should I choose.I think this is a way to remind you about the result brought by the entertainment and make sure that the entertainments are really working for you,but not ruining you.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 73b51d53-2358-3598-b2ed-ad51aa02234f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of relaxations in our life.
Some relaxations are good to us, such as singing and dancing, but some are not appropriate or even harmful, like gambling.
In my opinion, as a college student, some appropriate relaxations are necessary. Everyday, we have to attend many courses and do much homework. So in our spare time, we need some activities to relax ourselves. We can go to KTV to sing for several hours; or play basketball with friends; or read some books.
But we should be careful to select our relaxation, as some relaxations are really harmful to us. Some may make us addicted to it and affect our study, which we should get away from.
So, having the appropriate relaxation, then you can have a better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0d4e4ee3-4416-3502-ab42-dc026f112631> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are varieties of activities in our lives.Some of these activities are beneficial to us,which can not only
refresh our bodies ,but also help us to make new friends.However, some others maybe  not appropriate .They may waste
our time and even harmful to us.
As a college student,I think we should have our own thoughts and chooese the porper activitis by outselves. Activities will
costs our time and maybe something else.In the other hand,most activities and entertainment will do benefits to us,which will
strength our bodise,improve our social communication abilities,and broaden our sights.As as result ,we should take all the costs
and benefits  into consideration and take a balance.we should not watse all the time on relaxation so that we may ignore our
study.whereas,we should avoid all the activities as it's necessary for college students.Of course, for the activities which
will only kill our time and even harm our selves,we should reject them.
Never should we ignore the disavantages of relaxation as well as its benefits.Consequetly,we should choose the porper ones
ofr ourselves and make our college lives more fantastic.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cab9e8c8-a0fc-3619-9e7f-3a6d0fd925e3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation takes a great part in our life.Our life is full of stress,which demand that we need some
relaxation to take a break.There are varieties of ways to take a break,for example,doing some sports,
walking and playing games.
However,not all of them are benefit.Relaxation methods,such as meditation,are useful ways to bring
your emotions into balance.Also,walking is a great way to bring you a good mood.We relax so that we
can resume our energy and do something better.But some one may relax through playing computer games,
which will result a bad effect on their body and eye-sight if them continue playing for a long time.
As a saying goes,every coin has both two sides.Relax in an appropriate way is of great importance.
Many college students get burdens from their studies,so it is best to choose an effective way to relax.
We should be clear that we relax not for entertainment but for doing something better after relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 990cc8db-df09-3ec7-829f-39d467a9b30d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life, there are different kinds of relaxation activities. For a student, they can do some sports such as playing basketball and badminton. Also, they can listen to the music or surf the Internet for the purpose of relaxing themselves. For a general citizen, they can go to a cinema or take part in a party for relaxation.
As we all know, every coin has two sides. The relaxation in life has advantages and disadvantages at the same time.If a student surf the Internet properly,they can acquire a lot of knowledge out of textbooks.But if they use the Internet to play online games, they probably cannot place their emphasis on studying.Then they cannot pass the exam and even cannot graduate eventually. When some people take part in a party, they can get together and improve their friendship. But if they drink a lot of beers, their health will suffer a lot from alcohol.What's worse,it can make a car accident if someone drives a car after the party.
In my opinion, relaxation in life is very necessary for us.But what we should pay attention to is how to take part in the activities appropriately. Only if you take part in the proper activities can you enjoy yourselves significantly.Because the relaxation is to relax yourselves, not do harm to you. Hence, we should distinguish the good and the bad and enjoy the real relaxation in our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fb4c1804-2885-355c-9519-48868d777e49> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the deeper studying,our pressures are increasing.If without relaxation,we will be tired in too much homework and assignment.So relaxation is very important to us.
There ara many kinds of activities for us to relax ourselves,for example basketball.We can get many full in it and it really relaxes us effectively.With so many sports,not only can we train our build,but also refresh our mind.However,some relaxations do harm to our healh,which should be avoided.Take basketball as example,many students are crazy in playing basketball,they always put all their efforts in it to get win.Thus,they run faster and faster,and do some dangerous posture.As a consequence,they hert themselves with bonebroken.
After that,they can't move conveniently.Worse all,it affects their study with bringing too much troubles to their life.From this perspective,too dangerous relaxation is really unworth for our student.
In my point of view,relaxations are needed.But we mush care ouesrlves in doing relax sports.If relaxation does harms to me,quits it and chooses another more meaningfull relaxations.At the same time,we should not reject to relaxation for fear that it would demage us.Keep in mind that take care of ourselves no matter what relaxations we do.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 379153a9-627b-3e46-b8a0-e785b5541b05> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the developing of the society, there are more and more relaxations in life, such as watching movie, the KTV, playing computer games, and etc.
Although most of the relaxations can make us feel relaxed and do things more efficiently, there are some relaxations that do harm to us, for example, if a university students play computer games all the day, he will skip the classes and do badly on his study.
As a university student, I keep the opinion that people should distinguish the good from the bad. For the good relaxations, we should keep it and do better. On the other hand, we ough to keep away from the bad relaxations. Only by then can we relax ourselves and have a better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 29bf4606-296c-3aa4-89c1-99905d8a889e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many entertaining activities in our daily life. We sing, we dance, we do
every fantastic thing one by one just for fun.
When we feel upset, we may want to sing songs, watch movies , play basketball with our
best frends because these activities not only can cheer us up and make us relax, but also
improve our frendship.We say that these activities is beneficial.But there are some
activities that may do harm.Some students,especially college students, dive into video
games and lose themselves.
As a college student, I think we should keep it in mind that we should have our
entertaining activities under control so that we can benefit from them.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e10f6944-7366-3a75-a01c-a3e834afdee6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In order to keep a hight spirit,after a busy day or week,relaxation is necessary to
us.There are variaty of entertament we can have.Can we draw a conclution
that all of the entertament are good to us?Not we can't.
Every thing has two aspects.Some entertaments can help us relax making us feel better
after busy works or something terrible hit.But some entertaments may do harm to us.
For example we shoudn't gambling.No only since that we university students can't not make much
money to afford the gambling but also it will mislead us.Someone is addicted to the gambling will not
give up if he lose money in the gambling what he trys to do is winning his money back and at last he lose more
money.If he earns some money in the gambling that greedy man always think that he can do better if he try one
more time.But actually it often makes him lose more.Not only did he lose his money but also his happiness and his
great ambition before he get addicted.
So as a university student when we need to relax ourselves we should make a wiser choice and make a good
taste.And also self control is important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4ad2ded9-de43-3419-9b14-75d89f5a12f5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, our life is full of many kinds of entertainments. Like every coin has two sides,
the entertainments also have its own advantages and disadvantages. Some entertainments are
beneficial for us, but there may be other entertainments which are not appropriate for us
would do harm to our lives.
From my point of view, as a college student, it is indispensably that our lives should
have some meaningful entertainments due to the fact that not only can they help us to relax
ourselves from the intense study and life which can enable us to have adequate vitality for
the following work,  but also we can really have our own fun through these entertainments
especially for those entertainments have the function to train our intellect. Last but not
least, I want to say that some entertainments like always singing and dancing in the KTV
would exert a bad influence on us, making us have an addiction to them, thus we will feel
tired and get nothing from them.
In a word, we should have some beneficial entertainments instead of those meaningless
entertainments to make our lives more colorful and more interesting.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 386da4dc-7c44-3f85-9da0-9ace9ef0d85b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
This is a stressful era. In order to live comfortably, we must get through a variety of troubles. However, there are various entertainment in our life to relax us. When we become tired under the stress of life, we can unload it through a lot of methods. For instant, we can watch a movie in the cinema with your parents or classmates. Certainly, playing a ball game is also a useful way. In addition, surfing on internet can do this as well.
Nevertheless, every coin has two sides, including the relaxation in our life. Some entertainment do good to us, but there still exist other harmful relaxation. We must use them sensibly so as to lead a healthy life.
In my perspective, I enjoy chatting with my classmates or parents to get relaxation. Through this way I can let the people caring me to know the present situation where I am in. Meanwhile, speaking out my troubles can make me feel more comfortable. Surely, someone may choose surfing on internet or playing computer games. Indeed, these ways are popular among present undergraduates. At the same time, they can solve our stress quickly and effectively.
Nonetheless, they are fairly dangerous to us, because under the influence of them, we can easily get addicted and forget our study. If we lose the control of ourselves, the state of study can easily slows down, which is vital for us students. So when we make a choice to relax, we must do it cautiously and carefully. The most important is that we need to remember the purpose of these relaxation every moment, through which we can reduce the possibility to get addicted.
In a word, no matter what methods we choose, we must relax ourselves reasonably.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 26e1e588-5e4c-35aa-b1bf-bfee8a5b0deb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the development of our life level,entertainment play a more and more significant role in our life. As we can see in our daily life,there are something takeing place in our work and study,such as  playing computor games,seeing movie,going hiking.
Nobody can deny that enjoying relaxation is most important in our life . However,as an old saying goes:"every coins have tow sides."some of the relaxation play a good jod to ourselves,unavoidablely,some of the relaxations are bad for us. For a example,if a student spent more time in playing computor games than studying,  he or she would be punished when a term examinition coming.What's more ,computur games not only will influence the achievement of a student,but aslo can take shape of a introvert man,who was a extrovert man in beginning.
As an university student we are,my recommendations are that we have to learn how to relax ourselves in our daily life ,but in the some time,we can make varied of our relaxation,for which we won't be addicted to one entertainment when we relax ourselves.moveover ,doing sport is a good choose to relax.In a word,choosing relaxation aims to relax you ,don't let it fatigue you .If you can judge this word everytime,you chose must be a good relaxation in you life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8a85fc7b-ec17-3dce-ac66-952525a00eb2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there are so many entertainment activities.As we all know,we can get relaxe and
feel comfortable in some meaningful activities,such as seeing a educated film,reading a book
and so on.Through this activities,our life will be become diversified and our sentiment will
be more advanced.On the other hand,everthing has its bad aspect.some entermainment arrounding
us are bad for us.For example,playing computer games can make somenone feel upset and lose his
interest in studying.There are so many bad entertainments which are similar to playing computer
games.And these activities are useless for our life,even they would be harmful for our studying
and working.In a word,entertainment activities also have dual character.
In my opinion,we should think highly of our entertainment,and distinguish which ativities are
good for us.Besides,we must give up some useless activities,which are bad for our studying,such
as playing games.So it is important to choose relaxation in life,we must make correct choice.
What a correct choice is that choosing some activities helpful for our working.
I deeply believe that everyone can share advantage from good relaxation in life,if you choose
correct activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 026cb424-e859-3c1e-90e1-f6be1bea8dbd> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Our human beings have the nature to play and relax, so it is understandable that we all like entertainment. We have a big entertainment industry, which means there are a lot of entertainment activities around us. They enrich our university students’ everyday life, but at the same time, they could cause bad influences on us.
In my opinion, we university students should choose the beneficial entertainments and avoid being addicted to some entertainment. Some of my schoolmates are crazy about playing computer games, and few people even play games all night! I think we must have abstention from addiction to computer games.
To be honest, I like play computer games just like others, such as CS, War Craft etc. But it does not mean I am addicted to them. So I want to give some question to those need them. Firstly, limiting your entertainment time, and when you time over, you have to stop. Secondly, be serious to your potential addiction action, and not let it become your nightmare. Last but not least, treasure your study chances. You should know that many people can’t have the opportunity to go the university. When you feel tired, if surely can have relaxation, but don't make relaxation becomes your excuse to be lazy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fdb19e0f-426e-3658-9a5a-bf523522de38> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There'are many kinds of relaxations in our life.Singing, dancing,playing games and so
on.Some of them are advantaged,though others are disadvantaged. Such as singing and dancing ,not many people will think they'are bad normouly.But playing games on computer will be     thought of wasting time and bring many other problems.As a student,I think that we should learn to distinguish the relaxation'advantages and disadventages.Smoking is also a way of relaxations for many people though we all know it's bad for our healthy.Somking can also bring healthy problem to whom around smokers.SO for yourself and odthers,we shouldn't choose  somking as our relaxation.In the other hand,we could choose sports which good for us as relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d85e24a0-f0a5-3e6a-bd7b-8fd51fe54870> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the the development of society,there exists various kinds of leisure activities in our daily life,
such as exercise,listening music,playing computer games,reading and so on.
As a coin has two sides,so do liesure activities.As we know,some are of great benifit,like taking exercise,
can help build up our health.Or like reading,which can broaden our horizon and enlarge our knowledge.However,
some activities are harmful to us.Nowadays,almost teenagers are fond of listening music.They play them loudly,
which is bad to their eardrums and many of them have the hearing  that is no better to the old.Besides,many teenagers
are addicted to computer games,which do great harm to their study and health.
As far as I am concerned,as a colledge student,we must learn to tell wrong and right from these activities clearly.
Taking activies which are good to us,thus leading a meaningful college life without any regret.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b45d9f9c-d3e7-3f61-b9fa-3194de1b56f8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In this time,with the people's life get better,more and more various activities of entertainment get in our life. And under the pressure,we do need the entertainment activities to relax in the life.
Some of them are good for us,just like sports,it is not only good for our boby,but also for our meatl health,which can make us vent our sentiment.That some are good is said that some may be bad on the other hand,even though do harm to us.Some young man like go to play computer games in net bar day and night.Playing games is a way to relax,but doing it day and night becames a bad way.It will make our eyesight loss and then wear glasses.Faceing the computer radio will alse do harm to our body.
For a university student who life in the present age,I think we should improve our ability of judgment to make us distinguish good and bad in lots of entertainment activities.We should choose the good activity to do and abandon the bad thing.let us relax and be good for us at the same time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 86a79517-90df-3446-ac75-6e7849ce7c3a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Sometimes we may feel nervous or worry about something and we will be tired at this time. That is to say, we need to find some way to make ourselves relax. As we know, there are so many relaxations in our life. We could choose our favourite way to have fun.
Choosing a good way to relax is significant, such as having a walk or listening to some music. On the other hand, however, there are some bad methods, for example, playing computer games for a long time.
As a student in university, I think that if we enjoy a good way to make ourselves relax, we can gain more. For example, we can do sports and we will know some people and make friends with them. But if we chose a bad way to relax, it would cannot only not help us to relax truly, but also waste our time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 80fc0ed2-144c-3eee-b083-263546423eb8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the development of our technology and economy , more and more relaxations have come to us to give us entertainment.
People can release their pressure and have fun by taking some activities which may be impossible in the past .
For example ,people can’t use computers or sing songs at KTV in the past.
Nowadys,technology has brought us great convenience and fun.
But every coin has two sides.Some people are addicted to some activities which may be harmful like playing computer games and taking drugs.
These activities not only waste our time and money,but also threaten our health.And these activities may also lead to some problems.
In my opinion, we should realize the benefits that the technology and relaxations give us.
Meanwhile ,we should be clear of the problems .
And we should know how to deal with the bad effects as well as make full use of technology.
In a word ,it all depends on us whether relaxations do harm or do good on us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8fef92d6-f2fe-3328-8f95-6c5b6b9e459f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is much relaxation in our life such as doing exercises, listening music,playing
computer games and so on.These relaxation in our life relaxa us,make us happy after work
or study.
listening music is a great enterainment to relax.When we feel tried with our heavy study and work,we can close our eyes and listen some soft music.And then we will feel happy anddynamic.
Doing exercises is a effective relaxation to reduce our pressure.By the way,we can become
healther too.See some movies also a good enterainment to relax.And we can learn English from
some movies.
But there are some entertainments have a bad effect to us.Playing computer games is an
example.Some of my friends addicted to computer games and they can not have a good mark
to university.And some students drap out of school because addiect to comeputer games.
There are many kinds of relaxation. But in my opinion,we should study to choose some correct enterainments to relax.A good relaxation can make us study effective,but a wrong
relaxation will do harm to our study and work.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID da0d6dc2-b8c2-3e0c-bccb-bbdf8c0da421> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As a famous saying goes: ’All work and no play makes Jack a dual boy.’ People need
relaxation in addition of working. In fact, there are various relaxation in life.
However, the choice of relaxation varies from person to person. Some of the relaxation
are beneficial to a person, while some of them will do harm to a person. The relaxation,
such as taking exercises or reading books, can not only make a person feel relaxed, but
also develop a person’s character. On the contrary, the relaxation, like gamble, will not
only waste time but make a person be addicted to it and even drive him to commit a crime.
In view of the harmful effect of bad relaxation, in my opinion, we should choose the
beneficial relaxation as possible. As a college student, we should balance our study
time and relaxation time so that we can study more efficiently and play happily.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 87abe53f-1318-356c-8761-f55436443deb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In 21th century,many people are full of stress in their life so they need to find some
relaxations to reduce their stress.Many entertainments are created by us such as
poker,football,computer games and so on.All of us can ralax in different ways.
Afer finish the job,doing some sports or playing poker with your friends must be a good
idea for you.Entertainments can make you feel happy and comfortable when you are such tired
after work.
However,not all of the relaxations in life are good for us.For example,if you are
addicted to the computer games or other unhealthy things,you may be ridded out of you work
by yourselves,which will let you lose you job or be weak in study.Beside,the gambling in
playing poker is also harmful for us.
As a college student,I think entertainments are important in our life.When I feel tired
after study,I like playing badmition with my classmates,which can rid me out of the
uncomfortale mood for the heavey job.But students must be clear that entertainments are just
a small part in our life so we can't be addicted to them and make them filled with our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b09e60cf-c2a7-3760-8edf-06c4a25f5ed1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
The subjuect of relaxation is a big topic and a very important part in our life. What's more, true relaxation not only makes you feel goood , increases self esteem, but it also put your manifestation powers on after burners.
There is all kinds of entertainment activities to make us relax. For example, we can go to fitness club, play basketball, travel, swim and so on. These activities can let us relax as well as enhance physique. But ont all activities are favorable. Some people like playing computer games to relax themselves the whole night or eating and driving too much. It is harmful for their health.
Relaxation is about a mild alpha state and maintaining it. Breathing exercuses are a great way to practice relaxation.Relaxation is also about becomming aware of your boby and your mind and consciously doing those thing that bring about balance. When you learn to become truly relaxed, you will conserve energy. We should choose the suitable relaxation methods. So learn to relax, it will increase your conscious awareness.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b62b1ec0-22f6-3ddb-9979-a6ea02bd67ef> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Living in the modern society,we have many assess to a variety of entertainment activities.The existence of the activity has a great effect on our life.In a certain level,taking different kinds of activities not only refreshes our emotion,but gives us time to get rid of the pressure which originates from our work and study and relax ourselves as well.
Thinking about the activities that surround our life,we may figure out the advantages and disadvantages of them.Some of them are of great benefit to our life,like playing basketball and playing the piano.However,activities ,such as going to the bar or disco,may do harm to our metal health.
Just as the old saying goes,'Every coin has two sides.'As a college student, I think we should hold a correct view to the activities that have been provided .In the first place, the diversity of activities have added new elements to our society which have been proved that their existence,in a way, are of benefit. In another place, college students having the higher educational background meanwhile should have the ability to distinguish healthy activities from the bad ones. So it is you that determine whether you may get involved with the harmful activities.And make sure you do the right choice.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5d2676ce-e533-36bc-9da7-3b279e605c7f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life, their are many entertainments which were filled with our spare time, such as going to a movie, playing computer games and doing some outdoor sport games and so on.
As far as we concerned, some activities can widen our horizen. We can also make friends with others by these entertainments. But each coin has two sides, some activities are not good for us, they even do harm to us. For example, if we go out with some strangers, our safety can not be guaranteed, it's pretty dangerous!
Personally, there is no deny that we can have a relax through some entertainments, but we should always be careful. Taking care of ourselves and then enjoying our life by some relaxion, that is the best choice, which is my own opinion.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1f49c143-4e3a-3331-8ab1-674a05e54e94> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life, on the one hand ,we need to work hard to be successful.On the other hand , we need to have time to relax and enjoy ourselves. there are so many ways that we can relax ourselves such as palying games with friends, taking a trip with friends .
Among these activities , some are good for us though some are not or even do harm to our health .
So as we youth , we have to make a choice to choose the one that is good for our health instead of the one is bad for  us .
As far as I'm concerned , taking a tirp with friends is a good idea . While we are taking a trip , we can not only have a wonderful and impressing time and make beautiful memory with our friends , but also can we deepen our friendship and relax ourselves. And I don't think playing computer games all day in our room is a good idea . As we university men , we need to go out to broaden our sight and make more and more friends in order to make our future bright .
From what have discuss above, we can draw a conclusion that we need to choose a right way to relax ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 46d4e571-b535-3fbf-b856-6d94859a7245> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Thinks to the improvement of science, today we have more kinds of relaxation to choice .But some of they might do harm to you while others do relax you and make you fell soft. As a 21st century student, we should have the ability to find out what is good for us. Take the computer games for example, most of us relax ourselves in playing the computer games or the video games, but few of us recognize that we will feel even more tired after playing the computer games. what’s more? Some of us might even addict to it .So I think we should be careful when we choice our relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fabb849e-fe49-3f8f-a750-b107241f2692> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is know to all, there are all kinds of activeties arounding us. But what important is that not everyone of them is of great signification to us. When we join an organization or take part in a activety , thinking twice before action is very necessary for us.
Espeacilly in high school , activeties has a lot to do with us , learning to take proper Relaxation means a lot. There are many activeties hosting everyday , when we have to take classes, there is no need for us to join them.It is very often of us to make a descission between relaxation and study, then we must konw what is more important to us. In addition to this, we also need to know relaxation's bearing when we descide to take action, it is very stupid of us to relax just because others relaxe. As a high school student ,we must have ourslves' points to relaxation that need to exist but never is the symbol of all.
In a short word, I must admit that relaxation plays a important role in our life. When we take relaxation, it is of great importance for us to think twice, we should promise that it will make a little contribution to us but never have an effect on our study. Making a wise descission before relaxation make a big difference!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b6e7829e-bb6b-3666-b8e2-82ce15cf322e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life , we can choose many different relaxation .But not all relaxation is good for us. As a student of university  , we must know what is harm for us and what is good for us .
When I get up in the mornning  , I usually ask myself what can I do to relaxing today . I tell my self “Do what be good for you”. When the social become different ,the relaxation type is different . In our school , many boy like play computer games , they  stay in the dormitory all day .In the middle night you can see some  guy play game with his or her e-friends . But they fit is become bad  . So I think we can’t stay in the dormitory too long , it is harm for our healthy . we  can  have  some outdoor sports . In the weekend we can play football with our mate  . Having a walk when after dinner is also a good choise.
I think if you choose a good way to relax yourself , you will be happy and healthy everyday.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 21070911-3f28-3f61-a288-0f8908859ec9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As university students, we have various extracurricular activities in our daily life, such as, playing basketball, playing computer games, singing, playing the guitar, etc. Some of which are difintely beneficial for our self-develop, but others may be harmful.
Extracurricular activities recommended, including learning other curricula beyond your mojor, playing basketball, playing the guitar, are helpful to our whole developments. Knowledge, makes your wiser. It will board your sight and make you more flexible so that you can find a job much more easily than others. Sports, makes you stronger. It will reduce your possibility to get sick, and also can provide you with a higher efficiency to study and better sleeping quality. Music, makes you more sensitive. Listening to some soothing songs will mitigate your emotional stress. As long as you can perceive the interior beauty of a song, you will be extremely happy.
However, some activities are of no good, even harmful. Staying idling wastes much time, which should have been spent on self-development. Playing too much computer games or chatting online to much will destroy your study.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a98dcefd-a86d-3329-8566-066e4d8a0c36> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many relaxation in life.And we could take lots of relaxation in our daily life.Most relaxation are good for us,such as ball game,swimming,running and so on,These relaxation can make us stronger and feel good.Other's relaxation like play the piano or chess also could relax us.
But not all the relaxation are good,some relaxation,as play the computer games especially the voilent games,can make us lost the way in Internet and the real life.We can learn a lot of stories about the harm of the computer games,much of them are about the students.
As the undergraduate,we have to jion in mach relaxations everyday.We could eat dinner ,go to camp with friends and we could play games with classmates in dormitory.But we should have a wise brand,we should know which relaxation is good for us and which isn't.Regretfully,some  undergraduate cann't deal with it well,they play the games day and night,finally,they get the D in the grade.
I think we must take more relaxation in the life,which can wideen our view,make us better.But we also must lost our way in relaxation.Every coin has tow sides,if we cann't do it good,we are the failure.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f3b82ccf-dd0a-345c-ad75-d215e91af72a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,with the society development, there are many kinds of relaxation in our life.some of them do good to us in our physical and mental healthy,such as playing sports,listening the music.Througt them,we can reduce our pressure and get more fun.But others of the relaxation would do harm to us,if we use it in a wrong way.Like playing games, it make us feel relax and happy.However,if we play it for a long time,not only are we tired,but also waste our time.As a reault,our grade become worse.
In my view,we are suppose to have relaxation to relax ourselves.Relaxation benefit us if we use it in positive way.but if we don"t have a clear plan,we would have a bad influence rather than adventure.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4102127f-c13f-319f-99b3-1ba5a38aeaff> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people will do some entertainments to relax.But,all entertainments is good to us? Of course not.
Parts of people will choose do some sports to relax,like go swimming,paly basketball,go skating and so on.It's good to us.Doing sports not only can make us relax,but make us more healthy.And some people will choose reading books or writing to relax.All of this is good.But some people choose smoking or drinking to relax.It's bad to us.Smoking is harm to our health,it will make people ill.And drinking is bad to us ,too.Many people drink too more and drive ,it  is very dangerous!And drinking will make people do something what they don't kown.
As a university student, I think we need entertainment to relax.But ,we must choose right way to relax.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 41de17ff-97e3-39a4-bcc6-1a0e00597f05> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,in our life,we have kinds of activity.As such football,basketball, play computer game and so on.
However, it's a common sense for us that everything have two sides,activity too.we know,
playing basketball and playing football is well for us,which can build our bady,make me strong ,in that way,if we do it cryze,we would get a bad in return. A majority of us would think that playing computer game is a very error thing, but I don't think so, I think play a few computer game is very good,because our study is so hard,we can play computer game to make us relize, but we should do that in order.Do you think so.
In our life, we would see kinds of activity,we should do that in order,then we will do everything in well.As a academician,we should do that better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b837819a-98e5-32e0-98c3-59f826541a1b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation is important in our daily life.It can make our life more entertaining and colorful.With the development of our world, there are more and more relaxations appear.
Sport is a kind of  popular relaxation among people.We ofen play basketball or football at our leisure.Sport can not only release pressure but also strengthen our body.It`s good for our physical and mental health.
But every coin has two sides,including relaxation.As we know,many students like to play computer games.If play too much time,it may bring about bad infections and even harmful to health.
As college students,we should distinguish whether a relaxation is advantageous or disadvantageous.Like sport,it`s good for us if we play it in a proper time at leisure.But like computer games,we`d better play less.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e6727d38-4153-3faa-b976-153bf8085784> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all sorts of relaxations in our life,such as doing phsical exercises,playing
video games,watching TV,watching a moive,etc.
As we know,relaxation is very important in our life because it can makes us relaxd after
we had a busy day for studying or business.However,some are advantage for us and others are not.The disadvantage relaxations are harmful even destroy our body and soul.For example,
drinking too much can makes us drunk and do some wrong thing.and it is terrible to drive after you are drunk.
As a undergraduate,I think we should be attention to our relaxation.Relaxation ought to improve us,instead of hurting.After several hours studying,playing a funny video game is a good choice to relax ourselves,but we must control the playing time.
Therefore,we should take full use of relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ff002120-1adb-3cff-87c5-2e7cc72c5f7c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of relaxation in our life. People have different choices when
they are choosing the way to relax, and different choices have different effect.
Many of the ways are health and availability, such as sports, music, outdoor activities.
Sports can give us a health body and make us feel relaxing at the same time. Music can
bring us the enjoyment in the aspect of mentality, which is important in our daily life.
Outdoor activities will take us outside to breathe fresh air and be close to nature.
While some kinds of relaxation is unhealthy , no matter in body or mentality, including
hit the pip, eating too much junk food, watching TV for a long time, and being addicted to
playing computer games. Even through these ways can give us a feeling of relaxation , the
effect is   temporarily and is bad to our health.
As a students of university, I think we should choose the right kinds of relaxation to
have a health and better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4434e7a8-81b9-3da2-a9be-cf9c9c06aced> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the fast development of the technology,there are many choices that we can make to
have our own relaxation in our Life.
Undoubtedly,some of them make great contributions to our both mental and physical health.
For example,we can choose to do some sports.It can not only keep us healthy,but also can do
a lot of help to build harmonious relationship wiht others.
However,development of technology also bring us mangy high-tech products that become
sometings that many young people can't get rid of.More and more young people are more willing
to play computer games at home rather than go outside to have fun with their friends which
make them become indifferent with each other.
As far as I'm concerned,we are supposed to be a energectic student as a undergraduate.
We should go outside to talk to others,join more activities and do more sports to keep our
body health.Playing the games or going to the pub seems to be only choice that university
students of the time can make.In fact,we have many other choices to make.Reading a good book
is one the good choice.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2c4eaadd-0bc1-3354-8bbf-ea0ce63dfa52> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many choices of relaxation in our daily life, especially in university.
You can do some shopping, chat with your friends, do some sports, watch a movie, play video games and so on. Different people have different hobbies, so do their choices of relaxation.
Of course, we can do everything we like to relax ourselves we, but I have to mention that not all kinds of the relaxations are good for us, and even some of them may be bad for us. I once hear about an old friend who get very ill because of addicting himself to video game.
As a collage student, I think do some sports may be the best choice of our relaxation. We spend many hours sitting in the classroom or doing our homeword in dormitory. It's very necessary for us to go out and have some sports, so that we can have a healty body to face our study everyday.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8e520bb5-b403-302f-be52-fda730e80b34> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are many entertainments like playing computer games, doing some sports, watching TV etc.
Relaxation benefit us a lot. Entertainment can relax ourselves. It can take us out off our busy life and therefore we can have a rest. After having a rest, we can devote ourselves to work or study more effectively. What`s more, doing some sports is helpful to our health.
But as the old saying goes, every coin has two sides. Relaxation also has some disadvantages. For example, if we play computer games day and night, it will do bad to our health and work, even influence our whole life. What`s worse, when we sing songs in a bar, we may meet some bad gays, and having some drug innocently.
As a college student, we should have some relaxation in a proper way. In our daily life, relaxation is necessary for us. We should can have entertainment for less than 3 hour everyday on average. Chooseing good relaxation will benefit us a lot and make our life more colourful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1bf4be91-a53b-3968-b72d-1776235cf48c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,we need eat,drink and breathe in normal living,but we also need relax at the same time,like playing basketball or table tennis,swimming in summer,playing chese and so on.
If people play some sorts of ball or swim as relaxation,they could get health,and if people relax by playing chese ,they will get more and more smart.But with the development of  the society,much more kinds of ways to relax appear which are bad for people's health ahd safety,like smoking ,playing computer games and more.
We need relax,but we only need relax by a heath and safe way.We could listen music ,play ball,read article or play games for a little time,I think we can get real relaxation by these.And we should not smoking ,read book or movie which is unhealthy or do something dangerous.There are  so many ways to relax,and wo must choose one or some which is good for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 01b4c42a-c7c9-3d59-90c4-ba3a637b1488> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various entertainment activities in our life. For example, we can go out of our room and do some exercise or sport for relaxation. We can also stay at home watching TV or surfing the Internet to relax ourselves. If we feel lonely, we can pay a visit to our friends and have a wonderful time together.
However, these activities are not all beneficial. Some of them are not suitable for us and some others may be a hazard to our health. It is not good to spend too many hours in front of a computer, which will not only hurt your body but also weaken your eyesight. What's worse, you may get addicted to the Internet and lose heart in the real world.
As a university student, I think we should make a good balance between work and relaxation. We can not live without entertainment, but if we just have fun all the time, life will become boring and meaningless. Only with hard work, can we achieve our goals and feel satisfied. After a good relaxaion, we refresh ourselves and go on to the next fight.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2216c2be-3bda-3372-83f4-678cdc07c607> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Varieties of ways to relax and have fun make up a wonderful part of our life. Some people enjoy doing kinds of sports while some are fancy hanging out with friends for movies or shopping. When talking into the ways to relax, obviously, part of them do good and other parts do harm.
Taking me as an example, I enjoy playing basketball, listening to music, and watching movies in my extra-curricular life. Of course, I sometimes hang out to the KTV with my friends, too. Thinking about it calmly, I could say that my relaxation does me good a lot. Playing basketball makes me strong and energetic, music and movies enable me to think quietly and learn more, and karaokay helps me release pressure.
But according to my observation, many of us students choose to play sorts of computer games or video games to, so-called, relax themself. In fact, they are just kind of addicted to them. Sacrificing time playing these games undoubtedly means nothing but buring oneself into endless struggling. These ways are that we should give up away.
As college students, we must have built up our own unique methods of relaxation. But it is important to build a healthy and optimistic one to help increase our abilities in some way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID dcfdc5c2-cf02-386c-bb1f-c3a41c5b4a0a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
A famous saying goes "All work and no play makes Jack a dull
boy."That indecates entertainment plays an important part in our
life.However,whether the activity of joy benifits us is beyond
discuss.
Some of the entertainment can really help us a lot.Such as
watching movies,reading,playing sports,etc.Those entertainment
can make us really learn something or keep our body strong.And
sometimes even gives us inspiration with our study or work .
While some others are not fit for us or even ruin our life.Such
as drinking,smoking,druging,ect.Those activities do not only take
our healthy, but also hurt people around us.Every year Smoking ,
drinking ,and druging take thousands of millions of lifes  directly or
indirectly.What's more ,drinking and druging even take our life.
As a college student , we  have to chose those benificial
entertainment and refuse the others.The time and condition of joy
should be considered as well as the ways of entertaining.The
better choice we make, the more colorful our life will be.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 06c75765-7f48-3996-af35-d56ba5756f07> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more kinds of ways to relax ourselves,for instance,travelling,doing sports,listening to  music etc.The amount of ways will become rather more in the future.
In some degree,relaxation can not only rich our character,but also strengthen our body.However,not every kind of  relaxation can always benefit us.In spite of good ways to relax ,there are still some ways that we should take control of ,otherwise they may do harm to us such as computer games .If we spend too much time playing computer games  ,it will hurt our eyes,take up our sleeping time,and also make us pay no attention on study.Some harmful ways of relaxation may not only damege our body but also make our study bad.
As a college student ,I think it is benefitial for us to relax in healthy ways.Our
important task is learning and enriches our kownledge.If we choose a good way to relax ourselves ,we can live a happier life .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 59fe2b11-a4bc-3f29-96a1-55b5fbaddd4d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainment activities in our life.In spare time,we can listen to songs,play sports,and play computer games.These
activities include many areas in our life.
We do these activities to relax us in the much time.Some of them can give us benefit.For example,watching TV can broad us sight,making us know
sone knowledge which can't be found in the textbooks.Besides,playing sports not only can relax us,but also exercise our body to make it more healthy.
But everything has oposition,entertainment activities are no diofferent.Some of them would carry bad effects to us.Playing computer games is the example.
If we don't play computer games too long,it's not ploblem.But some people are attractive by computer games,even not going to school to play games.That's
too bad.Playing too much time would affect our health.To protect us,we need to do entertainment activities problaly.
As a university student,I think we need to treat entertainment activities carefully.In my word,we must divide our time into study time and spare time.
In the spare time,we can do some benifical activities to relax us,not playing computer games too long.If we do this,we can do entertainment activities more
happily.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fc02edff-f9a2-32da-811f-1887d016a674> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are a lot of activities,such as playing basketball,volleyball,table tennis,running and so on.All kinds of activities bring me many advantages.Many old people keep a healthy body though doing sport.And some students get tall and strong by playing basketball and other activities.Above all,doing more sport not only can make us keep health and strong,but aslo can give us more life funny.
However,every coin has two sides.That also has many disadvantages.For liking playing basketball,some students spend all space time in it.As a result,they often don't do homework and finally don't pass the exam.What is more,some sport fans care about their favorite team lose or win too much,which sometimes makes some conflict and even takes their own life.That kinds of behaviours bring much bad infludence for the society.
As far as I am concerned,even though avtivities has so many disadvantages,we don't think not to do sports from now on.In fact,if we can balance times of doing sport and that of work and study,we can be good for them.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 750ef5b7-0711-31df-94b7-7767cff45036> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
living in a world full of competition,we always get a lot of pressuse from our study,job and social life.In order to reduce our sense of pressure and relax ourselves ,we are willing to partcipate in all kinds of relaxations.For example,some people like to do some exciting sports such as playing basketball and football,while others intend to do some gentle entertainments like dancing and singing.
However,every coin have two sides.Not all types of relaxations are benificial to us.Some unpropriate relaxations can do harm to us physically or mentelly.For example,doing some sports can not only relax ourselves effectively,but also contribute to our health.But if you choose to drink a lot as a way of relaxation,it can only do harm to your body.
As a student in university,I think that it's important for us to choose the right way to relax ourselves.I support to do some sports or sing and dance with your good friends,which can do good to your health and deepen your friendship with your friends.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 37eee2c4-5fbe-3db9-81d4-9255b61ef386> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are so many kinds of relaxation in our life. Some are good to us, but another not.
In one aspect, relaxation has positive effect. In our daily life, no matter where we are, more or less, we have to face pressure. Undoubtfully, pressure makes us depressed, one who always under heavy stress will certainly spiritual problems. So that’s why relaxation is needed. Relaxation makes us relief, we do not have to consider the difficulties of study or work. When we enjoy in relaxation, we are enjoying in our own world.
But just like the old saying that sword has two sides, relaxation also has negative effect. When we wallowed in relaxation too much, we lost ourselves, we forget who we are and what we should do.
In sum, as a college student,relax provisory is aim to work more effective. We need to relax in a right way, at the right time and not lose ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0b23ebd7-d35a-3c80-a21d-27798199ca7d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there's many things we can do to relax ourselves.We can do some exercise,play games,watch books,and so on.Whatever we like,we can find what we like to do when we are in pressure.
But,have to know,things all have double facese.Some relaxation activities have good effect,but some of it will probably do harm to us.Of course,on the one hand,if we like sports,we can play basketball,football,or jogging for relaxation.These will not only keep pressure away from us but also make us strong.On the other hand,some like to smoke or play computer game for a long time.There are too bad if we still choose these ways.First,we all know that smoking will seriously do bad on our body.It'll let us into terrible condition gradually.The second,play games.I have to say that play some computer game for some time for relaxation is not bad.But if we always play it,we'll become dispirited in life.Games always provide us with a world we want to live.Once get into this world,we'll find hard to go away.
As for a university student,I know that we are still busy like the time we are in high school if we want to achieve our dreams.So we must find something we like to do when we  are in heavy pressure or when we are tired.But these are the second things we have to do,we can't take them as the first in our life.And we have to choose the right ways to relax ourselves.As for me,I always play basketball,read some books and play guitar when I'm tired in work or in the weekend.You must know what you like,so that you can find things you will stick to it.Habbit,is something that acompany us for our life time.Also ,it acompany us in our relaxation time.
At the end,I want to say,keep your eyes open to find the things you like in this world and don't be lost in your road.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c98e9b4f-c32a-33b7-9582-5b5eaf936ced> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are a lot of entertainment we can enjoy.For example,we often
enjoy fishing,basketball,card games and so on.However,not every one is not good for us,
just like gambling,drugs...
AS a student in university ,I really hate gamling ,computer games and other bad fun.
Why?It`s because that as long as one was addicted to them ,the one would be ruined.He
would lose interests and power in other things in life,and his mind was all focus on them.
Such life is no meaning at all.What`s more ,people around him would be influenced greatly.
We all know gambling can ruin a family.
In a word,what should we do is stop those entertainments that can destroy one`s beatiful
life.And in other hand,we are spposed to take part in healthy activities.We can traveling,
play balls,fishing and so on.Let`s enjoy our life ,let`s enjoy happiness,let`s keep far away
bad entertainments...

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID af157df2-af95-304e-8219-abc2492a0ec5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,we have many different kinds of activities of entertainment.Such of many ball games,watching videos,lisening music or watching movies.
Although there are many activities for us to relax ourselves,we may find out what is good for us or what is bad for us.Today,must of our student spend lots of time in their study.So they have notime for entertainment.But if they don't relax themselves,they may be in bad health.from that we know,atitivities for relaxing is important in our life.But there still be some bad relaxation in life.Such as wacthing video which there are too many violent in it.It is no good during our growth and also wasting time.And playing too much computer games also destroy our health.
As a university student,I think we should learn how to relax ourselves.We should know what we need.Although some relaxations are very attractive for us,we should not lose control.We have to do the rigth things to recharge our batteries.In my opinion,by relaxation,we should enjoy our life,not destroy it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID dbb763a5-203a-3d04-937a-522dec1b2125> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
The saying says:"The world is beautiful."
Yes ,in our life,many things are very interesting.we can play all kinds of amusements,like basketball,running,swimming,games and so on.Of course,there are some dangerous amusements like skiping.Usually,we play ball,read books,run and swim,these are usually good for us.But some games are bad for our growings,like playing computer games lasting.
As a academician,we should have our own judgement.Usually,we can judge what is dangerous and what is good for ourselves.Like playing ball,running,swimming,these are good for our health,we should often take part in these activities.Playing computer games lasting is bad for our health,we shouldn't do it.Otherwise,we can't judge endanger for the some activities.Here,we should pay more attention to these activities.We can check the internet to get more information about them,and ask old people for advice.These ways can heighten our judgement.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 57fde12d-4238-3ca2-b2e0-484addc78063> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are all kinds of activities in our daily life.It's suitable for  us,especially when we work hard and feel tired.
Sports,as one type of relaxing activities,it's acceptable for everyone.By doing sports,not only can we relax ourselves and make us strong,but also have a good relationship with others.
However,not all the activities are so positive,and we know that nowadays many people,especially students lose themselves in computer games.We can't say computer games are  totally poisonous products,but they actually do harm for many people.No one can deny many students can't finish school due to computer games.
As to me,a student in university,I think relaxation is of great important.However studying is more important,I often retell myself that I have to work harder and harder.
So it's the same to other people who is working,working is more important.Don't lose yourself in relaxation,because life is more important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 68a062d7-1122-3d26-9a55-b6bcab910680> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,the morden life is so busy and everyone cannot work day and night.We feel
tired after work and most of us love to take some recreation in order to relax ourselves.
However,a lot of different kinds of recreation turn up with the rapid expansion of our society.
We all said that ceceration is necessary.A man without recreation that his life is boring.
BUt recreation also divide into good recreation and bad recreation.Sports is one of the most
popular recreation in the world.Actually,sports help people release pressure and keep heal-
thy,both bodies and minds.So lots of people take sports as  a part of their life.Besides,
listening to music,watching TV,reading books and so on.We can have fun in these recreation and
be benefit from them.However,what's the bad recreation?Parents think playing computer games,
reading novels and watching cartoon are bad recreation.Students waste time and even lose the-
irselves in these.Some teenagers may become more tired after these recreation.
As a college student,i think there is no true recreation.Only when we take good recreation too
much ,the bad recreation turn up.For example,teenagers like palying computer games.People can't
deny that playing computer games help us become happy in a short time.This is very important to
us students who feel tired and bored after study.BUt if we play too long,computer games do harm
to our life.So in my opinion,there is no bad receration but bad habits.We must keep a balance
between work andrecreation so that we can have a healthy life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 73897a7c-4d14-3b86-98d7-0ff67b18e7bb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,there are more and more relaxations occur in our life as the society developed.As we all known,every one would like to do these entertainments to relax himself.So it seems that relaxations are beneficial to us.
In fact, some relaxations would be good for us,the other would be wrong.And some of them would even harm us.In order to grow up healthily,we must learn to choose the beneficial relaxations for ourselves.
As a college student,I have some suggestions on this matter.We should know what relaxations are good for us.In my opinion,the sports exercises would be a good choice.As for me ,I always playing basketball to relax myself.Besides,you can choose baseball,football,tabletenine,ect.All of this would be good for you.Just try to do it.Moreover,playing games in a short time is also good for your relaxing sometimes.All in all ,every one would have his own way to relax himself.I just make some suggestions.But if you try it,it would be a little effective,I thinki.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bd113826-007a-36c3-850e-f42a3cf826b9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all kown, there are many kinds of entertainment activities in our life,especially
when we are in the college because we are relatively free.Some of these activities can make
us relaxed and free form annoyance,such as playing basketball,listening to the light music
and so on.But,in the other hand,not all activities are good for us.such as gambling,over drinking.
As a college student,I think it is most important to choice the activities that are suitable for us.firstly,we have many free time ,so how you spent you time depends your life.
playing computer games all the day can make you a useless person and you will be weary.When
you look back on you life,you must be regretful.but if you spend you free time doing some sport,at lease you will get a strong body.secondly,though we are adult we are still in the learning stage,to choice the significative relaxation activities will be of great help for our brain building.
in a word, relaxation in life should be choiced and controled correctly,so that we can be
truely relaxed in life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c17c2798-e139-3165-b7de-bfa244d6d02a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is kinds of relaxation in our life.we can see it on TV, some commercial activity .The content of the relaxation is allso
various,some of them are intellective,or gymnastic,others might just for fun.
some relaxation are mainningful,but some of them are unmainningful,the worst ,some of them can be bed.The intellective relaxation
are helpful,they can be good for man's brains,the education relaxation can tell people some knownladge,and some tips in the life.
Some of the relaxation are philistinism,their content are boring,even unhealthy.
In my oppinion,we should learn to make choice,we can choose to the relaxation that are useful us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bf9eb29e-d203-378d-a8ae-45109e9bef0a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many relaxation in our life.After all,our life is colorful.However, in these entertainment activities,some are beneficial,while others are not.
If we can do a lot of things which are healthy,active,and which can gain our confidence and relax ourselves in today's busy life,apparently,it will be beneficial to ourselves both mentally and physically.On the contrary,if we do things which are opposited,it will be harmful to our life,even to our country.
As a colledge student,I think Relaxation is very important to us.AS we have study everyday,We can do some activities to relax ourselves,such as do some sports,watch TV or surf on the Internet.It's not only can make ourselves relaxed and happy,but also can develop our habbit.What's more,when we do some relaxation with lots of people together,it can improve our ability of communication and makes friends with other people.On the other hand,we can't set your works and study aside just to play.Relaxation should be proper,We must contorl the time and can't indulge in it.Choose entertaiment activites is also important.It must be healthy.We must relax ourselves in right way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c91199af-474d-3f12-81ae-98ffc5cfa22b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are many kinds of relaxations,such as listen to the music,
play football,play computer games and so on.There is no doubt that relaxations can make
us relax,feel happy,and also enrich our life.However,some relaxations will do harm to us
in the meantime.
Take my good friend,Mark,as an example.He used to be a outstanding student who not only
do well in study,but also an optimistic person.He often help others as soon as they are in
troble,and everyone likes to make friends with him.But,after he is absorbed in computer
games,he seems to change another person.He seldom study and do his homework.Everyday he will
play games and doesn't go to sleep until midnight.In return,his grades are lower and lower.
Worse of all,he seldom get along with others so that he change into a oddity person.
I fell so sorry for him.If he does not relax him such overly,if he has good control in
himself,he will not attribute in games.
In briefly,I thought,relaxation is a necessity in our life,we can relax ourslves properly.
But,keep in mind that we shoule distiguish the advantages from disvantanges of the
relaxations.If we can do this,we will live a happy and enrichable life!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID eacd4b02-9a5f-31cf-945f-be0ed8cf80aa> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of relaxations in our life. But everything has two coins.Some of these relaxations are healthful while some are harmful for us. So as an undergraduate ,we need to judge how to relaxed ourselves properly .On the one hand,some relaxations,like singing ,dancing , are necessary,especially when we are tired.We are able to release ourslves and become energetic by this way.These activitives ,where we make lots of new friends,make the life in college to be wonderful and charming.But on the other hand,if we lost ourselves in some pressimistic activitives,it is not only do harm for our health,but also let us has low energe.So we should be make a distant from these harmful relaxation.
So try to take part in some healthful relaxations but not to lost in it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 54288485-7239-338b-a155-b6c73caf3e5b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a variety of kinds of amusements in lifes such as playing sports,playing computer games,playing cards and so on.
The healthy amusements can relax us bodies and heart.
When you are tired of day-and-night learning,maybe listening to some music can motivate you again.When you are nervous about the test which draws near and can't concentrate yourself,maybe you should play basketball or other sports and take a bath to clear all your bodies......
While the  inappropriate ones can lead to serious consequence.
If you are addicted to the computer games,you will want to play it all the time and can't
do other things.And the consequence is obviously,even your future is ruined by it.
In my opinion,no absolutely definition on healthy amusements.All the amusements which you are addicted to and lead to that you can't work better on your based work is unhealthy amusements.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8a95a4d1-44c3-33c9-b236-01ed9c028caf> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Amusements, which exist everywhere in our lives, appeal to us with their fascination of
fun and all kinds of type. While some amusements are beneficial to us, however, it is no doubt
that lots of amusements alarm us that we should take them for importance.
As a university student, in my opinion we are supposed to enjoy the good amusements and
stay away from the bads. Classes, homework, social clubs, projects, etc, which fill up our lifetime
and put us under great burden. Therefore, amusements are of great significance for us.
There are good and bad amusements. We could be released from the great stress , get fun and
be happy with the help of amusements. All these positive influence are beneficial to one's
physical and mental health. On the contrary, bad amusements may cause great damage on people.
For instance, amusements including eroticism, violence , desperation and other negative attitude
may drag a good people into deep desire for eroticism, violence or die.
In conclusion, good amusements do good to people, which we could enjoy them appropriately.
At the same time , it is advisiable for us to stay away from the bad amusements which may destroy
us very easily.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7bfaf5f6-75ca-3266-a18b-a873fe8ac529> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,our life is very abundant. We have many entertainments which like everything have benefits and drawbacks.Some entertainments is beneficial to our physical and paychological health,like sports...some entertainments is bad for us,if we do not care for ,it will bring hurt that we can not bear.Others is insignificance for our life.
Form where I'am stand, I like sports,example: basketball,tennis,running......In my opinion, not only can I enjoy what pleasure the sports bring,but alought I keep my health by sports.I think, if we have a good habit to choose what entertainments we should play,we will enjoy the activit bringing joy.What's more,by activits we will experience what interesting the world is .what's impoetant,it  models our character which makes our popular.I suggest that we should have a rignt habbit and we should choose our activites to abundant our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bf7bd605-6b09-3885-83f2-cbdc3081380c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life, there are a lot of entertainment for us to relax.People can wacth TV or
movie,listen to gentle music,dance and so on.Nowadays,in high pressure social,it is really
important for everyong to learn to relax themselves in order to keep mental health.Besides,
we can enjoy our life.Maybe going to a park ,hiking , differant from those above,are also
entertainment.
However,not all the entertainments are beneifical to people.Some entertainments are good
for relaxation. On the contrary,other activities are even bad for paople.Fox example,as we
all know,play computer games is a good way for people ,especially for student,to relax.
But many teenagers are addicted to computer games and leave alone their study.What's worse,
some people even try to brake the law in order to paly games.What a pity thing!
As far as I am concerned,we should join some activities to relax ourselves,but we should
find the entertainments that fit us.Everyont is uniqe in the world.So,which entertainment
is suitable ourselves is different!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 68b661d6-2694-3c0f-8d33-44a32f901c85> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Our life is filled with a variety of relaxation.Listening to music,drawing paintings, playing computer games,watching movies and TV plays,going to KTV with  friends,drinking alcohol,all of which can relax ourselves.
Do all kinds of relaxation keep us a optimistic attitude towards life? Of course not. Some relaxation does good to our health.For example,listening to music can help us relieve the pressure.Painting let us find more and more beauty in our life and keep away from passive mind.Watching movies and TV plays with our family or friends may keep them and us more closely and we are likely to learn something from what we have watched.However,not all relaxation is healthy.In fact,even some does harm. A lot of people lose themselves in computer games,which have a bad influence on their study as well as health. Alcohol may numb people at a while,but it really does harm to our physical health and mental health.
As a university student, I think we should attend more activities such as outdoor sport games and parties indoors with friends.In a word, if we join in some activities with many friends, we'll feel life is much more colorful and wonderful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ee81a472-c9ac-3869-b48d-71962aff5b64> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays there are many ways to relax ourselves.Among these , some are good ;
while others are bad.
For us college students,I do think we had better choose proper ways to relax ourselves.
unproper ways of relaxation may distract our mind from study,prevent us from forming
good habits and waste our money. Take some of my friends as example, they always
go to KTV on weekends ,drind and play until midnight,thus staggering home drunken.
Instead of playing late until midnight, I suggest that the best way for us to relax is
to do sports.Sports can not build us up and help us have fun .At the same time,it provides
us a good chance to get together with our best friends

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c6370f3e-4907-39d7-93ce-8a322a3441b6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of  the rising of the life’s quality , the entertainment activities gradually draw people’s attention .Taking part in the entertainment activities is a way to relax ourselves in life.
Nowadays more and more available entertainment activities appear .However, For various age bracket , which entertainment activity is suitable is different .Today old people doesn’t satisfy with some traditional activities ,such as playing chess ,talking about the comments of books .Both in the cities and in the village ,more and more people choose to dance and sing in the public square after dinner .At the same time ,the relaxing ways of young people are more elective .For example ,regular physical exercise is becoming more popular ,playing computer games is even hotter.Of course , playing cards and painting are still popular . Actually they are all good ways to relax ourslves in some extent.
In my mind , join entertainment activities is good .It can be healthy for our body. But we should take good care of ourselves in the activities . And we should take good advantage of our time . For example playing computer games has advantages and disadvantages.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f3385d79-d10c-3285-bf02-32c8c4f5c82c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a viriety of relaxation in our life. We can do many things in our life.When we are tired after work,we will be relaxed if we take part in some activities.So they will make us comfortable in our life. also,because of they,our life are becoming more and more rich and colorful.
Maybe we are very happy,but everything is not perfect.Some of they is also bad for us.Some people,especially the children,they don't know which is good or bad.For example,many people are infatuated with computer games.Of course,playing games sometime is good for us ,they can train our ability of thinking.
So we can't say one thing is good or bad certainly,it depend on how to use it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 83675815-e121-3c4f-b6bc-1232b41e8632> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the economy our life become better and better. So people begin to enjoy life.There are many relaxation in our life, such as playing computer games , doing sports , reading books …Too many enjoyments let us too choose , so we must do it carefully.
Different people like doing different activities but remembering some activities are bad for us.Now almost every academicians has a computer , but no every academicians use it in a right way .Many students just using it play games or chat on line. The value of computer just is a tool for fun.Playing card also is a terrible relaxation , but it seems that no one don’t like it especially majors.Good activities also exist . Doing a sport is one of the most popular , in my opinion. Sports are not only make you keep health , but also let you have a positivity mind . Moderation sports are helpful foe us . you need remember it.
As far as I’m consider a right activities will rise our ability in different way. Doing some useful activities is very nice.What's more the bad amusement can influence our life and  other things.Anyway we should do something proper to relax us and keep away from the relaxation that can hurt us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8371a355-fa4c-3f07-8046-cd27e3ab2269> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Life is filled with various excitements. But the excitement from relaxation is coloring our life. Entertaining activities provide us a good way to relax. However, not all the entertaining activities are beneficial to our own development. They will harm us if we could not handle it carefully. As a student in university, I believe that entertaining activities should not dominate our whole life. They can be extra rewards for our previous hard work and chances to refresh ourselves. Once we are absorbed in it, our study time will be taken up and we will fall behind with others. In a sentence, study hard, play hard and study harder. With this kind of attitude, we can handle our life perfectly.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0dd7a0a5-dde6-320d-af9d-229acd229a8f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are so many different entertainment in our daily life that we can enjoy our free time better.But just as every coin has two sides,entertainment can  be not only good to us but also bad to us.For example,on the one hand, someone may use some time to take exercise as there amusement.They do proper sport to keep healthy .Without doubt ,this is one of the most positive entertainment for most people.On the other hand,some people especially teenagers play computer games as there free time activities and they put so much attention on it.Even they fall in love with it and forget there work or study.
As a fresh man,I believe we should organize our free time by aproper way. We can take many activeties of corporation ,do exercise,paly computer games and so on.But we should do this on a proper time and should not forget our work .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3cb5c92e-475f-33ca-9d6d-40bd4751e526> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We now in a period which science and technology have developed quickly,so we have more things for
relax than before.As we all know that computers,for instance,are becoming one part of families all
over the world.Some of relaxations considerably change our daily lives.Some people relax themself,but
others ponder that quantities of morden relaxation will do harm to our lifestyle.
As far as I am concern,we shuold consider relaxation from two parts.For one thing,with the inventions
like TV,computers and theme parks and so on,people will spend their weekends in a more happy and plsasent
way than before.They may make friends from internet,watch funny television program,and have fun with their
family from theme park.For another,things will become convenient when we must go to movie center to see a
film.Now we can see the film whatever you like and whatever you are from you mobile phone.We will enjoy the
fun of shopping from the internet instead of going to the big and crowded shoppping mail.So we may get more
relax from the morden relaxation.
But there are also problems.On the one hand,children will suffer from computer games when they can't do themeselves.
They may be cost a lot of time on games,not on studing.On the other hand,playing ball games such as basketball may
be hurt by others if they play for a long time.So we can't relax more when have time.
All in all,relaxation helps us forget our study time and unpleasent things.But everthing has their two parts,we must
relax in a proper way,so we can have a happy and relaxing life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d712d22e-198f-3583-8918-edeaea3b89e4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,there are various relaxation in life.A large number of people take part in different activities to relax themselves.For example,we play football,listen to music,sing songs,dance and so on to ease the pression.
No one can deny the fact that entertainment have to sides.On the one hand,the entertainment can relax ourselves,and we can be absorbed in the happiness to forget unhappy things.On the other hand,too much entertainment is bad for our healthy.Becase you may be absorbed in the happiness so deeply that you take no notice about you study or work.Even worse,you may be hurt as some entertainment is too dangerous.
In my opinion,we should have a right way to relax ourselves.We should admit the fact that everyone need relaxation in life.while we are upset in some things,it can take ourselves ease.What's more,it can make our life more colorful.However,we should be careful when we are enjoying our relaxation,it is important for us to stop our relaxtion to continue  our study or work in time.Then,we can enjoy a more happy life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 422c65e3-2701-3c28-a370-9fe01b2e7fb2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life, we have a lot of ways that to relaxation. so, there are many minds to care
about that.
In my opinion, we should have a good habit to relax. for example, i like reading, this
is my favourite hobby. it is so great that we are reading, firstly, reading bridge the gap
betteen my dream and my goal. it always tells me the best way to do something. it gives me
strenth when i am in diffculties. it leads me down the road to selfconfidence when i am at a loss. in a word, it brings me the way to success.
in addition, there are many bad ways to relax.this is so bad, i think we shouldn't do
anything to detriment us, like drug taking. now, we can see how poweful a healthy way to
relax is. so we should shape a good hobby to relax.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5fa1f1e5-6e61-3a39-850e-74ca872ad981> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of economy,our life has been improved greatly.And of course,there are so many kinds of relaxation in our life nowadays and different people like different kinds of entertainment activities.
However,there are so many kinds of entertainment that some of us cannot indentify them correctly.As we know,some kinds of entertainment is benefit for us and they can really relax us from our busy daily life on one hand.But on the other hand,some of the entertainment is bad for us,and they may affect us on both our body and mentality seriously.
As a college student, I think we should take part in some healthy entertainment activity rather than those harmful to us.Healthy entertainment can relax us and bring energy to us.However,unhealty entertainment does great harm to us,not only on our study but also on our body and mentality.Take some girls for a example.Nowadays many girls go to the bar with some boys or strange men to dance and sing,and they call it "entertainment".But from my point of view,this behavior is very dangerous to those girls.And they may suffer a lot from this kind of entertainment.
In a word,we need entertainment to make us more efficient on our study and work.But we should avoid unhealthy entertainment for the great harm from them.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9efdc1e9-07d6-3fd4-b82c-3263ba4b9787> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is many relaxation in our life,which can play in land or in water even in sky. Everone
has his own relaxation due to their own character and enviroment.
Not all the relaxation are benefit to humanbeing,some of them are not proper for kinds of
people even will bring harm to them.such as joging is good for all,also the running walking
after dinner.But I can list a list about the relaxation which can give illess people harm-
swimming,surfing,football,basketball and so on.
To tell yuo the benifit more detail,I tell you some example.Running can strengthen your
breath system,build your body.It can avoid you from virus atack,flesh your brain and let
you feel more comfertable.
And then is the harm relaxation take.Basketball are not fit to the person who has brain
illess or heart illess.
As for me,I'm happy to take from my father.I like many sport to rslax myself.They make me
strong,bring me bilife about the life,bornden my friendship thanks to we have common things
to share.So I think we should have boernden relaxation which are fit to us for their so
many benefit.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f2b0515d-a554-3041-b5e3-ba944ad04d13> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,there are a lot of ways to entertain yourself,such as playing basketball,playing the
piano,doing some extreme sports and so on.In some case,These entertainments are benefit to us.
However,the way you choose to entertain yourself will affect your life,which means it may bring
you good effects or bad effects.As you can see,There are a plenty of people take drug to en-
tertain themselves.There is no doubt that drug can make them very happy in a short time,but
if they take drug again and again,they will become unhealthy and lead to the road of dead.
In a word,we should carefully choose the way we entertain yourself because not only the good
ones but also bad ones existing in our mordern society.
From the aspects of a university's student,I want to add that it is good for us to have
a few hobbies,but the more hobbies we have,the more burdens we will take.From my former
personal experience,if I have a lot of entertainment such as playing basketball,playing guitar,
hold an activity,I must spare a lot of times to keep my hobbies instead of learning.It is
not good for a student. In a word,the importance of choose the right way to entertain your-
self and keep the way in a low quantities is in the same level.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 418bd9e6-8b57-3836-8471-f34144fc0530> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to us ,there are various amusement activities in our daily life ,such as playing basketball,
playing computer games ,watching movies and so on.There is no doubt that some of them can help us to reduce our pressure in life and give us a happy life.
But we shuold be aware of that some of them can also do harm to us if we can't handle them properly .For example,most of boys like playing computer games very much and they often lose control which cause them to fail the exam.
As a college student ,I think it is important for us to know how to relax ourselves in a proper way.In my opinion ,doing some exercise is one of my favorite way to reduce my pressure ,such as running ,playing badminton and so on.
Another way is to go to the KTV and you can sing aloud if you are under great pressure .And I often listen to music which can also help me to live a happy life and relax myself .
Totally speaking ,it is necessary for us to find some amusement activities to relax ourselves .But we should know what activities are good for us and what are not .And we should make proper use of these amusement activities so that we can live a ease life .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5086864b-7d97-3569-a302-7db1a6bffbd3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,with the development of the technology there many entertainment concourses in modern society.They play an important role in our daily life and make our life more colourful and beautiful.
In my opinion,entertainment is a double-edged sword.On the one hand ,Some entertainments benefit us a lot.We can relax ourselves by playing sports with our friends in oder to release our stress.In addition,listening to the music can make us feel happy and foget the pressure in the life temporarily.Also,going to the cimena and enjoy the films can make our life more colourful.
On the other hand,some entertainments has a bad influence on our life.Playing computer games is very popular among the college students.And a great deal of students are addicted in the computer games,which has a bad impact in their study and health.And some students go to the bar to drink alcohol and dance with the stangers ,which may damage their bodies and health.
As a college student,I do believe that we should choose entertainments carefully.In order
to make our college life more meaningful,we must choose the entertainments that is benefit us and keep away from the bad entertainments.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 667e98a7-aeb9-377d-b547-95171d783932> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As our society developing, there are more and more relaxations in our lives. However, while some of them can actually bring happiness to us as well as enrich our daily lives, some of them may have a negative effect on us, not only physically, but mentally. For instance, the online games. There is no doubt that plenty of university students play online games, such as WOW. Owing to the loose study atmosphere in some universities, students can accomplish their daily homework in such an easy way that they think that there is no need to go on their review jobs. So they have lots of time to spend on their “interesting games”, without noticing that they are getting into real troubles. From my point of view, our lives do need some relaxations, but we should vitally need to improve our possessiveness, in other words, our self-control abilities. For example, at the weekends, play the games with our friends for a short time will be innocuity. But what we should hold is the view that when we are still students, our major work is undoubtedly study. In this way, relaxations will actually do good to our happy lives.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 40eea337-525b-371b-869d-cfbf3f949f75> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are a lot of entertainment for us to relax ourselves,
such as dancing and singing,playing cards and doing sports like basketball,football,
shopping,going hiking,playing computer games.
But everying has advantages and disadvantages doube properties, the activities is no exceotion.As we all know,singing and dancing can relax our physics as well as our mind,from that wa can forget the things which make our life upset and just fell ourselves.In addition,doing spors is good for our heathy and build up our body-shape.In the meanwhile,we will believe in ourselves and will be full of enthusiasm in all the things of life.However,it is not so good to play computer games or play cards for fun because it's easy to be addicted to them.Playing computer can always make the people don't focus on the study or work but just on games.Even worse,playing the games day and night will be hamful for the heathy.
As a college student,I propose that one should be wise to separate goat from the sheep when deciding how to recreat and refresh oneself.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9de06b87-498d-3685-9aa5-77a7f11b5a5c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of technology,there are more and more amusements for us to relax.For example,we can play various computer games on the computer,watch the programe we like on TV,go to cinema to watch a film,go to do sports ans so on.It is really that we have so many choice of amusements nowadays.
However,not all the amusements are good for us.For example ,nowadays,many teenagers are addicted into computer games witch makes a bad influence to their study or their daily life.
As far as I am concerned,as a undergraduate,we should choose more healthy and beneficial amusements for us to relax,such as reading more healthy books and doing sports,and try our best to reduce the time on the amusements witch are not so good for us like comptuer games.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f94fedd8-2481-3a52-9f46-9d395bbb007e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxing in life
People living for a comfortable life so that relaxing is a great way to relize it.There are
many kinds of activities in our life.
Sometimes singing can be the easier way to relax ourselves. I always sing when I'm washing .
It is said that the best way to relax is the singing when you are washing.Besides sports not only
good for our weak body is also a way to relax.like basketball , footbal, tennis ,pingpang ,and so
on. You can see different mans use different ways to relax in our daily life.
Although plenty of activities is do a great job for psychology and phsical body.It can reduse
our negative mood and make us feel better even happy for us. But some of them is bad for us. As
we known, smoking in the public place makes people who absorb the smoke get hurt in it.
First I think we should keep our safe when we have activities. And second we should choose a
healthy way to relax us just like playing cheese. Third, when we have activity we can't disturb
others even hurt their life. Have a better lifestyle heve a better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 751bf3bb-3c16-3230-a315-6c6d57957d09> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many relaxations in our life,such as sporting,triving and so on.They make our life different
and colorful so that we can enjoy life and work more hard.That can be said,relaxation of difference enrich our spare time.
In fact,some activities are good for us,we can get so much happiness by doing them.However,when we do some activities that may be harmful for us,
we sometimes are hurted by doing them,even some activities can take our life away.It is misable and sadness.
as a student of a university,in my opinion,though doing activities is nesssary to our life,we should be sure of the safety of the place where we do exercise. the life is more treasure than anything .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9d0e6f41-e445-3a50-8bdf-bd1bd47ae97d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,our life is getting better and better.We no longer worried about hunger.But on the other hand,we are becoming more and more stressful.So,being in different kinds of entertainments is a good way to relax.
But the truth is,not all entertainments suits us.Some of them have no good for our health or the society,such as gambling and druging.Otherwise,sporting is a good idea.You can have a long run,play basketball,or just chat with friends face to face or on the Internet. Choosing a right entertainment will bring you truthful happy or more pain after relax if you choose a wrong one.
As a modern university student,we should be smart in choosing what to do.Because of the stress of study,we are eager in finding ways to relax.Also,we should know what is right. We have already been studying for twelve years,and learnt the short way of things such as smoking and fighting.I think we can choose a healthy way to relax ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2d486f08-8b4e-34d4-b817-64c90e23fb99> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Life in university can be very colorful and abundance. Besides our daily routine study, we can also enjoy ourselves in many kinds of relaxation.
The most popular relaxation in university might be play computer, it's so common that after we finish our class, back to department .we just open our computer ,watch film, play games, or just surfing the internet. And play sports like play basketball or soccer is another good choise to relax. It can make ourselves out of pressure and it's good for our health .What's more there are all kinds of association for you to take part in, you can easily find your interest there, and it's a good chance for you to make new friends.
Relaxation is necessary and important for students, no one can work forever without any relax. Relax can adjust our mental position, we can improve our study by arrange our time reasonable. But time can't be taken to much to relax, you might lose yourself in games or sports activities. It’s really bad to our study.
So as a college student, I think we should take time to relax, but we also should control the time we relax. Remember do but not too much.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7ac68bba-cbb6-3a5e-bf33-b553d6a95e7b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the cadence becoming faster and faster on life and work,people are facing great
stress and feeling anxiety.Therefore,people may find different kind of relaxtions to relax
themselves.
There is no doubt that some activities are beneficial to our health and really can
make people feel happy!For example:doing sports,going hiking,traveling,singing and so on.
But There are always two sides to everything and relaxtions are including.Some people may
drink drunk even they know it will do harm to their health after they had broken up with
their lover or facing difficulties on work.Some may find something that they think it is
exciting to do,such as:destroy the public facilities,hit the pipe and so on.
As a college student,in my opinion,I think we should find the healthy way to relax.
Then ,it must fits me.Fits me is the best. What's more ,if it is our hobby,it must be
better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7a61e1a5-f2a7-398b-86e3-bd722cda2071> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are plenty of entainment activitises,which people take part in to enjoy themselves,relax or just to killed the time.However,some entainment can free you from the presure of study and work,some just exhaust you even some can do harm to you before you realize it.
When you have been working all days,to do some entaiment activity is a good suggestion to relax yourself.But the problem lies in which activity you choose.You can walk around,listen to some music,do some sports.That is good to yourself as well as your work next day.But those activities such as taking drugs,driving as fast as possible,got drunk and so on are really not a wise way to relax.I see it is exciting as well as cool,you may think.But the question is which situation would those crazy entaiment lead to.Does it worth that take the risk costing all life to pay for one crazy entaiment?And after you are so high,wouldn't you feel down when you come back to work or study?
For me,relaxtion means a break after fight.I don't need firm entainment just to excite myself,for the fight is exciting enough to tremble me nerves.I need to be calm,that is all.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1311f062-7270-3b68-8ce7-3818e3c1f829> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development in many areas, life becomes more stressful. And at the same time, many ways have been developed to relax people. But different ways have different effect,good or bad.
Many people like to go to pub when they feel bored or tired.They may drink a lot to let them forget the terrible feelings. But it is nothing helpful. This is a wrong way to relax oneself. It is not only waste of money and time, but also bad for his health. In fect, in our life, there are many great ways to release ourselves and decrease the stress. For example, you can choose a outdoor sport with your friends or children, like runing or playing basketball. You can also go to a park alone to have a quiet and comfortable afternoon.
As a college student, I feel stressful sometimes, before exam of make a mistake. I always choose to watch one of my favorite movies to relax myself. And it really is a good way for me. Relaxtion is a very important part in our life. So we should try a correct and proper way to get what effect we really want.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cc521ed2-8ea3-30a5-98d5-432adea2e162> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Our daily lives are fulfilled by kinds of relaxation activities. Relaxation, as the word spelt, it refers to the activities that can make people feel relax. Party, go camping, hanging out with friends for a barbecue or just surfing the Internet can all be included in relaxation.
Most of these activities are beneficial. Reading books which you are addicted to can develop one’s interests and open one’s mind as well. Some diy lego robots can train your ability in machine experiments. However, some of the other can be inappropriate even harmful. Watching TV is such a case that we are not strange with. Some teenagers are so addicted to TV or Internet and waste so many time on the virtual world, as a result of it, their study falling down and they are weak in communication in the real society.
As a member of undergraduates, I also have such experiences in my life. Some undergraduates feel stressful because of the serious competitions in working and studying and they turn to drinking. This lifestyle ruined their health both their future. In my point view, if we want to do some thing for relaxation ,we must have our ration. Just do something that can make your life better such as music, books or climbing. We should kept a healthy lifestyle besides relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID aacb1df2-2631-33fe-b56d-19232d5abf87> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various activities for relaxation in our lives.After work or school,we're tired and need a break.Someone like to do some sport which can
both keep you fit and happy.Someone like to watch TV or surf the internet.
And someone may play poker and majong...
As a saying goes,"Every coin has two sides".Thougt some amusement activities are good to us.There also exist some activities which may do bad to us even bring worse
effects. In China,many people are fond of joining so-called "LiuHeCai".Those who dream to obtain lots of money constantly buy it and hope to have a prize.As we can see,it's nearly impossible to earn the price.But so many people are crazy about it anf even use out all there money which broke many families.And many students are addicted to the computer games.They play games not for relaxation.They spent too much time and attention to it and less too study.
As a university student,I hold the view that we should take activities for relaxation but we are supposed to accept all.The purpose of these activities is to
let us get rid of tireness and be more healthy,However,if we join the bet or other
unhealthy activities,we may be more nervous.Even they will have an impact on our daily work and life.Therefore,tell if the activities are good to us and then consider if you should join them. And don't lose yourself in them.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 765aa9ae-463d-3121-9da8-c544dc940b88> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern world,people have become busier and busier that they have little time to enjoy the relaxation in their daily life.They may spend all their time to work so that they can earm more money to make their life better.But without relaxation,their life are filled with stress instead of happiness!
As we can see,there are many relaxation in our life and it will have more as the economy developed. It means that we can choose any relaxations as our wish.We can enjoy the wonderful music or film,play the exciting games,take part in any out-door activities. We can choose the fitness amusement to relax ourselves.
Although there are many relaxation in our life,it doesn't means that every amusement is good to us. As the saying goes,every coin has two sides.There are many activities that can help us relax ourselves so that we be more energetic toward our work.However,there are many activities that they do harm to us.For example,drinking wine to relax oneself is really foolish.When one has been drunk,he would threat others' life.
As a university student,we should keep the balance between study and relax.We have many relaxation in our school life.However,to be aditied in relaxation will do harm to us.We should keep in mind that study is our job and relax can make us study better!So choose the fitness relaxation to enjoy your life and study hard.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c0478c44-7ef5-3a6a-9e0e-1acdf1b592e0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we enter the college, we have much more free time than before. So we may spend these free time on many activities . Indeed , life can not lack of relaxtion . But the point is we should choose proper relaxation style. Otherwise the result may be terrible .
As we know , there are all kinds of attractive activities among our school. And I consider
that most of them are optimistic and healthy . Such as all kinds of sports , debation , camp and so on . All I mentioned above not just do good to our health , which will make us work or study more effective , but also broaden our horizon and develop our skills . There is no doubt that everyone should take part in more activities like these .
On the other hand , some students choose anohter styles . After class , what they do first is sitting before the computer and spend the whole night playing games . And on the ohter day , they sleep at class . This situation exists around us . I am totally against this . I do not mean we can not paly the games . But just imagine , if you spend so much time on it , when do you finish your homework , when do you have lunch , when do you take part in other activities . As a college student , wo should go outside more to know more people and more new things . All these can make us easier adapt the society . So if you have this bad habit ,give it up.or you will regret what you do in the future .
I think we should control our time and spend it on the things which benefit us . Only in this way can we have a bright future.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f18a7a4b-2649-34dc-874b-cdaba500ef60> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are different kind of relaxation in life.Some people may do some sports.Some
people may listen to music.And also some people may play computer games. But it is worth
mention that different ways to relax makes different effects.Some healthy entertainnment
like football can not only relax you but also do help to your health.Other entertainment
like playing computer games may make you even more tired.So it is important to chose a
ture way to relax youself.
In my opinion,being a college student,we should focus on improve ourselves in relaxation.
We should learn something new for ourselves in our entertainment.It is suggested that we
could read some books or do some sports.Learning a new technology is also a good choice.
You can play joys on your friends by ps something on their photos.You can also make a web
for your class if you are interested in it.In a word,relaxation is something that relax
you,entertain you,but not something make you tired.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cbb589da-84ed-313a-9d83-579a279957ee> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We relax ourselves by various ways,such as playing computer games,listening and singing songs,watching movies,reading articals,doing excises and so on.
Some of them benefit us.Sport may be good to our body;Book may broadern our horizon;music
can comfort our feeling.Some of them ,however,do some harm to us.Losing ourselves in games ,we could hardly study and think,even lose ourselves.Watching unfitting movie,we may become unheathy.
We should have some problem.Which activities is harmful as you say?How could we prevent them ?
You may have see carefully that I use the words "may be" when I mentioned the beneficial activities,and use some limited words when mentioned the harmful activities!My opinion is just what you think now.If we have too more fun,it damages.If we couldn't use it properly ,them we hurt.Therefor,we'd better owe a strong will and form a good habit on entertainment and work.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7d2a3bed-48c6-305e-9753-318d7d8b737e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern society,there are so much relaxation around us.As economic soars ,the living level of human
has raised at an amazing speed. High speed of development propell us to rush around just like a roller coaster.
We are bolted with contenders and rivals so tightly that we pay little attention to self-relaxation.
Each of us are working and studying under enormous stress.To work in an efficient way,we need to relax ourselves
and find fun in our stressful life.
Considering the initiative purpose of relaxation in life,I think the relaxation plays an important and helpful
role in our lives.It is just the entertainment function that literally push human to live in a more comfortable way.
As the old saying goes,all job and no play make Jack a doll boy.If one keeps on working or studying all day long,
the masterpieces he works on just become a cringeworthy thing to him.No more interests ,no passion ,no novation
will be devoted to the masterpieces.At this point ,relaxation can refresh the person's spirit,and his working enthusiasm
can be enriched just like renaissance.
However,some relaxation is really bad for us.If you indulge in playing computer games and watching yellow vedios,
it will give misleading to you,which is really bad for your development.
therefore,Ihold the opinion that we should take relaxation some time,and never indulge ourselvesin it.
201130581104

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c144d306-8155-339b-88c9-1f1a11273fa8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of activities in our life.Some of them are good for us.But there are also some bad activties and some even harmful to us.
The most activities in colloage we have are gym activities.Such as play basketball,play  football and run.These are very good for our health.Today's students really need to do some exercise because we use too much time in study but ignore the healthy balence.And we often get a civic activities.It's a good way to make our life colorful.It's sure that most of the activities is good for our life.But now,we often see some gym match became a fight because there is unfair.And some civic activities were not good for student which called not mainstream.
In my opinion.As a colloage student,we should make valueable activities.A good activity can rich our life but a garbage activity is a waste of life.The activity's aim is make our life colorful,but if it is in a right way will lost us.What ever we do should in a right way and keep fair.Especialy in civic,we should have a right outlook on life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f37fb123-17be-3d88-b13e-c197e52cb315> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the improvement of our living standard,we have all kinds of relaxations.Some of
them are deleterious,and some are beneficial.
Hardly does a man doubt that we may not resist the temptation of some relaxations and
it may couse serious problems.For instance,some students abandon their learning because
of games.It is a bad thing because we may spend a lot of time which we should use to
pursue some important things such as knowledge.
But sometimes,some relaxations help us alleviate our stress.It is good for our mental
health.Some relaxations can also broaden our horizon and teach us some knowledge.
From my personal perspective,everything has two sides.Only having right attitude of
relaxations can we enjoy some beneficial relaxations and have a better life.
We do,in fact,have a long way to do to reach our goal,but enhance the awareness of
treating relaxations rightly is very important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e8dc57aa-a5d4-3951-a619-82678e1ce663> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Sometimes,the life seems boring if we just work and study.So, we need something intresting to change it.
As we all know,there are a lot of activates in our life.More and more entertainments come up with the development
of the technology.Some of them areminded,some are unseemly,and even some fo them are baleful.
For example,playing sports are minded but playing too much computer games are unseemly and baleful.
Porofitable activates will bring us a good psychology so we can life and work better.
But, in other ways,the badful amusement like playing computer games will let us sink into enjoying the violence of the
games.
As a university student,a aptitude kind of amusements has a great seems to us.It can affect our attitude to life ,
work and study.A aptitude amusement can take us a great attitude and ptomote our study.But, in other way,a bad kind
amusement will give us the worst affect and abominate our study or even life.
All in all,a aptitude amusement has a great seems to us university student and we must choice it leery.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cf86c4f5-698d-3cb6-90ce-40a18937f6a0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,our lives steps become faster and faster.Relaxation become neccessary.I love
relaxation.I think most people like relaxation.some relaxation can make us healthier,but do you konw some relaxation will do harm to us?
On the weekend,many people like doing sports to relax themselves,like basketball,tennis,
walking,hiking,ect.Doing sports can makes our bodies strong,and we will be healthy.One of my good friends like doing sports.On weekend,i had never seen him stay in dorm.Only you go to the sport yard could see him.I think his body is strong and health,because i had never seen him be cold,though he took a cold shower.So doing sports is good relaxation.but some people regard sleeping as good relaxation.They think they had worked for a week,they need to relax,so they sleep until tomorrow 12 o'clock.I think sleep enough certainty can do good to our health,but sleep too much can make us lazy,losing our movement.And too much sleep will cause some bad habbits.And also it will let us weak and fat.So i think sleep too much is doing harm to us.some people like playing computer games to relax themselves.Of course,it can relax us .But a part of them dont konw how to control themselves dont addict to the internet.They waste time on it.i think playing computer games also is not a good relaxation in life.
On my opinion,everyone have thier own way to relax.In thier mind,of course,their own way is the best way.We can suggest to them,but dont to criticize them.I have done that,and made he mad.so good or bad is only personal opinion.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9c03ccb9-2aed-371a-992c-609b5b0fc05f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the rapaid develoment of the socity,the preasure of the modern people is increasing heavily,so inorder to release our preasure ,the activities of entertamain are various.
But the activities of entertamain can be divided into two kind,the kind with healthy purpose can not only release our preasure,but also help us to establish our mental health,like playing sports,playing chess and something that can active our brain which do help to let us get rid of the modern pressure.But the other kind which seems more relaxe could bring long term damage to our health both physicially and mentally, somepeople think that playing computer games can let them forget the heavy preasure ,because they can drown in the virtual world where is no pressure.They are totally wrong!This kind of relaxation can only damage your positive attitude toward life,being addicate to playing computer games can damage your life,the example of this kind is widespread.Others suchs playing majiong,cards is also do harm to our health.
In my point of view,as a university student,I insist to keep a healthy way to relxe.After the heavey pressure brought by the study,we do do something to ralaxe.Reading is the way that I usually do,enjoying the pleasure brought by reading can let me free my pleasure.We us university student can also choose to exercise,sport has its fancy poweer which can help us to release our preasure.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 55046993-9342-36bc-9fd8-be84dc5382c1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of relaxations in our life.Some relaxations are good to us,but some are unreasonable and may even do harm to us.
As a university student,in my opinion,relaxation has two sides.For the good side,it is beneficial to our body and our jod.While working,our nerve is highly concerntrated on the work we do.After work,we should relax our nerve and that help our body to recharge.Relaxation like listening to music and traveling really help to relax ourselves and soon get enough energy to work again.For another side,relaxation can make people to lose the power and will to be successful.As a saying goes,with relaxations,one will lose one's will.Relaxation like vedio games can make people addicted to them,then not focussing on acadamy and job.
We need relaxation in life,since working all day is boring,but we must not be addicted to it.Being well oganized with work or study,relaxation can bring our life more fun and more motivation to achieve success.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2ceb5fd4-9751-3d3d-b60d-c95ec1773ac6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Living in the society , our burden is becoming much heavier than before, so we need to relax ourselves to lighten the pressure. As aresult,life is full of relaxation now.
People choose different kind of relaxations:some choose fishing during the weekends,some listen to music,some go singing with their friends.These are all good. Not onlydo these relaxations relax themselves,but also gain happiness,which make them become more energetic when working or studing. But some people choose the wrong relaxations such as hitting the pipe,playing computer games all day.They think that drugging or palying games may let them escape from the real world.To some degree they actually gain happiness.It goes whitout saying that they  finally become drug or computer addict.They can't relax from these relaxations,instead,they become weaker than before.
As far as I'm concerned,we need relaxations.But we should choose the right relaxtion,the one that can truly benefit us,especially for us college students. Only in this way can we have a brighter future.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0c6fcb6f-0446-364e-b1a4-9baabc9d39af> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are many entertainment activities in our dailylife with the
development of telenology and the growing stress we have.travelling is the most common
one,and most of us would choose to leave away our busy life as a relax and reward to
our hard working.And some of us would prefer to staying at home for a small part of
holiday,do something like watching TV and movies,play some computer games and so on.
But it may be hard for us to choose  activities as our relaxation ways,for
the simple reason that though some of them may let us have a relax,there are some
activitiesmay ruin our ambitions and make us unable to work for the day coming.
For example,many student select to play computer games in their day off,and it isn't
hard for us to imagine the reason why they couldn't keep their mind in study when they
come back from holiday.once they put themselves into playing computer games,it would be
difficult for them to return to their study life,which believes study the most important
and pay all the energy on study.
As a university student,I trully believe that we should pay great attention when
choosing a way as a relaxation and be careful with the sweet trap.it's necessary for us
to choose a way to realx ourselves and make ourselves much more strong to face the coming
difficulty.Reading a book may be a nice choice for us,because we can gain some imformation
when feeling comfortable at the same time.Only when all of us find a real helpful way
for relaxation can we make a progess and face the future at ease and capture our success.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID db0c7307-9f44-3fec-894e-526ba06dc9d2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to us all，there are many relaxation in our daily life.For example,we can surf the Internet when we are boring,we can read books or watch movies to relax ourselves.
There are various kinds of relaxation,some can benefit us,like sports,it will make our body stronger and healthier.However,there also exist some relaxation that will do harm to us if we doesn't use it corrently.Computer game is one of these relaxation.People can easily addicted to computer games.And if we pay too much time to play it,our study time or work time will be shorter and shorter,it isn't a good thing to play computer games.
As a university student,I really agree to the opinion that we should choose some correct relaxation when we want to relax ourselves.I think the most beneficial way is sports.On one hand,we can exercise our body through sports.On the other hand,we can enjoy our space time.So sports is much worthy to do than to play computer games.
To have relaxation is important,but to choose a good relaxation is also of great important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bc489164-92bd-301c-bca3-9fd746de410d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation is a necessary in people's life and there are verious amusements of course.
But it is obviorous that some activities is bad for us and some actiivities can indeed relax
ourselves. so we should have a sense of activities in our life.
in my view,we'd better think a lot  before you go to a activity.you shoud know the aim
of the activity,who lead the activity and why you join them.so we can have a right attitude
towards relaxation in our life.some activities like joging,walking,seeing a film are very good
activities.they can help us relax ourself or strength our body.these activities are benefical
for us.
contrary to these activities,some activities for example,smoking and drinking in bar is
beneficalless for us.they relax us a little and in the mean time kill our life. we should be
away from these activities.
As a college student,i think we shoud have a right attitude from now on for our bright
future.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e1ced5e0-6389-38dd-9cbf-5659540d1e48> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There're sorts of relaxation in our daily life.No matter what we do,relaxation is always needless for us to keep going forward.Well,things aren't always purely good or bad.As you know,some of them can increase our after-class life,but others may waste a large sum of time.
Somebody said that entertainment is our human nature and I don't deny that.However,another fact is that,the whole human history is a proccess about hiding human nature and developing our abilities.That means we should care about 'how we relax' and 'how much shall we relax'.
There're several entertainments in an university. Physical training may gain your strenth,watching foriegn movies can improve your language ability, well ,watching soap opera can help you wasting time.Whether those relaxation good or not isn't decide by 'what is it',but 'how we relax'.If you play basketball all day long for fun,muscle will come but time will gone.However,even computer games can increase our ability-some of those games,like 'DOTA' a.k.a. 'Defense of the ancient' also called 'E-sport',and it has it's own leagues and world cups.So my opinion is,we should find our destnination first.If you want to  be an athlete or pro-gamer,surely you can play balls,games or something else.But at that time,they would not be a kind of entertainment for you,instead of your job.To most of the students in school,our duty is learning knowledges,but not to be an athlete.So spend one or two hours each day on relaxation may be fit for us.Things will be not good if we relax too much and don't found on our academics.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c16339a4-11e4-31e9-9232-6e00c9fe4b84> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Even though the world is similar every hour,every day,we have different kinds of relaxation.
Under the adrk pressture,we're easy to assume the worst.Sometimes the world appears grey,indifferent and even evil in our blue eyes.However,it's not nearly that bad.As you know,everyone needs relaxation.
But,it doesn't mean that relaxation is a waste of time.When you are tired,you can certainly lie on the grass.You will love the setting sun hidden behind masses of scarlet clouds,creating the last beauty of a day.Take a look at the babyblue sky.It's so wide as if can put up with everything.Sky is broad-minded,because sorrow never lasts forever,and no life lives for depression.
Everything has two sides,and relaxation is not a expection.When we relax,we need to take care of ourselves.Entertaments can help us relax making us feel better after busy works or something terrible hit.But some entertaments may do harm to us.
So as a university student when we need to relax ourselves we should make a wiser choice and make a good
taste.And also self control is important.As above,when we rest properly,we can also learn something that isn't written on paper.Widen your heart,and adjust your mood, then you'll find every day is fresh!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 57e70e80-d8bf-322d-b2e5-9fd4461f2924> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,we can do all kinds of entertainmental activities such as football,tennis and so on.Boys always like sports game,but girls like singing,dancing etc.Our lives become more and more beautiful with them.But some of them are useful to us,others are bad.
For example,Playing basketball is a useful activities.It can not only relax us,but also build us up.We are benifit from it.And reading books is also a great idea.It can make us smarter and smarter.But some people like relaxing themselves by gambling.It's not a good entertainment activitie.It will destroy your life!
As a college student,I think we can do some good entertainment activities to relax ourselves.We mustn't do those bad activities such as playing online games.It will make us worth so that we can't relax ourselves and we cannot study well,either.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 873795a8-dfea-348d-8c35-a09556e73171> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the mordern life,relaxation become more and morn common. As an university student, I
think it's very necessary in our daily life.
Now our society are developing at a high speed,everyone has a busy and nervous life.
If we can find a balance in my life between work and relaxation,it will be an useful
way to reduce stress and make us work more efficiencily.What's more, there are various
kinds of relaxation.So we can choose what suits yourself.
In my opinion, listening to the music and reading books are the best approaches to
relax,which can promote ourselves in the meanwhile.Sometimes, shopping or going to movie
is also a good choice.
However, there are also many bad activities such as drinking in a bar,smoking.They may make
us feel relaxed in a while,but it can make us get into the habits and really unhealthy for
our body.
In a word,appropriate relaxation is beneficial to our life,so long as we choose the correct
ways.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 05c8893e-6cd0-3e88-8e2c-66a9095f4368> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is the mindness that after we enter the university we can be relx.which is tremendswrong.the follwing are reasons.
the university is the socity that we can learn more knowledge about we are going to meet.and that is good for we meet the challenge of the furture.while we can have many practicing and deal with the matter with a little knowledge .secondly the university's study is very heavy .while it look like no difficout .so we have to spend the more time in learning the university'couse.
exceptly learning other skills in the university is also very importmant.such as we exercise we chance with each other .in other word we should can work with others.because when we really enter the socity .which is very importmant .whenever we can not do a best thing by myself.and we should can control myself and make best use of my time.we should not spend the precious time in playing game and so on .
the word is very good that the life is on myself .so if we would control myself andwe would have a beautiful furture.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e6348734-7596-333e-b875-3ecf267c6a75> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
To relax themselves, people need entertainment. With the development of technology, there are various kinds of activities, in which people enjoy themselves, such as computer games, movies, surfing the Internet , all kinds of sports and so on.
As the saying goes, every coin has two sides. Some of these activities are beneficial, but some may be inappropriate or even do harm to people. For example, soprts, like basketball, football, jogging, do good to people's health. Doing sports can strengthen the function of our organs , and also make us feel energetic,  which means it benefits us both physically and mentally. However, some activities,  like computer games, may ruin our life if we spend too much time in them. Nowadays, many students lose themselves in games and their performance in school is terrible.
Therefore, as a college student, I think it's good for us to relax ourselves in things we are interested in, because all work and no play makes Jack a dull boy. On  the other hand, we should be clear that we must learn to control oursevles and make good use of our time because entertainment is just a part of our life, it isn's the whole of life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 09e5b04b-fcd3-330f-88db-565c3e66b411> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
During our daily lives, we tend to do something that is helpful for us to relax ourselves when we become exhausted after a whole day's work.These activities include listening to music, watching TV, taking a walk and so on.And the way of relaxing oneself varies from one to another.
Basically,most of these relaxations are good for us.However, some of these relaxtion may become harmful to us in certain situations.For example, most of the students may choose playing video games for relaxation.It is OK when you play it only for a short wile.But if you play for too long,it does harm to you both physically and mentally.There are a lot more of these so-called "relaxations".Some become bad when you do it too much.While some of them is even worse,they are bad for you at the first place no matter how much time you spend doing it,such as taking drugs,smoking and so on.
As an undergraduate, I hold the view that every one should take it seriously about what kind of things you are doing to help relax yourself.If the relaxation you prefer is no good thing,try to find another relaxation to place the current one as fast as you can.Remember,never become addicted to those bad relaxations even though you consider it very entertaining and enjoyable.And you should know that there are many other good ways of relaxing oneself in this world.Among them,you must be able to find one that is suitable for you.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8a8072f3-e0a5-3d3b-98cb-de2e73dcd59c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all, there are various entertainments in our daily life. Without entertainment,
our life will lack of fun and thus be incomplete.However, different entertainments could
bring us different influence,including good and bad.
On one hand, participating in some kinds of activities can give us benefits.Sports, such as
playing basketball,running,go hiking,can not only relax ourselves, but also strenthen our body,
leading us to a healthy heart and soal.
However, on the other hand, some entertainments will bring us some bad effect. Bad activities,
such as gambling, drinking alcohol, can do us harms.And of course we should avoid addicting
this kind of activities.
As a college student, I think, just every coin has two sides, entertainments also has its
advantages and disadvantages. And all of us should recognice it clearly and choose the beneficial
entertainments. Only in this way, our life cound be better and more significant.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a757fb1a-525d-3591-b9c7-f5c63b302601> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life ,we can do all kinds of activities to relax ourselves.For example,we do sport after class,like badminton.
And we also go to KTV to sing songs and so on.
Do activities can make us study better,and make us meet more people,and may broaden our eyes.
So our life can become more colorful and varied in postures.It also can make us have an opotimistic attitude for life.
When we face the difficute in the life,we will more positive to face it and defeat it.
But some of the activities are bad for us.Somebody will choose to play computer games to relax heself.
He maybe addition to the games.And then he would not study.So the result ofit is not good.
In my opinion,I think we should do activities.But we will choose right activites to do.
Choosing these activities which can hand over more friends,and can connect with nature.
So we can do some sports,dance in the squre or go for an outing.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c5e25224-61ea-3a58-a6dc-3d714f2398d6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society,many sorts of entertainments appear in our daily life.Such as social dance,barbecue,KTV,basketball and so on.They really make us university students relaxed and feel cool.However,each coin has two sides.Some are really bad for us in our mentel and physical health.It's vulgar and immoral.So we need to distinguish the entertainments we join.In my opinion,We university students are into society.We need to take some entertainments to enlarge our sociability and to reduce our study stress.So we should choose the entertainment which can improve our abilities and also can relaxe ourselves.We need to learn to manage our life in our own way so that we can make our life more meaningful and more colourful and varied.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 857eef81-32e8-3b4b-996b-29b089580cc4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,relaxation is really an necessery things in our daily life.
Work,study,these things let us be valued in socity,but relaxation ,on the contrary,
makes people enjoy the life enjoy the pleasure of being a human.
There are many kinds of relaxing activity in our life.but not every activity does good to the people.
some of them is not usable and even may do harm to our health.
for instance, some adults are addicted in alcohol,they use all of their times in the drinking bars to reduce the pressure and stress.Drinking benefits our relationships among our relatives and friends but it really affect our health when we drink without limited.Smiliarly,some peers of us are addicted in the network.surfing internet
broaden our horizens but being addicted is not advisable.that wastes our cherish youth.
well ,in my opinion,entetainment is necessery but we should face if properly.only in this way ,can we enjoy the life and make the contributions to all of the people who are loved by us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ec30b80c-2ee6-36f4-a6f6-3b761ab2404a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,none of us can live happly without entertainment.There is a great variety of way for entertainment,such as swimming,playing basketball,playing comeputer games and so on.
As you can see,we can relax ourselves,by the meanwhile,we may also hurt ourselves with few attention.For example,a man who is addicted to computer games will get less time to exercise and  will be weak and be access to illness easily day by day.
So which way for entertainment should we choose and what we should control?
As a student of university,the fllowing are likely to represent my opinions.Firstly,we should choose the activities which will do something good to build up our body.Secondly,the mental step up is also another factor we should consider.Thirdly,we should control our time for entertainment such as comeputer games and movies.
That's all what I can think about,thank you.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 23e64c47-1943-3b8a-ad18-1070d1d6213d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are lots of ways that we can relax ourselves if life such as serffing on the Internet ,doing sports,sleeping and so on.If we always be in  big pressure,we'll feel tired and in bad spirit.So relaxation is very important for us.But the point is that how we relax ourselves because like other things,relaxation in life has both advantages and disadvantages.
In recent years,despite the development of the internet,television is still a very popular form of entertainment.In fact ,it looks as if televition will become more popular than ever,for APPLE has been creating a super TV.
There are a lot of reason why TV is so popular,but sometimes it do harm to us.It is more convenient for us to get informations,with almost unlimited entertainment available.Like the  internet,lots of people get adicted to it and become more and more tired.It affacts their work and study seriously.
So I think the ways we relax ourselves in our daily life are neither good or bad,but how to use it is what really counts.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 800a95f1-4d44-3c60-95d1-27935a01f816> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern world, everybody feel much pressure in daily life. In the same time, people also find more and more activities to relax themselves. For example, many people have more sleeping time when they are on their holiday, some people feel like doing sports after work or school, some like do something about music, others like playing computer games.
Many relaxing activities provide people a proper way to relax their body and spirit, so that they can keep passion for work or studying. However, some activities do harm to people. Not only their physical health, but also their mental health may be affected by these activities. People who drowned themselves in computer games will take few notices on other things, leading them to the load of fault. And too much alcohols and smoking will destroy people’s body health, even affect others around them.
On my opinion, everybody should find some activity they like to relax themselves sometimes and can’t keep nervous all the time because relaxation can improve people’s efficiency for work. Of course, they should choose a healthy and proper way such as sleeping, running, walking, but smoking, alcohol, drug, and not have too much relaxation at one time. I think everybody will gain much profit from the good relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e856defb-b81c-3bab-a89f-61dd73bea772> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are losts of entertainments in our lives such as PC games,films,musics,
readings and so on .
Among these entertainments,some are good for us college students,but some have bad
influence on us.Take musics for example,we can relax ourselves through musics when
we feel tired or nervous.But if we are addicted to it,not only our hearing but also
our life will be destroyed. And PC games now are very popular in colleges.Some students
say games can make them happy when they are in bat mood.But there are also some students
have waste lots of time to paly games so that influence their normal study life.Besides,
some entertainments even do damage to a person’s consciousness which will lead the
students to a criminous way.
So in my opinion, we should have the ability to distinguish good ones from the other.
Some entertainments can relax ourself, so we can take advantage of them to improve our
lives.But we should prevent ourself form being addicted to them.As for those which are
inappropriate for us,we should reject our curiosity and keep away from them.For these
entertainments,we should choose those good for our inspirit such as reading and some
outdoor activities which can strengthen our health or improve our skills.
If we can accomplish these ,we can have a better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c6804490-025c-3085-8949-ca23226253d9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,in our daily life,we are exposed to an incresing numeber of relaxations.
Indeed,relaxations are of great significance most of time,because it can brings a lot of
happiness.Most importantly,it can help us relax ourselves not only fysically but also mentally.
Obviously,if we can have a better relax first,we will work or study more efficientlly.
But in fact,among these a variety of relaxations,some of them can also be very harmful.
Sometimes they can even produce many nagetive effects.For examples,a number of people just
can not help themselves being addicted to these relaxations,and thus they are always occupied
too much and have no spare time to work or study.
As a university student,we have a lot of spare time.Now the problems arise that how should we
make good use of them?From my on,what we should pay enouth attention to is that we should
keep a balance betweem study and relaxations.We can not be addicted to those relaxations all
the time,or we will fail to learn anything and even fail in the finally exams.But at the same
time,it is too boring for us to study without any relaxations,either.In my opinion,the
best arrangement is that we can have some entertainments after finishing the homework.But we
should also  remember to sleep early too, or we may feel too sleepy to study the next day.
In addition, it is better for us to choose a suitable relaxation which can help us learn more.
For examples, we can choose some English games and with them,we can also command many English
knowledges after playing.From these, we can clearly see that if we can keep a balance between
study and relaxations,we can study more efficiently with happiness.So let us remember these
and live a excellent life in our campus time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bfea6179-5228-3c1c-8e7d-b61b8a7769b5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we can see,there are lots of entertainment activities in our daily life.For example,someone may play some sports after one day's work.The other may get together with some friends and have a drink to say goodbye to the tiredness.
Of course,entertainment activities are important to anyone of us.Without these,our life may be full of work and bored.But every coin has two sides,not all activities are good for us.As we know,some students are addiction to computer games,which will harmful to them mentally and physically if they spend too much time on them.Ok,let's take the computer games as the example.The computer game itself isn't a mistake.If players can control themselves and just have fun for 1 or 2 hours at most,these will relax them and escape them from one day's tiredness.
In my opinion,appropriate activities are necessary to each one of us.Because we need them to let our lives become more powerful and confident.But the word "appropriate"is more important than "entertainment".Without it,we may lost much time and our true life will exchange by those visual things.
Generally speaking,all of us need entertainment activities.But please don't forget to add the word "appropriate" before the "entertainment".

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7e080b63-fa88-3c97-95d0-3e008ad2f0bc> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the growth of society,there are more and more entertainments.For example ,many gradens are avaiavle for citiaen ,you can find KTV easily and many others are in our daily life.
Some entertainments do good to us . They may make us more fit in physical,for example,when we do sports such as playing table tennis,we not only ralax ourselves but take exercises which makes our muscle more powerful.However ,some of them ont only can't relax us ,but do harm to us.
As a undergraduate ,I think that we should choose appropriate ways to relax ourselves which can help us be more powerful
in life and job.It's also up to us to keep away from those harmful relaxations and to advise our relatives and friends to keep away from them too.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6740d047-5354-3978-a29f-11e10ad7d4d6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various of activities around us.We can attend to a party,go to the gym,also
play basketball.
There are some advantagements to us.In one hand,we can relax ourselves through those
activities.As the result of it,we will be full enegy and efficient to finish our work or
study.In the other hand,not only can we get some skill during the activities,such as
making computer program,but we maybe make friends with others.As opposed to,some activities
are harmful our body and spirite.For example,we may be addicted to the net bar and play
computer game.It isn't good for us but will waste our time and make us lose our study,even
force us to be guilty.
In my eyes,we almost be a adult,so we should learn to judge what is good for us and
what is bad.There is no doubt that we should take part in some activities to expend our
view.But the most important is that we must learn to choose the good thing and get rid of
the bad.For the other thing,the sociaty and the government have a responsibility to keep
our surroundings pure through skrike the crime.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1178971c-a46c-3a00-ac5e-b8d3e8a116d5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There're several kinds of entertainment,including games,performings,competings,etc.These activities fill us
with more fun and relax us from buzy and tiring daily lives.In all way,relaxation,without which life may be
meaningless,is vital.
However,depite the importance of relaxation,some of them might be unproper or even harmful.For instance,
my high school foreigh teacher once hung out with his friends,drunk.They passed a park and saw the statues
in it and somehow decided to cut the heads of them.Imagining when they woke up the next morning with a bunch
of rock heads and a saw..I'm glad that they were not caught by the local police.
As a college student,we definetely should have fun and do relaxation stuff,yet we have to make sure that we're
doing that in a proper way,which means at least we do not do harm to others and ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e4597d40-d010-314b-8090-63eae6b9c7a2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are lots of different activities for fun in our life.Though these relaxations seem good for us,some of them do have disadvantures.
As a college student,I think most of the relaxations do good to us cause of the benefication which can enjoy us.But some of them is bad for us.For example,drinking and playing games is unproper for us to relax.
In my expeirence of life,I do meet a lot of people who had been lost in some activities.Such as playing dota,3c and so on.
There are also some are good man who always do some objective activities .Such as playing basketball ,doing exercise and other things good for our growth.And we can do other meaningful activities such as being a volunteer to help others.
There is a saying that "God help those who help themselves".As a matter of fact,we can control ourselves to avoid those bad relaxations if we make up our mind to do it.
In my opinion,we should keep our mind alive so as to be far away from those bad relaxations.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4c12fd38-d401-3235-9769-3ae14c193a8a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
with the developement of society,there are so many new entertainments appear ,and they have became an important part in our daily life,and it's no doubt that people can't live without them.
Many relaxations,like playing ball games,exercising,watching movies,reading funny books,are good to people,people can get real relax after stress and anxiety daytime work.And they have many postive effects on people's mind and body,beside refection.
althought they are necessary,but some relaxation are not always benefical to us,especial computer games,people are just for fun at the begining ,but later they find they can't control themselves ,they may get addicted .And too much relaxd can make people lazy and negetive ,they will lose their passion in creation and working.
As a university student,we should learn to choose the relaxation which are positive ,and keep balance between studying and relaxation, you may feel better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c7720c66-15ae-3fe8-ad95-3c7f721f2b2a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of activities or entainments,we get fun and relax during these,it really makes our
life more happy and colurful.As a undergraduete,I'd like to show my opinions about relaxation in life  to you.
Most of these activities can do a good jod to relax ourselves.for instance,doing sports is a good and common choice to have fun after your study or work.It seldom makes us get injured by this way.Majority of people will have a good time during this time.Of course,in spite of sporting,there are quantitise of ways that can make fun.Lots of people will choose some recreation ground or visit places.Yeah,thy are or good ideas,as long as you take a little care,there won't be trouble for you.And today must be a nice day.
However,every coin has two sides.Not all activities are as safe as you think.some of them may harm you.Well,not every like "soft activities",becouse some of us are fond of dangerous work.For me,it is no need,Ican not understand.
So we must have a correct attituse towords relaxation in life.we should try our best to protect ourself,it is the most important!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9d7b7d35-a35c-396c-a32c-19bcc137d5e2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,entertainments have been more and more viriues  in our life and we enjoy them everyday
to relax.
Generally ,it is believed that there are several advantages with entertainments.They hold this
opinion because they think that amusementcan help us relax through singing songs ,dancing ,playing
sports and so on.what's more,when you play in the activity ,you can know more people wto maybe have
similary interests with you .Above all ,they may give you some valuble advice about  the future
of your life.Besides,if you ralax reasonablly,you will work more energy.
But every coin have two sides,and there are much more entertainment in our life is no exception.
There are many disadvantages with this phenmenon.To begin with ,playing too much will make us
not like work any more.And most important of all,entertainment may cost us too much time even
money.
But all in all,entretainment is not only allgood but also all bad.we are exceped to spend our time
in amusemebt resonablly. And only in this way ,we can have a fanstatic life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 551f004f-8226-36c7-a382-a9d93a0b54fd> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Life in the modern world is complex and diversiform,which is the reason that coming into being a great deal of different things.Relaxation is one of these  things.
There are so many relaxations in life,such as playing sports,playing  the musical instruments,singing ,dancing.When we have pressure or when we are not happy,we can do these things to make us relaxed and feel good.However,all the things have their advantages and disadvantages,so is relaxation.
If we play sports to relax,we can not only feel good,but also have a exercise which is very good to our body,so playing sports is benefit for our mental and physical health.But some ralaxations are not good as we think.For example,drinking and smoking.Maybe when we are  drinking and smoking,we feel cool and enjoy the process,however it is very harmful to our body and even others',and more serious situation is dringking driving.
So as a collage student,I think relaxations is necessary,but the choice of us is very important,we should choose healthy and beneficial relaxations to help us have a better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 33044c97-4961-3300-a5f6-6a4ecbbb4191> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are many kinds of recreational activities in our daily lives.For
example,running,reading,singing, swimming and so on.
However,not all of those recreational activities are good for us.Of course,some activ
ities like running,reading or some else can relax us and help us to get rid of stress a
nd sorrow.But here,other recreational activities,such as playing computer games are not
benefit to us.People would be lost in the computer games and forget things that they sh
ould do.Some of us always imitate those famous people and do things not suit for them.
What's worse,some of the recreational activities even do great to us,not only to our ph
ycial healthy,but also to our mental healthy.They may even make us lose faith to live a
nd that's really too bad!
As far as I am concerned,we should have a good knowledge of the recreational activities
we do.And only in this can we relax ourseleves in a healthy way!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3771f865-9355-3a13-9317-a7217a0ffc4f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society，there are various kinds of entertainment activities in our life. As a result, we have more way to enjoy our leisure time and relax ourselves.
However, the fact that some activities are beneficial while others are not can’t be ignored. For example, some students like seeing a movie with their parents or their best friends so that they can not only board their mind but also improve their relationships. But, some students who are addicted to network become weary of studying.
As a college student, I think we must have the ability of self-control. It is necessary for us to know what is advantageous and what is harmful. If only we choose the right relaxation can we  release pressure and enjoy the life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d42486b0-96ee-319e-9908-2603ad0adade> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we are living in a modern world, there are various kinds of relaxing activities in our daily lives, such as traveling to different cities, shopping in the mall, hiking in the country etc. It seems that getting some relax frequently will help us dealing with daily stress.
However, as a coin has two sides, some relaxing activities may do more harm than good to us. Some people may consider smoking as a good relaxation when they feel stressed, but smoking will harm their lungs. Also, some think that drinking may make them forget all the pain and relax them lot, but drinking will do something bad to the liver.
Therefore, as a university student, we should have the ability to choose the proper kind of relaxation. First, the relaxation shouldn't do harm to our bodies, such us smoking or drinking. Second, the relaxation shouldn't cost much of our time, for example, play games too often is not good. Third, the relaxation must help us delight our mood, and this is the main meaning of relaxation.
Choose good relaxation and enjoy our life, and that will benefit a lot!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6904e0c6-4dd2-349e-9e20-66a1873092db> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the life ,we sometimes feel tired after working or studying .And we don't want to just go to sleep,we often find other ways to relax.In the modern
society,people have many kind of activities and entertainment.
Doing sports is one of the most common ways which people choose.They can play basketball,volleyball,badminton and some people choose jogging.And nowdays more and more people like going to ktv to sing songs with friends or workmates.They sing loudly and enjoy it.Like these ways ,they are not bad
choices to relax.They can make people happy and even do good to health.But not all people like these ways.Some people prefer playing computer games.If one that enjoy playing computer games isn't addicted to it,games also a good way to relax.But if we play it for a long time,we not only feel more tired but it can do bad to our eyes.
As a university student,I think we should have an ability of controling.
When we feel tired,we had better choose some ways that can benefit us.And the most important,we should control us not to get addicted something bad.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6154d565-f6ed-3dc4-b7f5-813c629bc3c5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are namy relaxation in our life such as playing basketball playing computer games having a wolk and so on.About different actitvties,different peopol have different opions.
How about you?
As far as I'm concerned ,I think it's a most important part in our life to relaxe ourselves.However,some relaxations are benefit us,while others are not.For the one hand,relaxations such as playing football,it not only makes us more health,but also refreshs  our mind which help us to finish our work better.For the other hand ,some relaxaions are quite bad for us.Take playing computer games as an example,after a long time working ,we are  tired physically and mentally.If we play computer games,we will be tireder and tireder what's more we may be acditicted to the games.
As a college student,we should make a wise deceision and protect us from hurting by the damage activites.As far as i am concerned,we should make good use of our time and spend it on some meaning activities.When we realx ourselves,we had better choose some benefit sports.But not just sitting before the computer.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a8e86a8b-19ab-3092-916d-a0c613ddbfb2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the developmemnt of the economy,there are more and more kind of relaxtion in people's daily life.Not only the traditional game like sports,chess,but also the new thing like computer games,internet social activities.
Enterainments is good for us.First, they can relax ourselves,so we can reduce the pull of work or study,and improve our activity to work or study more hard.Second, enterainments can help us communicate with others.What's more, everyone need relaxtion,need to be happy.
But not all the enterainments are good for us,it may danger ourselves.Like computer games,if we spell too much time on it,that's means waste our time.We can't be intatinon to study or work,we can't be good to relax and so on.And some enterainments like drinking smoking are harmful to our healthy.
As a university,in my opinion,we should know waht is good for us and what is bad for us.We should join the active enterainment,refure the bad thing

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fd610619-604d-34dd-b52e-df2bf1bf7d4a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,life is so colorful for us college students because there are so many
intersting things and enjoyable activities which we can have a good time .Therefore,problems
come also.YOu can image that some activities is good for us but activities that may do harm
to us exit in the mean time.
For example,some sports activities such as playing basketball whth your classmates,taking
a walk along the road with your friends,riding a bike to go around not only can build a
healthy body,but also make you get along well with your friends.However,some students just
do not do these.They choose to play computer games from time to time just without going out
of the dormitories.Spending long time on the computer game is harmful to their eyes and make
them have no time to do the work so that theri studies fallen down.What a stupid activity!
In a word ,it's a waste of time and healthy to do things like playing games.
So,we should have a right atitude to choose activities.As a college student,we should be
responsible to ourselves.Facing to different kinds of entertainments we should learn to
choose.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 808e2896-031c-33ac-8dc3-351b1970da47> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there have many amusements.But can we differentiate good amusements and bad?
As time gose by,we contact many amusements, example playing card,computer games and all kinds of sports.Maybe someone like computer games others like sports.
It is freedom for everyone that choose amusements.But we should know what amusements is good to you and what amusements can give you bad  influence.As a collage
student I want to say that we shoule keep ourself from away computer games.Because our task is study.If you be attracted by the game,you could not finish the
study.My classmate who play computer games everyday is a example.He can not be concentrate on blackboard in day and failed in the final exam.
So I think we should do some good amusements like sport.Sport not only can relax ourself but also improve our immunity.There have lots of good amusements that
we can choose. Why ont choose one that be adapt to youself? A good amusements can give you energy.On the contrary bad amusements can consume your energy.How to
choose amusements is a part of study,please terat it seriously!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID add2b7fc-8c59-3039-b431-f205c19701d2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We may feel bored at times in our daily life,so various kinds of amusements are needed.
In this highly developed society,we have plenty of activities to cheer ourselves up.Such
as playing computer games,going shopping,doing sports and so on,so many.
But as a saying goes that'everything has two opposite sides',some of the amusements in
our life are benefitial and others are not good or even do harm to our souls.For example,
a student in senior is supposed to focus on his or her study or do other good activities.
We will never stand that he is addicted to the free porns in the Internet,because this
does great harm to his spirital health.And even worse,he might rape somebody someday,this
is what we don't hope to happen.
As far as I am concerned,us univercity students undoubtfully are ought to use good acti
-vities to make ourselves delighted.We are the hope of our country,our country depends on
us in the future,what if we become useless before we can do some contributions to our cou
-ntry?This is hard to imagine.What's more,we should keep a balance between study and play.
As a student,our contemprary mission is to study.And this is also the key that we are able
to have a good life in the future.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5e963171-cde8-3c2e-9d55-78d733b5f697> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are many different kinds of entertainment activities in our daily life,
such as joining a party ,going to KTV,playing cards and doing some other out-door activiyies.
Some of these aactivities are good for our health,but unfortunitaly,some of them are
unavilable even they  can make us in danger.For example,when playing cards with our friends,
if we make a bet with money,we may cause a bad influence in me and my friends'friendship as
we win or lose the money.What's the worses,we may bit each other.
As a collage student,I think we should pay much attention when we entain with our friends
especially with others.What's the most important,I think we should have a good awarness of
protecting ourselves first.Then we can get well along with our surroundings with carefullness.
Be careful and having tolerance,we can avoid many difficulties.After all,living a greener
life,we can enjoy our beautiful world.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 81d1ea98-c4cc-34bd-9f57-0635aa609d2e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Following the rapid development of the society,more and more stress exists in our daily
life,which leads to various activities of entertainment's coming into being.For example,all
kinds of sports and computer games are popular relaxation among teenagers.
As the saying goes,every coin has two sides.So does relaxation in life.On one hand,those
entertainment,which help people relief themselves,indeed do people good.People can pull
themselves out of the world that is full of stess and allow them to take a breath in the long
run of life.Such kind of relaxation includes many a sports and taking a vocation with families.
On the other hand,some relaxation does harm to people on the contrary.For example,many
students in universities become addicted to computer games because they do not want to face
the pressure in life.
Now that I'm a student in a university,seeing some classmates throw themselves into some
impropriet entertainment ,I deeply feel that we should relax ourselves by doing some
meaningful things but not take some things that waste our youth.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 706584b0-caac-31c7-bd8b-ca1444d1f289> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the life of human beings, all of us have to solve all kinds of problems, so we would meet lots of stress all the times. At this time, a thing which we should do is to relax ourselves. But there are so many amusements that we are difficult to choose one which is right for us.
No one can deny that relaxation is helpful to us. But every coin has two sides, relaxation sometimes also has disadvantages. In fact, the disadvantages of the relaxation depend on people. For example, if a man search the Internet two hours after working or studying, I think it is a reasonable style for relaxing himself, but if he sit beside the computer over ten hours, it is hard to say that he was relaxing himself.
As far as I am concerned, we should relax ourselves in a reasonable time and reasonable style. As a college school student, we would have lessons in the daytime, after lessons, we have to do some homework, so we don't have much time to relax ourselves, but as long as we can do some amusement, we shouldn't lose ourselves in it. As we know, over relaxation is also stressful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3ef00511-4c54-32d1-90a5-93cd328fa311> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are some relaxations in our life. If we have not these relaxations,our life will be very boring.
In our life,we have various of relaxations.For example, we do some sports.we watch movie.
we play some inetruments.we chat with our friends.we sing some song.
But are these relaxations beneficial? Of course not.
All the things have their good side and bed side.Some relaxations is benifit for us.For example,sports,music or other things.they can help us being more and more healthy and outgoing.we can feel happy to do it.But some relaxations is not good even terrible for us.
For example,watching soap operas and gambling.They can not help us live a better life.
so we must do some good relaxations,and live a better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 32c4c594-9942-372f-a849-9cab56436981> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various kinds of recreation in our lives.For girls ,they can do some shopping,
rope jumping or decorating their dorm rooms .For boys ,of course,sports are the most popular
activities,like basketball ,volleyball,etc.Relaxation is as important as water
and air to our lives.
Meanwhile,every coin has two sides.Some amusements do good to students while other recreations
have negative effect on us .Being obsessive with computer games is one of the most
common problems of teenagers .It is so because those young men can not keep themselves in
check .And this is also the common reason why some university students fail their final
exams.
As a college student ,from my perspective , having recreation in life is vital but we have to
do it right and adequately.Playing games properly can help improve your intelligence but it can
also ruin your study if you play for so long that your daily life is disturbed.
To sum up, relaxation is important but you shouldn't get obsessive with it .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ef4bc637-f235-32bb-9e36-5478bb47fc02> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In daily life, we have a lot of fascinating and interesting entertainment to choose.
We can play basketball, football or go running with our friends.
We can listen to some music and see some movies.
And we can also play computer games.
Besides, it is obvious that
we need entertainment as we need relaxation to reduce our stress, have a good mood in life,
and even have good health.
However, not all the entertainment are always good for everyone.
Take computer games for instance.
Computer games do help us relax ourselves.
But many teenagers take too much time on computer games and become addicted to the games,
thus computer games don't mean relaxation for them any more.
Instead, computer games mean drug more because who is addicted to it can get rid of it.
Therefore, we ought to have an correct attitude towards entertainment.
We should be clear that we take entertainment just for relaxation.
As we are students in university, I think we should take study for the first.
We really can't be addicted to relaxation.
Once relax enough, time to stop.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e60dbd63-403d-356f-a254-eed631a4e4d3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life ,we need something to satisfy ourselves mentally,especially with development of our society.As a saying goes ,”a boy only study but not play,he will be dull”.so ,I am sure everyone of us often play his favourite recreative games to make him more smart.
There is no doubt that recreation can benifite us in many ways.on the one hand,it can make us relaxed after a hard work..on the other hand,we can stay younger physically and mentally if we keep doing recreation activities.Thus,,with recreation,we can lead a happier and healthy life.
There is opposition in all things,and recreation is no exception.Although recreation can help us to much,some recreation also do harm to us.For example,computer games , from which we youngs often get entertainment .But games also takes our time,which affect our study.Not only these,it but also do harm to our eyes when long time befor computer.
So,in my opinion ,we should teat recreation fairly and turely.Only by this,we can make it beneficial to us ,not harmful to us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5754c213-c126-3888-9af5-12591dec109f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the economy,there are different kinds of entertainments activities in our life. After one day's busy work or study, we'd like to find some way to make our body ralax. Some people play basketball,play computer games,chat on the internet,read books and so on.
As we know,doing exercise, like playing basketball or football, can make us stronger and healthier,and we can get a sense of happiness.But each coin has two sides,there are some entertainments activities that dameges to us.Like being addicted to computer games will make person lazy and be dangerous for our health.Gambling is another bad relaxation.So many family broken because
of it and it creat no value.
As a university student,I think it's necessary for us to relax ourselves,and there are many ways to ralax ourselves, we should choise the way that good for our health.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 00b016bc-9419-3278-b3b6-c6879bd4fd38> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people may get more and more restrained because of all kinds of stress,from family ,job,even life itself.In order to release their stress,they choose relaxation as their means.
There are all kinds of relaxation,such as travel,jogging and so on.Some may like to travel ,setting themselves free in the nature,appreciating the wonderful senery of the nature and enjoying all of the nature. Without doubt it is a good way to relax.But on the contrary,some may think it is a good way to release themselves by drinking alcohol,because alcohol can hocus them.Absolutely it is no good doing so,because alcohol not only hocus them,but also kill them.What is more, alcohol ,which can hocus them for a while ,never help them relax from the bottom.
As far as I am concerned,to relax is to make people free from their stress,which push them hard to live happily.So I think people should choose means which is good for their health to make their life happily.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 49617268-026e-39dd-9492-278a8e4d7457> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of relaxation in our daily life.For example,we can play computer games,do some sports,chat with our friends and go out for a rest.We can take part in so many activities and make some new friends.Most of these relaxations are good for us,but there are also some bad for us.If you addited to some computer games,you will not get a good score to graduate from school.when you want to have a rest,please choose the best way for your relaxation.
As a university student,in my opinion,we should not just to consider how to have fun and should also think about which way is the best for us.Doing sports is a relaxation that can make us stronger and healthy.Thought we may hurt when we are doing some sports.I think that if we can go out for fresh air and warm sunshine,instead of staying in domitory,we would be healthy both in body and mind.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID dbeaa251-1195-399c-ab56-7912fdb04a22> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our lives , there are variety of relaxation activities.
Because of these activities, our lives become more relaxed,
interesting and happier. What is more, these activities may
make us become more healthy.
However,not all activities are good. Some activities are
advantaged,but some are disadvantaged. Fox example,playing
computer game make us happy and easy after we finish study
and work.But if we are addicted to it, it will affect our
study and work,even our health.
As a university man,I think relaxation activities are very
importance for our lives.We should take part in some activities
that are advantaged for us. Also ,we should avoid activities
disadvantages.Making good use of relaxation activities make our
lives more relaxed,interesting and happier.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 80e84fab-092a-3a93-82ce-5c940b3d1b14> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowsdays it is a not uncommon that our life is flooded with plenty of all kinds of relaxation.
the ralaxation was formed by many types ,such as KTV,activities,etc.whether the relaxation is beneficial or not ,the idea varies person from
person.
as we know , some activities is  beneficial to us .To begin with ,they can provide us a relax .fun and happy environment
when we are in a busy time . Secondly,in some excellent relaxations ,there are many good things which we can learn.
Morever,from they ,we could be the vital role of the friend circle,and share happiness among our friend.
Every coin has two sides.there is not only benefit in the relaxation .some of them are filled with the unfit ways,which is harmful to people.
Even , they contain many danger so that the body of us joined would be destroyed.
As for this relaxation ,in my view ,the advantages outweigh the disadvantages.though these have many unfit places, they isn't exert a severe
influence on the relaxation because the dangerous place can be corrected by people. it is quite good that with many relaxation starting ,we can live happily and study happily
only in this way ,do correct the shortcoming and keep the advantage ,and our life is beautiful.wonderful

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2dc13199-3e11-3784-9a48-acaaab23c771> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society,the entertainment are developed day by day.the entertainment in modern days are popular in our life and become a part of our daily life gradually.
As we all know, there are many entertainment in our daily life.Such as watching movies,playing sports,reading,singing and so on. What I like most is watching movies. When watching movies,I can learn many different culture knowledge and see many beautiful scenery which I have not chance to see it in my life. But I like the plot of movie most. Every time I remind the sinking of Titanic, I will cry because of the love tragedy.
but not all the entertainment are benefit for us, some of them are not good,even do harm  to us. Nowadays we can hear many teenagers who are addicted to the computer games are dead suddenly in front of the screen. And many children crime because of smoking or gambling. So when we enjoy our entertainment,we should judge if it is benifit for us.
As a university graduate,I believe that every thing has two side,we cannot say no to the entertainment just because it may hurt us. If we join the positive entertainment and don't get addicted to the negative one, it is good for us too.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0c3a3ec7-2d73-3ad5-b18e-42760d8a0306> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society,many kinds of entertainments appear in people’s daily life,such as playing basketball,football,tenis and so on.Besides,you can also play computer games and see movies to relax yourself.
There is no doubt that every leave has two sides,so you can find that some entertainments is good for us and some is harm to us.As far as I’m concerned,we can do some sport exercise to build our body as well as entertain ourselves and enrich our life.But what worried us is that some entertainments can make us addicted ,for example,the computer games .Nowadays ,so many teenagers are addicted to it for they are poor in controlling themselves .what’s worse ,lots of the teenagers play computer games instead of going to school,and some of them even stop schooling .
There is obvious that some entertainments can do harm to us ,.In my opinions,as a undergraduate,we should learn to choose what is really good to us and do things in a appropriate way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9ee82507-830b-3d3b-9626-556f363885c0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Today relaxation in our life is becoming more and more important.And it isn't simply a state of mind.
It is a lifeway what we need in our life and it helps us have a more positive state in physics and spirit.
At the same time, there are kinds of amusements for relaxation.
Be aware that painful or negative physical feelings may become less when a person is relaxation.
But when we enjoy them ,we must know that not all of them are having good affect on us. Even some of
them are harmful to us.For example,computer games are attractive for most of the youth.But if someone
spend too much time on it,it may cause him have less time for study.What's more,it may lead the man
who fall into it too much become escaping the real world.Right relaxation can keep your passion in
your life and negitive relaxation may damage your future.
As a current student in university we should have the correct opinion in relaxation.We need struggle
in our life and we need reaxation ,too.But when we want to have a relaxation we hade better choose the way
which fits us most.If you have studied a whole day ,you can choose some sports for relaxation.And if you
do some physics jobs a lot ,you may read a book after dinner.Life is quiet and simple.And if you do that
well you have known how to enjoy your life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 687a253b-ce7f-3b96-bc49-cc6ba84d9314> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
What will you do when you are tired? Play sports? chat with friends?go shopping?or just have a rest?there are kinds of relaxation in life,they help us relax both our body and spirit.After one-day working,you may need mental relaxation.then ,dinking a cup of coffee in a small but quiet cafe may make you feel comfortable.Some students may choose computer game for relax.
since there are so many relaxation methods,problem comes out.Not all relaxation methods are good.Methods such as meditation,are useful ways to bring your emotions balance,and playing sports are also a good choice.But some relaxation methods don't work for you.for example,computer games may mnake you relax,but,it may do harm for your eyes.this may get more kicks than halfpence.Some other bad methods like violent campaign can't make you relax as well.
As a college student,our most important work is studying.so,choosing a right way to relax ourself when we are tired is neccessary thing.What we do,should be responsable for out study.Listening to music,having a walk,or lying for a while can make studying more efficient.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e964cf86-05f7-3fe2-b9d8-910e23085594> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many activities in our daily life, many of them help us to relax ourselves, to give us a happier life.
Many entertainments are acknowledged to helpful,
but others may not be lucky. If it is not done in its way, it may do harm. We all know that when we rush to a swimming pool before some preparing work, there  always is a accident. You will suffer a lot, to be worse , you may not want to swim again. So entertainment must be done in its way, only when we done the right thing we can benefit from it.
As a student of scut, I think a activity is very necessary . we can not make the study be the only thing in our life, there are many thing waiting us to conquer. But when we want to relax , we must think how to do it suitably, evaluate it value firstly. And do remember that safety is the most important thing ,if you can insure everything is ok, then just have fun.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7a17e63f-0040-3167-9478-2b508e664cad> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of relaxation in our life,such as playing video games,doing some sport,etc.Especially in college,we have much time that we can do whatever we want.Though most of the relaxations are good for our health helping us studying well,some of them have a bad influence on us.
Taking computer game as an example,computer game may bring me happy or help me relax myself,but many students are addicted to it.Such as my brother,he didn't pass most of his exma just because playing computer game,so he can't graduate and get adegree now.It dose not mean I think we can't playing computer game.We just can't keep playing computer game but forget what we should do as well as other relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 564da495-c337-3783-8ce9-abbc6dd42af5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
What do you uauslly do at your free time?There may be different answers for different people.We used to watch TV,but now,we have variety of entertainments.
That is what I want to talk about.we may get relax in the entertainments which do some halm to us.For example,after working,you are tired,then you play basketball with other people.It can't make you feel well.But if you getting a cup of tea or go for a walk,you will feel comfortable.Or you may have a better idea.
As a university student,we study at most times in the day,some people spend too munch time on play computer games at night,then they get tired in the other day and always want to sleep.In my opinion,students should not stay at night,it's not good to your health,and I don't think that driking coffee is good habit.We could go out and have fun with group,comunicating with your friends.Have a good habits and relax everyday.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 29ffa890-3312-335b-bbed-a3af3698ee57> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know, there are many kinds of relaxation in our lives. For instance, we can play instruments to make us feel soft,
we can travel to appreciate the beautiful sights, we can also play computer games to relax.
But not all these activities make positive contributions to us, some of them even do harm to us. On one hand, doing physical
exercises can not only fit our bodies, but also contribute to our determination. It's such a kind of relaxation that really
benefits us physically and mentally. On the contrary, some of the relaxations seem to be not so health. Like playing computer
games, an ordinary kind of relaxation among teenages, it is bad for our eyesight and damages our intellegence as well.
From my standpoint as a college student, I think we have the ability to select the true way to relax ourself. By choosing the
correct entertainments, we can benefit from these activities and harvest a great relaxation. For those who are keen on the harmful
activities, we can help them to get out the trap and join us. Only then can we enjoy the happiness of relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 801dfe1d-b8eb-3f06-8eda-0a94c5379367> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is many different activity in our life,Such as swimming and
running.and these ease ways always have great effect on our life.
As we know,Many Activities like sports can build our body,and keep
our's healthy,It also can make our feel energic every day.but there
still some activities are unsuitable even have negative effect on our
modern life.Sometimes,these improper activities will do harm on our
health,even hurt our body.
In my opinion,Take some extracurricular activities that can make our
feel better and let us feel great-hearted are completely necessarily,
As a university man,a kind of people that will face to many different
challenge,so we have to face these problem with a good body.Many
relaxation can make our feel relaxed and it also should be advocate.
Because after a whole day's study.We may feel tired,and if we have a
good relaxation like a ball game or singing,our body will soon relive.
So I think,take some activities is really necessarily,But we must be
careful and recognize what is we can do and what is we shouldn't do.
and it will make our enjoy our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d806cf42-9a55-3148-a6c1-30192c7a58f7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of relaxation in our lives. People relax themselves in those relaxation .However,not all the relaxation do well for people. They may lose themselves in relaxation to disturb their lives and study.
Nowadays technology has developed so fast in many aspects, especially electron and network.More and more people would like to sit in front of the computer whole day not to walk outside.They spend too much time playing games chatting with people who they haven’t met.Because of that,they may get fatter and fatter.However, some relaxation do make benefit to people.For example,doing sports may make people stronger.\
As one college student, I think study is most important in my life.but doing some relaxation may do well for us.So we should do some relaxation not to lose ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 85e15937-d679-32f2-ad35-be40bfe19fc0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the developing of our life ,more and more entertainment can be choosed for us to relax our body.
But is every one good for us?
Of course not,Although there are many things we can do to relax,there are more things that would bring
us bad habits that most people often prefer.On the one hand,such as singing,reading ,these are very good
for us ,exercise can be another wonderful choice to relax,including running and riding.These healthy activities
are all right choices
On the other hand,a lot of things we often choose can just do bad for us,in college ,many students like
playing computer games to relax,but that just cause many problems.If we play computer games too much ,we would
feel tired on the seccond day,and just don't want to do our homework,in my opinions ,computer games can be
anything but a kind of activity for us to relax!!!!!!!
That's all of my opinions about relaxation in life as a college student.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 56544b39-64b5-3fd9-b307-3cd793c38f58> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society is developing fast, more and more entertainments come to our daily life. Although these entertainments make our life more colorful and do good to us, some of them are really inappropriate and even bad to us. So we should try to treat them appropriately. As a college student, I think everyone needs relaxation in life. Appropriate relaxation makes a person more active and work more effectively. However, too much relaxation can make a person lose energy. He or she may be addictive to entertainments and does not want to work any more, which is  really damaged to not only the individual, but also the society. The development of the society may slow down because of it. So we must learn to control ourselves .treat relaxation in a appropriate way. Do not lose yourself in the entertainments. Once we can do so, we can get rid of the bad of relaxation and make good use of it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1a671502-ef06-33ea-bee2-f5b601254d34> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There're lots of type of relaxation in our life.In my mind,a relaxation is a way to reduce  our stress come from our life.Computer games,ktv,exercise even smoking all of them can be a way to relax a people.Our human being living in such a competitive world always try to find our different way to relax ourself.
Living is becoming harder and harder.Trying to find a way to relax ourself is benefit to our daily work.After a busy time ,do climbing,go to ktv with friends...Relaxation can make us be more strenth to fight with our life.Apparently,not all the way to relax is good for us.Smoking has become a very serious problem in this world.It can give us a few time wonderful but hurts our body and it obviously not a good chioce for us to relax.Same as smoking can be drugs and so on.
There also a group of people suffering so much stress that is our college student.We need to face so  much compete in college from our schoolmate to fight for a good future.College life is such  as a small society life,we also have to suffer a lot not only our study but also our emotion problem and any other things.If we do not have a right way to relax,we can not do good in so many things.Trying to find a right way to relax ourself is important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b6caff66-c031-3c67-891f-580967189293> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
now we have a lot of time and ways to relax ourselfs as a college student.Proper relaxation certionly can be benfit to our.And it's also known to all that if we don't conter ourselfs and spent too much time to relax ,things will be terrible.
As a college student,i think playing balls or doint other ways of sports is a nice way of  relaxation in life.First,it can build our body,and make us stronger and more healthy.Second,it don't like computer games.Fow of people are addicted in it.Thus we also have time to study.
And computer games,many studends waste time on them.there are so many students liking playint them.so of course someone will be addicted.so we must pay attition to them.And de careful.We can't play them day anf night.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b889be95-be9c-3225-ba63-bc7d2bd2aa39> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,relaxtion is very important to all of us in our daily life .
There are various of ways to relax .For example,we can listen  some beautiful music like
classic music and pop music,which can help people have a rest both mentally and physically.
Besides ,we can go outside to do some sports ,playing basketball,taking a walk ,running
about 10 minites,all these can help us become healthier and happier.What's more ,a lot of
young people like playing computer games to relax themselves,but I think too much computer
games can do great harm to a person.So people should have ralaxtian in their life in the
properly time and choose the properly way.
As a college student like me,I think we should learn more knowledge in our spare time,
because in my mind,learning is one of the way of relaxation.Also ,college students should
take more exercise to keep their body stonger and healthier.Watching movies and having a tour
are also very effective ways of relation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e350b7fd-7160-3843-a257-d3871b614fa4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are kinds of different relaxation in our life. Someone may prefer to do sports, while others would like to read some books. Someone choose to watch TV or see a movie, while others would rather play computer games.
Everyone needs relaxation in our daily life. Not all relaxation, however, can benefit us. Even worse, some relaxation may do harm to us. Take playing computer games as an example. Maybe to some game-lovers, playing computer games is the best way to reduce pressure. It is true that playing computer games is not harmful as long as we play it in the appropriate way. But once we get addicted to it, we play it day and night and hold up all our works because of playing computer games. Then, playing computer games no longer a good relaxation, it would not only waste our time, but also do harm to our health.
As a freshman, I consider having relaxation properly is the most important thing. There are some many appealing entertainments in our college life, so self-control is of the most importance. In order to make good use of every minute, we should make a schedule, telling ourselves when to work and when to take a rest. Only when we balance work and relaxation, can we lead a meaningful and happy life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 50ae4d40-37ad-3065-a3ef-47a4874645b6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various entertainment activities in our life.
Some of these activities are helpful to us physically and mentally.However,some are not  fit ,even harmful to our health.
As an undergraduate,I think we should choose the healthy activities while being aware of the bad effect of the wrong activities.
1.The don'ts
As an undergraduate ,we cannot take part in a avtivity such as Trick Playing,skating in the road,which  may harm others.
In addition,we cannot do the sport which doesn't do harm to others but may hurt ourselves,Excessive drinking,Being late to play games,etc.
2.The does
there all kinds of activities we can do to enrich our colleage life .
For instence,Having a picnic outdoors,Swimming in the swimming poor ,Go biking inthe weakend,and so on.
With diverse entertainment activities,we can benifit from them as long as we choose the right way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID dd2066e1-0eb0-3cb3-bfef-96eef635f9ae> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of relaxation in life.In our busy lives,relaxtions are absolutely necessary,which alllow us to have a rest.and then we can work more energeticly.
But every coin has two sides.Some relaxations are beneficial,but some are uncomely even do harm to us.For example,doing some sports  is a helpful relaxation,which can make us keep fit.Playing computer games is bad if you spend too much time on it.And reading can expand our horizon which is a good relaxation.Some limited sports are dangerous.
How do we deal with it? As a student of university, I think we should analyse the benefit and harm of the relaxations before we bring them effect.And we must control the time  that we spand on the relaxations.Pay attention to work and rest.And then I think we will have a brilliant life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2f78d29b-2da9-39f0-afc7-79c97efed3d7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As there are so many kinds of relaxation in life ,we can have power to work and enjoy a
wonderful life.
As a college student ,we have more freedom in time than before.So, we have the right
to choose the kind of relaxation we like.A lot of boys like to play basketball after class,
and some like to paly tennis.Also there are many people enjoy reading books when time is
enough.But ti is certainly that groups of students usually play computer games not only
when time is free,but also in it is limited,which calls our notice.
In my opinion,it is important to choose a right way to relaxe,the way actually relaxe us
as well as not disturbing our former life.And those so-called relaxation,like play computer
games frequently, which does harm to our studying and working, is forbiden.
I suggest that college student have a sport for relaxation,even just go for a walk in a cool day.
It is meaningful and rewarding

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ccc883dd-6988-34c0-aa28-19d276502e8d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various of relaxations in our daily life,such as sports,singing,playing computer games,shopping and so on.Especially as the development of the society,the ways of the relaxations are broadening.We can go to KTV;we can go travelling ,we can play table games etc.
As so many relaxations as mentioned above,we should have an eye on the effects of them.Some ralaxations are of  great advantage,but some of them are unappropriate.Even some of them have a side effect on us.Take my friend June for example.June previously study well.One time when he have a touch to the computer games,he felt it excited and loved it.From then on he often played it and he became addicted to it.In order to play it day and night,he gave up his study.Finally,he failled his final exam and he felt regret having done these.
As far as I am concerned,we can have relaxation in life but we should not be addicted to them and affect our daily life.Appropriate relaxation can ease the pressure from work and study as well as make us more active so that we can work better.If we spend too much time and energy on it,the disadvantage comes.Consequencely be careful and make a balance with work and relaxations.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e4e2e521-e679-3d16-b708-3416609d3c8b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many amusement activities in our lives.As we konw,some of them will benefit us,
but others may bring some harm for us.For exampel,computer games will bury us in it,and we
may just play it without do anything.
As a undergraduate,there are some views from me. first,we can enjoy some amusements in our sparetime
but do not wallow in them.Amusements can relax us , make us happy and give our body
a rest so that we can pump more energy in the work or study.second,we need to cultivate our
interest in the amusement which can bring benefit instead of some boring and harmful games.
if we do so, we can earn many things form the amusement besides happiness.finally,we may can
increat somebenefit amusement to ourselvesand all people we love.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2f158898-ce42-396a-98a0-b8b081165177> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many entertained activities in our life.Such as music,sports,games,computer games,and so on.Entertainment is an impotant part of our life.
I think relaxation is necessary for our physical and psychological health.Sport can let our body more strong ,which can let us learn out the importance of unit.What's more,some games or sports will make us more confident.I think it's an fundanmental reason why people like entertainment.Third,relaxation will reduce pressure.Now a day,people's pressure become greater and greater,so entertainment is very necessary for us.Although some entertainments are good for us,but others may be harmful. for example,if you play computer games very frequently,your study may fall behind others.In addition,some sports are very dangerous,which may make us injured if we have not been careful.
In my oppinion,entertainment is necessary,but we should be more carefully when we take part in.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8e6d9fce-fa6a-36d9-9789-4371dc13c18a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as the development of technology,our life become more and
more wondefful.And we can relax ourselves by different means so that we
can study and work more actively in our worktime.
However,though relaxation is so important for us,if we don't make
good use of it,it would bring some bad result to our life.For example,
now,computers are brought into more and more families,but in the meantime,
many students addict themselves into computer games.On the one hand,
sometimes playing games can relax our brain from heavy work and study life.
But on the other hand,many student didn't finish their homework because
of playing too much games.So relaxation may benefit to us,but if we can't
control our relaxation time,it would do hard to us.In addition,we also can
read some good books in our spare time,it can be useful for our study and
work as well as relaxing our ourselves.
As a univercity student,I have much time to do my favorite things.
But I think I wouldn't spend too much time on playing games.In my opinion,
we should read more books to enrich our knowledge or do some sport in our
spare time so that we can have a strong body to work.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 262d69f3-538d-3359-97e0-7ef111a8824a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is no doubt that There are many of fantastic activities in our life.Some do good to us,but the other are harmful to us. What
activitis we choose couts most.
At first,suitable ralaxation benifits to us because it relases us form heavy pressue in our study and daily life .
Sometimes life is hard to us.when running across difficulties,we feel down and don't know  how to release attentions on our
pain.while,reasenable relaxation will recuse us form our low mood.Such activities are listening to music,paying sports,
talking to your friends and watching moives.At that time ,you will forget your pains and calm yourslef down so that you can
solve problems better in the future.
And then, those who are addicted to computer games or playing other games will eat bad eggs.At  first, chances
are that they will be granted for they daily life ,they families and they frireds.In additions ,they may  fail in their study
because they waste time in games .
In a word,only when we choose right activities for us ,will we be able to make activities be good too our study and life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5604b4c5-045d-36c1-9e3d-d53dd72b3807> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,our life are becoming better and better,things changing a lot,and there are more
and more kinds of activities for relaxation.Someone likes to play sports to enjoy time,they
think it's healthy and funny.People also like to play musical instrument,they do it to relax
themselves.Going traveling or having a party with some friends is also a porpular way for amusement
now.People's life get more enjoyable.
For all these ways to get fun,some of them have more adventage then disadventage,and some
way are not.Some healthy way for amusement like playing sports may make people more healthy and
realx themselves,so playing sports is always being popular.But some other ways like having
party all night with wine or drug are obsolutely very un hearthy,it's may get people very
happy or very high,but it's not good for body.And some other ways may be very dangerous and
even get one's life.Different amusement may get different result.
In my opinion,everyting have two side,whatever you do for amusement,you can get happy and
it also have some disadventage,and it's sure that some ways get more disadventage,but what we should
do is to make things control by us when we do it for amusement.This way,way can get ourselves
relax and happy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 43b66c2d-f256-3e8e-a96b-a8a5bc421f2d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are sorts of relaxations in our daily life, such as playing sports, playing computers, singing and dancing.
With much busy work in our schedules, we always need different forms of activities to relax ourselves. In this angle of view, many of them do well in both our health and mood. After proper relaxation, we can study or work in a better condition. However, there are some activities improper for us as well, which are even harmful to our health. For example, though computers are useful for us to relax, long-time using may hurt our eyes and energy too.
In my point of view, as a university student, I think we should take relaxation properly, which means appropriate ways as well as frequency. Only in this way can we take use of relaxation in order to serve our more efficient studies and happier works.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a59ef051-bedc-38df-aba5-81c3f8b23af6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more entertainments.People can get fun easily from more
ways.In the past,people could entertain only by watching a opera,reading a book or listening
to others' singing.But situations now are become different.We can get fun not only by
watching a TV show,but also by playing a game,chatting with others and playing guitar.It's
information times now,so we can have more ways to amuse ourselves.
However,as a sword has two sides,entertainments have their own traits.Some are good to
us while some can do harm to us.For example,we can get hun by watching a playlet.We can
totally relax ourselves and it doesn't cost us too much time or money.What's more,we can
have a short break if we are tired and sleepy.There is no harm for us to relax by this.On
the other hand,if we relax ourselves by playing a computer game,Idon't think it can be of
use.As a student in school,I know the harm causes by computer games deeply.I have ever been
adicted to playing computer games.As aresult,My marks decreased.We will be addicted to one
thing if we don't control ourselves.
I think we can relax ourselves by many ways.We,students in college,can relax ourselves
by running,playing basketball or playing badminton.We shouldn't be addicted to playing
games or watching American teleplay in the dormitory.We should be more outgoing and
exercise ourselves,so that we can do better in the coming challenge of society.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8394c3d8-39c8-3b4b-9471-d0558621ba2b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As a human-being, I believe there are some unique characters that make us different from other kinds of animas. The most significant thing is that we look forward not only for the matters but also for the inspiration.
We try our best and work hard to make money in order to own a house, buy a car. That is what we want for matter. But it seems boring when we always stress ourselves that we may feel we are empty in inspiration. So in the daily life we also relax,
There are plenty of a activities in our daily life, Including sports, arts, friends meetings and so on. I don’t think which activity is good or bad for one, what I agree is that some activities are suitable but others are not. As a result, these activities may even cause harm.
As a college student, the first priority is always study. But we can’t study the whole time which will make us lack of EQ. In my opinion, we should exercise regularly to build a healthy body, watch some arts exhibition to open our field of vision, read some masterpiece to be more sciential.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4a437ff6-b27a-32e0-96c7-1a4f8af90f0c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of relaxations and activities in our lives,which can make our lives better or worse,choosing a different one can our life different,so we must be careful.
Of course,a interesting relaxation can make us happy such as parties,sports....and these not only let happy,but also have a good influence in our health or study;but every coin has tow sides,there are some rlaxations harmful for us.For example today many poeple are addicted to computer games,on which they spend much time so that they neglect their study.
As a undergaduate,I think every rlaxation has tow sides,so it's important for our self-control,not the kind of relaxation.If we have a relaxation in a proper time,then this can be a meaningful relaxtion.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 72986751-b896-3c24-ab71-1ed5cff91032> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of science,there are variety entertainments in our normal life such as playing sports,watching movies,playing computer games.So long as you can image,it can be come true.As the old saying,every coin has two side.Obviously,entertainment is the same.On one hand some entertained activities are good for our physical or mental health,but on the other hand some are improper or even dangerous for our present life and even the future life.So as a college student,it is really important for us to distinguish what is right,what is wrong.But how can we do that?We are just the fish of the complicated society.I think the most effetive way is to avoid.What should we do first is to make a good friend who can company you if you need.On the contray,we should refuse the invitation of some friends who you don't know him deeply. And stay away from some complicated place such as disco,bar,net bar and so on.Don't always try something new if you just feel life is so boring.We can call the help of our friends and families.All in all,though things around us are colorful,we must control ourself and avoid the bad things.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d72fa2be-2aae-33c4-be03-3529d54381ff> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
These days, there are various kinds of relaxation in our daily life.For instance,we can play basketball or badminton with our friends.Additionally,watching an interesting film in the cinema is a good choice.In sunny days,we can go sightseeing with our family and relax ourselves.
Although a majority of relaxation in life benefits us much,a small number of relaxing activities do harm to our mental and physical health.It is no doubt that youngsters enjoy playing computer games at home,such as WOW.They got a lot of fun from the games.However,they  usually lose control and become addicted to the computer games.Therefore,they prefer to stay at home all day and refuse to go out.What's worse,most of them keep playing computer games for a long time and stay up late at night sometimes.A lack of adequate rest make their health get poorer day by day.
As a college student,for my part,we should have the ability to choose the beneficial relaxation as well as control ourselves.We should be aware that stopping for a while to have a good rest when playing computer games is necessary for us.To relax ourselves effectively,we should stay outdoors and have sports more often as the classes are heavy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8296f3f2-34c6-3160-a38d-aac67ab954ff> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
A variety of activities for our relaxation makes the life colorful.
What we can popularly refer to are sports,music,art and so on.If our
life is lack of these kind of activities , I think,the day would be
very boring.
But as the saying goes,"There is opposition in all things".Some
entertainment activities have good effect on our life ,but others is
not suitable for teenagers and may do harm to us.
For example,if we work on a computer for a long time,
what we can do to amuse is not to go on playing games.It would be better
if you choose other ways,like playing table tannis ,enjoying the  fun
of instrments , even chatting with our guys and so on.The reason is that
spending lots of time on computer does harm on our eyes,what we need is
to do some activities to relax ourselves pysicallt and mentally.
What is more,it is beyond all dout  that there are many negative
amusement,like watching movies about sex and violent .Someone will enjoy
the fun of those ,but they may  confuse us and even worse ,it may lead
us to crime .
As a college student nowadays , in my opinion, we should improve our ability
to recognize what are  helpful  or harmful for us . On the one hand,our ability
is limited to change the surroundings we live ,and one the other hand , ways to
amuse vary person to person,right or wrong is hard to set some standards.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 88c6649b-9733-3698-bc1c-e35303567574> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
life is a combination of hardships and enjoyment.So ,we should learn how to relax ourselves and particiate in various of activites, for instance ,basketball,table tennis and so on.There are so many activities that we don't know how to select these activties benefiting us.
Among these ativities ,some are good and easy for us to attend.Others may be hard and improper ,even dangerous. It is necessary for ecah to participate in these activities wisely,who expects to relax and benefit our bodies.
As a college student,being to wander in the stage of sociaty ,we not only require advanced acknowledge and skilled expriment,also should own a strong and healthy body.Thus,participating in activities actively can strongthen our body and widen our eyes,
especially,enable us acquiring those acknowledge out of contexts.
In short,activties and contexts are two legs of person.each leg is fatal for us to grow.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID adaa3c05-5231-3bdb-8a47-914c939dcd69> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society, many a person have all kinds of stress and so there exits many kinds of ativities for fun, such as, attending a party, singing songs in the KTV, camping, traveling, and all so.
Those activities of relaxation are have two sides in our life.On the one side, it can help us to  completely relax  ourselves and forget our trouble in life, which makes us have an active attitude toward our life.On the other side, some of them are temptable, which make people degenerate.Some people may trap into it,such as the  gambling.
As a student in the university, I think we should properly relax ourselves and we should rightly say no when we meet the bad tempters. We should protect ourselves and don’t get adimite into it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 07359696-fb30-3d91-98ff-f8a7304f44a8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are so many activities in our daily life.In modern life, people are under the
great pressure.When people have the space time,they will choose some to relax themselves.
For example,they may play some ball games or go to the gym to shape their bodies.
But you should kown there are both advantages and disadvantages for us to take part in
some activities.If you do it regularly and properly,you can get the benefits from it.
juust like taking a walk with family after meals,or going to the gym to dance and yoga
after work.However,if you want to have fun and even set free yourself,things will change.
You may waste a great deal of your energy and that leads to a sleepy work time the next day.
Also,it is very bad for your body.You should care about yopur own health!!
As for us college students,it is important to realise which ki8nd of activities are
right to choose.We are supposed to do something healthy.I advice that we can go out for
sightseeings with close friends,do some sports like soccer.basketball,table tennies ang so
on.Remember do not goto the night club for fun ang even drink too much,and you'd better
refuse to go to a karaoke for a whole night.Come on,everybody!let's take part in a good
relaxation in life!!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID abf50f00-cc3a-354e-8f50-37dd39e6b1b5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are kinds of relaxation in our life .They make us happy and realx.Nobody can refuse them.At our city,we can relax by relaxation.So relaxation is our friend.
We can visit many relaxation .For example,we can play football ,visit a party or go  hiking.Some of them are good ,they can make us health .Others are bad ,they make us unhealth like drinking.So visiting a good relaxation will let us relax and health.
People visit relaxation at weekend .After one week's work ,they want to have a relax .But   they often go to night club.To tell the truth ,it is a very bad place .It makes people wallow.
As an academician ,I think we should go to a health palce like court to have a relax.It can  make us relax and happy .We can play football with our friends .or go hiking with your girl  friend .It sounds very good.
In our life ,we can't leave work and study. And we also can't leave relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7c3f719e-9b0c-32cb-8eff-977161742c0d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We have many ways to relax after the tiredness of a whole day, such as watching TV shows,playing sports,chatting with friends,and so on. but with the high developement of technology, the relaxation in our life increasingly becomes abundant.we can playing games of smartphone wherever we are. Using the smartphone becomes a popular way to while away our relax time.
There are so many ways to pass our time. However,as the saying puts " Every coin has two sides. ",all the ways to relax aren't good for ourselves. There are many bad games or moives having bad effect for us. Some just waste our time.For example,playing comeputer games or watching some soap shows from which we can't attain anything isn't a good way to relax. But playing sports,reading good books and taking part in activities can do well for us.
As a college student, we should have our own attitude to the choice of relaxation. we should know what is worth to do,what isn't.Being responsibility for ourselves should be the main idea of choosing the way of relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2ba53f43-c49e-3017-9aa8-de95bc90da42> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all, nowadays there are a variaty of activities around us.However ,it is important for
for us to choose from such a great many acvtivities.
For example, after a long period ofn hardworking,participating some amusing activities is a
very wonderful way to relax yourself and make you work more effective.On the contrary,if you
are involved in various activities and as a result you can not emphasize on the your study
and work,such activities is harmful to you.
Nowadays we can see that many university students are involved in computer games and spend
very little time on study. They are only waste their life and forget their responsibility
of  their family and the whole society.
Though there are a lot of activities for us to choose form,we must make sure that we will not be involved in them and emphasize on our
study and work.In a word,only when you emphasize youself on study and work , can various activities
really do good to you.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 60be3d1c-8c2f-3d05-8ab4-7d36c9635fc1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation is an important part of our live. After working or studying, we need do some
relaxations to relax our bodies and our spirit.
There are so many kind of relaxation around us. We can do sports, see movies, read books as well as play games. They can make our life more lively and interesting. Even though we need some healthy relaxation, some relaxations are not available even will destroy our life. We should keep away from such as drug taking, gambling, and so on.
As a university student, I think we need some relaxations. However, it's an important that control the time of relaxations. There are many things to do in the university. We do should not waste all the time on playing. Studying is what we should to be
absorbed in.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 07de4851-a8c1-3fba-9df6-fec444e1014b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the life level improving,nowadays,people live a new life style that maintains more entertainments than before.
For example,some people go to sing,dance for fun and do exercise,still some drink with friends,others will play computer games or
games installed inside their mobilephone and so on.
All these entertainments,however,are not beneficial to us.without doubt,sometimes it is good for people to relax themselves
by singing or dancing after working a whole day.But still some entertainments seem to not be so reasonable such as overdrinking
or playing games days and nights,which will cause us out of energy instead of relaxation.Therefor,we must know choosing a beneficial
way for relaxation.
As a college student,I think we are supposed to know what we should do and shouldnot.so many classmates of mine enjoy playing
games days and nights, not for relaxation but for overlike.In my opinion,it is not good for us ,wasting much time.Instead,we can do
exercise like playing basketball or football sometimes.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 93ae6190-0953-3ae1-bf3a-68bca32f8490> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many entertainment in our life,such as chess,music,computer games and so on.
Everyone of them is funny and interested,which can relax ourselves in our life.
However,it is not right all the time.
For example,computer games.When we feel tired or boring in our life,it can be the best way
for us to find some fun in our life and improve our energy to solve the problom.
But in other situation,it may cause the bad result.When the students need to pay more
attention to their study,computer games will call their attention.In other word,students
can't do their best because of the relaxation.
In my opinion,relaxation is needed but not nessity.Nowadays,we face more and more pressure
in our life and relaxation play an important role for us to relax.However,we should limit
ourselves.What we should do is do them when we relly need them or when we can't stand our
life.Only at this time ,we can benefit from it better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5cb7a0ba-e671-38e2-a316-6cc338ea4143> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Living in a big city like Guangzhou with a fast rhythm and endless pressure,we need to learn to relax ourselves in time , so as to stay in a wonderful state and greet the challenges to come.There are various activities that are healthy and positive, while harmful ones don't get lost themselves because of this .
As is known to all , jogging is a great way to exercise and have the body relaxed .What's more ,it's suitable for people in all ages . Sometimes singing a song on a lawn in the open air instead of a sealed room can be a even better way to gain relaxation ! In this way,we will be able to communicate with the nature more easily and therefore have more fun.That is just fancinating !
However , as a college student ,I strongly oppose activities as follows : watch movies or TV day and night  or play computer games and failed to figure out that himself was seriously poisoned by that ! I think we should relax ourselves in a healthy and scientific way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 76b9372e-dcb4-37c5-9b93-99b23a433f85> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,we all have kinds of activities for entertainment.We can relax ourselves, have fun with our friends and enrich our life.But we also need to know,some activities may be bad for us.And we need to know how to distinguish and refuse.
As we all know,we can get along well with our friends by having some activities.When we have some trouble,we can also find the happiness from some activities.Such as playing basketball with friends,singing,having a movie and so on.Our life will be better because of them.
Of course,most things have double face.In our life,there are many activities which will be  harmful for us.Such as drink wine with others,gaming,eat violate medicament and so on.They will be bad for our life and lead us to do something wrong.
In our life,there are so much bad activities,so we need to have the ability to differentiate and we have to say no to them.When we see our friends joining the bad activities,we should stop them quickly.We should choose the activities which are good for us and share them with our friends or family.Then we can make our life better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 18a420e6-c76e-3b07-8b1d-1561f446fa9d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Thanks to the development of economy,our life become more colourful,especially in our entertainment.For instance,we can watch a moive in the cinema,listen to the music,watch TV shows,play vedio games,etc.
Relaxation does help us relax ourselves,refresh our mind.But,obviously,some relaxatoin ways are inappropriate,or even harmful.
As a university student,we have more freedom than before.That means we have more relaxation.In my opition,we should learn to relax ourselves,not indulge ourselves because of the relaxation.We should take some sports after class,it can not only relax ourselves,but also build up our body.When we are tired,we can listen to some music to refresh.In the weekends,we can go out with our friends.But some university students don't relax themselves properly,they play computer games or watch TV dramas all night,which affect their study badly.So we shouldn't relax in that way.
In a word,we should learn to relax properly.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 539fe47e-3e9a-311e-a180-96ec7fee1002> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We need relaxation.There are a lot of activities in relaxation we can choose when we feel tired,boring and weak.It's necessary for us to take some relaxtion activities when we come across these bad time.However,not all relaxation is good.
As we know,there are always quite a few people who is addicted in computer ganmes.In most of cases,some relaxation,like computer games,has such bad effect on our life,especially we young students.what's more,many dangerous relaxation,like gamble and intemperance,is banned in society for the terrible result they often cause.
In face with the above problem,more and more people are encouraged to take more healthy lifestyle,including relaxation.As a freshman,we need a efficient style because of the invisible presure from study. If not so,we may be taken in,physically and mentally.Here is some advice.Healthy ball ganmes,such as football,basketball,volleyball,table tennis and so on,all take a part in our relaxation life.Some girls may dislike these strenuous exercise,and they also can choose some other exercise like swimmnig,high jump,runing,diving.
In cluding,relaxation is an important part of our life,so that wo have to face and use it in a positive way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 92354374-4267-33ab-8d57-08070d19f3de> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,our life is filled with various kinds of relaxation,which may do a great
difference to us.As a matter of fact,we ought to know what kind of relaxation is
benefitial to us.
Some kinds of relaxation are helpful for us,such as doing sports and reading good
books.These kinds of relaxation can not only help us get rid of tiredness of daily
life but also do good to our physical and mental health.However,some kinds of relaxation
may do harm to us.Take playing computer games too much for example,if a student plays
computer over two hours without rest,this "relaxation" will only be harmful for both
his body and mind.
As a university student,I hold the opinion that we should understand the value
of relaxation correctly.Relaxtion is important for us,but it can't replace study and
work.Relaxing appropriately will help us success easilier,but relaxing too much or
choosing wrong kinds of relaxation may lead us to the abyss of failure.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6270bd2d-ae50-3978-aa9f-6fc1037c7cb4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,we have different kinds of relaxation for entertainment.Some
relaxation may reduce our stress and relax us a lot,while others are inappropriate which
have a bad effect on us.In my opinion,there is no doubt that different rexalation have
different effect.And what we want is up to us. Our choices are important.
The following reasons can support my views.First and foremost,relaxtion can make our
life more enjoyable and reduce our stress.As we know,modern society
is a competitive society so we study and work very hard.After a long work,all of us want to
have a break.So we play basketball after class.We go to the gym for exercising after work.
These are not only a way to relax but also a way to inrich our daily life.So relaxation play
an important role in our life.On the opposite,we know that some relaxation will do harm to
our life.For example,some people like gambling.They think that it is a good rexalation.
However,as far as I am concerned,most people gambling can not control themselves.The often
lost their jobs,lost their kids,lost their family.This is absolutely out of control.
Form the foregoing,we can draw a natural conclusion that different relaxtion have
different character and we should choose the best activity for us which will make our life
more colorful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fdcd3df1-21ae-351b-ac2a-ce2dd63847ea> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are varities of entertainment and activities which is full of our daily life.For example,we go hiking on the weekend in order to relax ourself and have a happy hour.
Most of the entertainment activities do much good to us.For instance,go swimming regularly can build up our body and make us get stronger.Then,taking part in corporation activities makes us know more people and improves our ability.However,not all the entertainment activities are benifical for us.Such as,dancing in the disco is dangerous for girls because there are lots of lawless people and poison in the disco.
As a college student,I hold the opinion that we should select the entertainment activities  rationally.Most of things have two sides.Take going oline for example.Some people can extend thier eyeshot and learn a lot of knowledge by going online.But some one plays games  even scans inelegant website which do much harm to his work or study.Therefore,I think the key for jioning entertainment activities is that we must be rational.Only that can we enjoy our entertainment activities and relax ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cd954253-0853-308e-b6d7-8eb9b8b2f8be> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Among  our  lives,there  are  many  relaxations.For  example,We  can  go  out  to  a  resteraunt  with  our  friends  and  chat  for  an  afternoon,We  may  possibly  walk  alone
in  the  park  to  bring  us  back while  we  are  upset.Feeling  bored  after  a  day's  work,a  gymnasium  is  sure  to be  a good  palce  for  us.
Is  any  kind  of  relaxation  relaxed  to  our  lives?Actually  not.On the  one  hand  There is  no  doubt that  doing  exercise,chating  with  friends  in  coffee  house,watching  a  move  are  good for  our  lives.But  on  the  other  hand,what  about  going  to  a  disco,a  netbar,or dring  with  some  strangers  in  the  public  house.These  can  absolutely  do  a  big  harm  to  our  spirit  and  physics.
As  a  college  student ,I  think  we  should  have  some  healthy  relaxation.I  always
play  football  with  my  classmates  and  chess  with  some  friends  in  our  school.By  these  way,Both of  my  body  and  spirit  have  a  good  relaxation.And  I  can  always  keep  energy  due  to  these   healthy  relaxation  in  my  life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bbe6f022-d3a4-3beb-b9bc-00d11e43ba08> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various entainment in life,and it's necessary to relax ourselves for a balance life.
However,some of the entainment are good for us ,while others  are not quite proper,or even do harm to our body.For example,playing an hour of computer games can relieve our nervous ,but if you get a hook to those games,can not control yourself and waste a lot of time just playing them,you will become dizzy and more tired.
As a unversity student,I hold a view that we should learn to arrange our time perfectly.On one hand,we should make a list of things that you want to do today,and first thing first do.Therefore,we can make use of our time.On the other hand,after finishing our duty,we ought to take a break.It can refresh our mind and help to prepare the next work.As I have mension above,entaining in a proper time is prior,we should not become addicted to those are far away from reality,it is useless.
In a word,play after exhausted work,relax within our control.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0909d498-c49f-3e10-a1df-21a1b52aef86> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Living in such a busy society, we should take a rest sometimes.Therefore, there are so many relaxations that make us feel relaxed. When you suffer from stress,you can play basketball with your friends or you can leave your home and go out for a trip to calm down yourself. Watching a movie or reading a book if you are boring.In a word, we can't live without relaxation.
However, each coin has two sides. It is all sorts of relaxations that make us relaxed, but there are some relaxations witch can do harm to us. Although playing computer games can relax us, it will have bad effect in our life if we spend too much time on them. Some students go to the net bar to play computer games without eating and sleeping.
As a college student, on my point of view, we should be aware of what relaxations are good for us. We must choose a correct way to relax ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 85fbe0ec-30af-39f1-a172-76e87838f9d9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kind of relaxation activities in our life. Some of them might be good for us, however, some of them are not suitable and even cause damage to us.
As a college student, I have so many study work for my special field of study at school.To be honest, it will be really tired after a whole day studying and I do need a relaxation. So there comes a question, what relaxation is proper for us college students? For me, there's not thing better than sitting in front of my own computer and getting a round DOTA playing. But sometime I feel more tired after playing computer games.
So, what I want to say is, every relaxation might have it's advantages and disavantages, only we find the balance point of them can we get a real relax, both physical and spiritual.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4ac23a0d-87c3-3acb-a34e-51ed2dc57c77> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the rapid development of scientific technology and social economy,people's daily life has been full of various entertament.
Generally speaking ,all that entertainment can be divided into two parts.Beneficial ones and inappropriate ones.On the one hand,beneficial and healthy reactional activities can promote the quality of our life.On the other hand,some inappropriate activities will gradually do great damage to a person.
However,as a freshman,I  hold the belief that we should take ourselves under firm control so that we won't be attracted by some inappropriate activities.For example, we may get in touch with drugs,many young people think taking drugs is a kind of entertainment.But obviously,it isn't.Therefore,when we can't change the circumstance,we should change ourselves in order to live a healthy life.What's more,someone with bad friends is more likely to be involved in bad activities,so we had better make friends with outsanding and kind people.Finally,I would like to say that only when we have a clear concept of entertainment can we make full use of it.
In a word,as long as we know what we should do and what we shouldn't,we certainly can make our daily life be full of varied and graceful reactional activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ada7424f-4921-3ace-b24c-e67be7519967> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays there are all kinds of entertainment in our life,such as music ,sport,enjoying
some novels,playing computer games and so on.Without any doubt,those are  ways to relax
while working or studying hard.However,we should take different attitude towards different
kinds of entertainment. Some entertainment benefit ourself very much. Tired of the homework
we can go out to do some sport to refresh your mind.Sick of the job,we can read a little novel
or enjoy some music. what we must know is that not all kinds of entertainment is alway beneficial
to us.Some kinds of entertainment just like playing computer games do pose a threat to our health
mentally and physically if you are addicted to it.Addicted to it,many students or employees abandon
their own studys or jobs and ever refuse to have meal since that will occupy their game time.
In my opinion , it is very necessary to relax.We,however,should choose a proper way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 26f70d24-989d-3cea-838a-5da7bb830959> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is no doubt that allo of us need relaxation in our daily life .Nomatter what kind of
relaxation we choose ,we cannot ignore it.
There are so many ways to relax. You can listen to soft music ,watch comedies ,drink some tea ,or just close your eyes take a rest .As college students  ,many of us choose to play pc games to relax themselves .
We should relax ourselves  in a right way .It is no wrong .But somebody play pc games  to much .They always face to the computer deep in the night!Playing  too much pc-games can do harm to our health and have little effect on relaxing .And what’s more ,we get addicted to it easily.
It is a right choice to listen some music or read some interesting books. We can also hang out with our good friends to see  some beautiful sights ,have a good dish or snacks.
Relaxation is important in our life .Without relaxation ,we may easily get into a bad body condition. It help us have a good mood and refresh our energy to do better in later study or work .
A machine can’t work all the time ,so a man cannot work or study all the time .Relaxation is a must for everyone  .when studying ,just study hard ,when relaxing ,choose a wise and effected way to relax. Only in this way ,can we work or study much better .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6eb0c40b-cc18-3e53-960e-299c4c940298> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are varieties of fantastic activities in our life.Some do good to us,but the other are harmful to us. What
activitis we choose couts most.
On the one hand,suitable ralaxation benifits to us because it relases us form heavy pressue in our study and daily life .
Sometimes life is hard to us.when running across difficulties,we feel down and don't know  how to release attentions on our
pain.while,reasenable relaxation will recuse us form our low mood.Such activities are listening to music,paying sports,
talking to your friends and watching moives.At that time ,you will forget your pains and calm yourslef down so that you can
solve problems better in the future.
on the other hand, those who are addicted to computer games or playing other games will eat bad eggs.At  first, chances
are that they will be granted for they daily life ,they families and they frireds.In additions ,they may  fail in their study
because they waste time in games .
In my opinions,What activitis we choose couts most.As a cllege ,wo shoud take responsaibility  for oursleves ,and chose
what do good to us.Only when we highligh reasonable relaxation activities,we can balance our life and study better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9898c027-8585-3e7b-8334-feff4f36a002> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are a multitude of relaxations,which broadly enrich our lives.Some of those relaxations is beneficial to us,nevertheless,those which is unappropriate or even harmful to us also exist.
Living in such a high-pace society,most of us have to bear,more or less,some pressure.Although the function of pressure shouldn't be denying,we still need some kind of relaxations to relax and recharge our battery.For instance,we may do some sports,traveling,singing and so on.relaxations like these are absolutely benificial.But,when trying to find some relaxations to relax,it's a neccesity for us to consider whether it is proper.
As is known,a quantity of college student are fond of going to KTV or hold a party together with friends.Unfortunately,place like KTV or the content of their party is unpredictable,and sometimes may be worrisome.They may start at deep night and drink as well.Kind of juvenility can easily lead to a mischance.
There are many complex and unproper relaxations in our life.As it is necessary for us to take some relaxations,we ought to maturely distinguish the good ones from the bad ones.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 99281ffe-fba8-34d7-b0ee-ad1ee8775e5f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
How do you relax yourself in your daily life? One thousand people may have one
thousand answers. Because there are plenty of relaxing activities in our life.
Boys sometimes playing games like football,basketball and swimming in their spire
time.As a girl, I may listen to some music or go shopping with my friends to relax my-
-self. Such this kind of relaxation can make people forget their confuse and bad mood
even give them a new soul that let them zealous when they work. What we have to mention
is that, there are also some ways of relaxation do harm to our mental and physical hea-
-thy. Take compurter games for example, when you play compurter games, you can't commun-
-icate with others face to face, you just in your game world, and what's worse, you may
be addicated to it.
As a student of SCUT, in my eyes, we should choose the right way of relaxation firstly
and remember not to relax for a long time constantly. We can play sport games with our fri-
ends, during this, we can not only keep our relationships with them, but relax and lead a
positive cample life as well.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 69758e98-66ce-30cc-8d67-ab1ab79f435d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowsdays,more and more entertainment we take part in.We can sing in ktv,surf the internet
and go shopping with friends,which bring us ralaxation.
It's useful for us to take part in activities like running and surfing the internet.On the one hand,we will be healther and konw more about the world,on the another hand,it relax us a lot.However,some activities do harm to us.For example,computer games can relax us if we just play it in a short time,but when someone is addicted in it,it will cause a great harm to him.
As a fresh man,we had better balance our relaxation in life.We can't be absorbed in harmful activities,besides,we should bring up good habits and take some helpful avtivities.
In one word,we keep away from harmful activities and take some avtivites which ralax us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0d645dcd-832a-3f5b-810f-860ac6b253d5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,we join in many activities for relaxation.For example,we can play basketball,swim,sleep,or even play computer games to relax ourselves.
But every coin has two sides.We'll do harm to ourselves if we relax ourselves in wrong way.For example,if we play computer games all the night,we'll hurt our body and eyesight.And if we play basketball in hours,we'll be so tired that we can't pay our attention to problems which we want to deal with.On the other hand,some activities which we join in for relaxation are beneficial to our life.Like reading books,we can not only relax ourselves but also broaden our view.
As a student in university,I think we should do something good for us for relaxation.We should not relax ourselves too much,too.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fd0941f0-80bf-3598-b5c1-77619079496e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many entirements in our life,such as sports,computer games,film,song...There is no denying that relaxation plays an important role in our life.
Some entirements are benifit forour body,for example,sports.The other hand,listening some songs can keep us relaxed,which can make our mind clear and excited.We can't keep working or
studying without relaxation.
However,every coin has two sides.Some entirements are harmful to our workand study.Computer games,a hot problem,is debated by more and more people.Studnets spend much time on them,which make a bad infulence to their study and living.
As a college student,from my sight,we should rightly face to the relaxaton.First,you should get advice from you friends and parents.Secondly,to be sure what you really need to do.In other word,If you are a student,then you just need to study mostly.Last but not least,
When the bad entirement will you,you must make your heart harder and harder,so that you don't lose yourself.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d4b78bf5-f214-312c-a36c-d2e8d00fc296> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Life has a lot of rich and colorful relaxation. For example, in the variety places, some play computer games at dormitories, some play chess with old friends, some will choose dancing or singing at KTV. What's more, in the different seasons, they are also different!
we have a spring outing in spring, swimming in the summer and so on.
Hoping to having a fantastic life, we must choose a series of relaxations. However, it's a difficult work. Some of the relaxations is good to us, the others, oppositely, do hame to us. So it's the first and the most important thing for us to  choose good and suited relaxation.
As a collage student, in my opinion, there are things which must be taken into account. First of all, collage students have a hard study job. The relaxations wo choose should make our cerebrums relaxed. These relaxations are good to our study. Therefore, all of persons wish that we would have an excellent future. As a result, we could choose some relaxatons that can bring up good hobby. Last but by not means the least, a good relaxation is always a term job. That means we should to choose some relaxations with our partners, and with the help of others, we is on and have a friendly life.
Every person has his opinion, there is mine. Choose your relaxations carefully, you will have a fantastic college life and different future.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 10630e99-a72c-3c7e-b4a0-6d6460e8b3cc> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are variety of amusement if our life.We can have a break after hard work,such as surfing internet,playing card ganes,or doing some exercise.
Those amusement are part of our life,we can not just work hard day after day.Some of amusement is bnenfit for us ,some is not.All of us like playing games,but the different games.computer games and ball games are toatlly completely different.If someone is lost in computer games and sit in front of the computer days and nights,it is a lot of harmful to him.but if he can control his time to have a wonderful experience,it will relieve the pressure of life and will have a better efficiency in the next work.Playing ball games can make you strong to conquer the difficulties you ever meet.
Opinion of mine,as a college student,we have to do something to make our life colorful more than just doing homework days and nights,but we have to control it not just playing for killing  your time .we should do something worthwhile.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0695569c-4879-3ad9-926c-360b9f390f3a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our society,different kinds of recreation have become more and more popular with people.We may enjoy singing,dancing,sporting and so on to relax ourselves.And the colorful activities bring us great happiness in deed.
However,as the saying goes,every coin has two sides.The relaxation also has its own virtues and faults.For instance,many young people fancy playing computer games.In fact,a short relaxation by playing computer games during the tense work does good to ourselves a lot.But there comes the problem that a number of students have abandoned themselves to the world of the games.Some of them who are addicted to it deeply even give up their studies to go to the net bar to make themselves feel relaxed.In addition,some activities of recreation may do harm to our mental health.For example,violence is included in many movies that should not been shown in public.
From my perspective,wo should also consider this in different angles.First,it's necessary for everyone to do something to relax themselves.It can make people more vigorous.
Second,there are exactly some trashes in some relaxation.So we must learn to how to distinguish them and reject to them firmly.Last but not least, our government should also take prompt actions to purify the market of recreation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 63c02c87-2c93-3063-9a9f-5744c77eb2ea> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life, there are all kinds of enterteiments.Some people love to go to KTV,
many of  people are interested in surfing on the internet.Besides these, playing
cards,playing mahjong,and so on.
As the saying goes,"all work and no play makes Jack a dull boy". But,we should
control ourselves. These activities could bring hapyies for us so that we might
can work and study better.But, sometimes, it can also sink us completely.For exzmple,
we can use the internet to seek something that we need,but if we play computer
games in whole day,we will hold up our work or study.
As a university student,I think we should combine the work or study and recreation
perfectly. Only when we do this can we see a meaningful life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a26e70cf-254b-3862-a3b5-6e4a6b534f0b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxatian in life
As we know , there are many kinds of relaxation activities in our daily life,such as
playing computer games,doing sports,listening to music and so on.These activities make
our lives more colorful.
However,every coin has two sides.Some relaxation activities are good to us,but the
other maybe not.For instance,it is a good way to listening to music when we are stressful
or unhappy,and doing sports is another good way to relax ourselves.On the contrary,playing
computer games not only has a bad influence on our study,but also is bad for our health.
As a college student, I have my own opinion.I suggest that all the people should choose
the correct relaxation activity,especialy for the college students,like me.Because only the
measurable way can really relax ourselves on physical and emotional.The college students
had better take control of themselves, more sports and less coputer games.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7706f72e-d0f0-3453-acc3-84182b59555e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relasation in life
There are many funny and happy activities we all love to play with our friends in
our daily life.However,in these activities,sometimes we have fun as well as the ac-
tivities we are playing are safe for us,while some are not we jues don't know.
For example,we play cards with our friends.It's so simple and really we are enjoy
it.It's obvious that we are sure we can be safe during the game.
Another example,we go to a pub to have a drink together.If we drink a little under
our control,we can not only relax ourselves but also be safe.It's the goal we go to
the pub.In some case,not everyone does like this.As the alcohol make people's mental
state higher and higner even out of control,these people will do some dangrous things
bad for themslves but they don't known under this circumstance.
In my opinion,it's just a funnuy activity.We play it just for fun.In the end of a
boring day,we understand everyone's such feelings that I want to relax myself,but sa-
fety is the most important one.We can and we should have fun but at the same time,even
more important,we must control the level of the game and protect ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2b12f40f-566c-3d1d-b475-095ee06206ef> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are a lot of different sorts of relaxations in life,such as playing
sports,singing,dancing,reading and so on.
Facing the stress from study and work ,people usually enjoys doing something interesting
and relaxing to relief themselves .However, as we all know ,some of the relaxations are
beneficial,while others are improper and even dangerous. Taking sports for an example ,
it's helpful for our body to dosome sports every day ,what's more ,playing sports contributes
to relax pressure in people's mind,but it also may bring us dangerous incident unexpectedly.
As for computer games,many yong boys enjoy playing computer games, when people feels down
,it may help him forget about it for a while ,but if someone devotes all the time in it ,it
must bring disadvantage that are terrible. If you are buried in the game at all,it is harmful
to both your physical health and psychic health.
Therefore, as a college student,my perspective to relaxation is dialectical.We should
choose the proper and helpful way to relax our life ,and also take it easy ,not to devote
all the time in it.Just like an old saying:too more is too bad.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 78835e00-adcc-3399-9b2c-084fc97a2180> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In today'society,our normal lives can be very colourful and intersting with the appearance
of many new inventions such as communication online face to face ,playing online games .On
the one hand,many entertainments are beneficial to our body and mental healty ,for example,
jogging with your friends after dinner can not only do help your digestion but also strength
en frendship.On the other hand ,some entertainments are just time-wasting or vicious to our
healty.For example,many teenagers are addicted to computer games ,paying no attention to th-
-eier study ,which absulutely do harm to their future.
As a university's student ,I thick entertainments is necessery in our lives but we need to
tell the good ones from the vicious entertainments.And also ,we should develop our ability
to resist the temptations .Thus,our lives can be more meaningful and fruitful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fef2676c-1178-3d5c-9adf-1d863d203ccd> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that relaxation in life is necessary.It help us work better and study better。It keep us a good mood. Anyway,It’s part of our life.In addition there are so many ways to relax that we should choose the right way.
Sports is a good way to relax.It keeps our mind clear and make our body strong.For example,playing basketball increases your speed of reaction,playing tennis makes you run faster and practice your celerity.Except for sports , reading book can also relax your tence nerve . Different from the sports ,reading books can not practice your body but to srenghten your mind. As the saying goes , knowledge is power . From reading different kinds of books , you can reach various knowledge . And it become your treature to make you perfect . Each coin has two sides . And the coin of relaxation is no exception . What I mean is some ways of relaxation are improper and some are even harmful . As the development of the internet , the game online is more and more attractive . Some students can not control themselves and become addicted to the computer game online . It spend them so many time that they can not study well and even can not have a normal life.
As a college student , I want to say that relaxation in life is important but what’s more important is to choose a right way to relax.The right way make us have a better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7123618b-f971-3898-b2d4-398547df85a8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all konw , there are so much relaxation in our life . It can help us relaxed . But
some of them are not good for us .Such as surfing on the internet all day , playing computer
game .
Relaxation is important in our life . But we have to treat them properly . We can not
alway have them whole day . It is bad for us . When we are tired in study or work , we can
have a rest . In this time ,we can have them to relax ourselves . We can have them over ,
it is not healthy for us . If we play computer game whole day , it can affect our study
and make our eye worse and worse .
As a university student , I think we have to have the relaxation appropriate . We like
chating with others on the internet . And we alway do someting we like on the internet . But
we could not surf the internet whole day . We have to use our spare time to study hardly .
And if we stay up to play computer game , we will be tired next day . It can influent our
study . Only in this way , can we make the life well .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID af3bbf07-e8d3-330f-8bf9-c31da8bc8c18> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
The life around us is wonderful.There are many interesting things in our life ,this thanks to the Internet
used widely .There are so many things waited to be treated,people are very busy since the economic developing rapidly.
Then the relaxationis requisite.
There are so many relaxations.When we are tired,we can go to a movie,go jogging,play computer games...And we can relax
ourself when we do this things with our friends together.If you are a sportsman,you can paly a basketball game with your
friends...
Every thing have two sides just like a coin have two sides.Because of many relaxations,sometimes we can't have a good
way to spend the time.Maybe we spend much time playing computer games,but forget our work,such as a student.This is a
serious issue,because the appearence is common between college and senior students.Also,sometimes when we maybe get injured
when we do sports,so we have to do something to avoid the appearence before doing sports.
As a college student,I think we should do the relaxations exactly.We should know,study is our main work,we should make
us a successful person.When we study too much,we can surf the internet,but we have to restrain ourself.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4901fbff-8cb8-3115-8990-ae0c7defe627> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are an ocean of entertainments in our daily life.Difference people have difference
hobbies.
Actually,activities of some kinds are benefitial to our well-beings while some
others have no difference and even do harm to our bodies and souls.From a college
student's pespective,I maintain that not only should we try various activities but also
we are ought to strenghen our ability of figuring out what is good and what is bad.
In no way should they keep on once participants feel anything wrong from the game,such as
headache,dizziness and so on.Comfortable games must be our first choice to relax ourselves.
It is suitable relaxation that makes difference to our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e202925e-2813-3074-8e76-529a6b737c41> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of activities in our lives,such as KTV,playing Mahjong,playing cards,
listening to music.On one hand,some actibities benefit to our body and grouping up.But on
the other hand,some activities is not good for our adolesce.
For example,listening to music calm down my heart,no matter how angry or anxious I am
before.The music trains one's accomplishment,so we can see it's benefit to us.But the
activities such as playing Mahjong in the dorm are disgusting,which make us lost in un-
profitable entertainment and delay our study.
As a university student,I think the rule of judge is if the activitiy is good to our
study and grouping up.I had saw many students play Mahjong or cards all the time,even
escape the classes.They must feel hard when meet the tests.So,we should have the right
way to entertainment.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6939ac2d-b3ba-3517-8a36-14dc4a5f0a21> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern world,in this 21 century ,as the pace of our life speed up ,we are
hurrying to go and back from work and study .And then we are losing more and more r-
-elaxation .But there is no doubt that relaxation is as important as study and work .
Although we have less and less time to go out for a big relaxation , we can try
our best to have a small but effective relaxation by using any free time .we can find
much ways to have a relax .For exampales ,running , playing balls,   or just chatting
with our friends. One the one hand ,some relaxations are very necerry and effective .
Not only can they give our relax but also make our happuy .On the other hand ,some ways
of relaxation just looks like not fit enough .As we all know ,some young peole likes
playing computer games to hava a relax .But it cann't! It can make us more tired ! so ,
choosing a good and proper way to have a relax is very important .
As a colledge student,we should balance our study and relaxation .Remember ,the way
of relaxation is important .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f284da53-1d38-3505-bd68-fd4496f049f0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Recently,I have heared many news about student self-murder.I am very
shook about these news. As far as I am concered, we should know the inportance
of relaxation and how to relaxation in life.
It is all-known that we live in a stessful society. If we can not
deal with it in  correct way. It will be harm for us. So we need relaxation.
In our spare time, we can do plent of activities to relax ourselives,such as
playing computer ganmes, traveling some interest places,listening to music
and so on.But in fact ,Not all entertainments is perfect, some will bring
harm to our society.	Gambling is a best example. If someone were addicted
in gambling, he would become  impoverished.
Above all, As a university man,we should learn how to relax in correct
way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7e4e205f-758a-398b-8978-fa9548c88193> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
After saying goodbye to our high school life,we've been  university students,with more
free time coming along.
With these free time,our life becomes colorful.There are different kinds of activities,
some of which are meaningful,while the others are unproper,even harmful.For example,some
boys are addicted to video games.They even skip classes to play it.In fact,playing video
games can't help to relax but waste time and ruin their future.
As far as I'm concerned,as a university student,we should be able to tell good activities
from bad ones and learn to control ourselves.On the one hand,good activities such as tripping are sure to
do good to ourselves,but bad ones will hava a bad effect on us,even worse,they may make us
have no good results four years later.There are many examples for us .On the other hand,
there is on doubt that we should take active part in some good activities,which not only
enrich our life,but also hava a good effect on ourselves.
In a word,we should take active part in good activities to relax and avoid bad ones!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 51d10e70-9a19-3fb4-a8c6-da985c017a6b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is mang kinds of enterainment relaxatioins in our daily life.For example,computer games,QQ,sina weibo and some sports like basketball or soccer.
In fact,not all of the enterainment relaxatioin is benefit  even though mang enterainment relaxatioin are good for us.When you wallow in one of this enterainment relaxatioin,like a computer game,it always will be a killer in you life and it will kill you health, time and money.
Take my old friend for example.He is a excellenced student in the middle school and all the people thought he can pass the entrance test for the Peking university.But when the time in senier three,he liked basketball frantically,he played it once he had time which he should study or work.At last,he failed in the college enterance exam.
As a university student,we should have our enterainment relaxatioin in our spare time or when we are bored and tired.It is a good way for us to enjoy our university life.But we can't regard it is our all life and wallow it the whold day and you spirt.In other words,enterainment relaxatioin not only our friends but our masty.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0a70e7e8-d1be-3bb1-a5d7-fb237c7d000c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are plenty of activities in our daily life.When we are tired,we alway look for fun to have a relax.It's the activities which make our life colourful.
However,not all the activities are good for us.For example,some students play computer games day and night and don't fouse on study.This really not only does harm to our healthy but also destroies our mental.So we can choose some spotrs to have fun and relax such as play basketball , play football and so on,It all denpend on our interests.
As a college student,I think We should bring up our habit of abstention and do some good entertainment activities to relax ourselves.We should control oueselves and make the activities do good for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a8f7339e-bf49-364e-b703-5f8b032b8aa8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Pressure seems to be a natural part in our daily life in this competitive society.Like it or not there is always pressure of one kind or another.And it seems ther is hardly any way to avoid it or get rid of it.
While different people have different ideas about Relaxation.As a college student,we have many activities except our daily studies,so we can choose one if we like.Before my university,I didn't have so many activities,not only didn't I have time,but I also couldn't know which one I like deeply,but I can find the thing I really like,I can develop my heart to it.
In the other hand,there aren't every activity is good for us,maybe it is just a waste of your time,so we should choose what we really need and we really like,the more you have,the more tied you must be.It is no doubt the most important thing in university is our study,we must ensure our study time,if other things disturb our study,we should consider whether it is worth for us.
Personally,I'm in favor of the proper relaxation in life.I believe that some relaxation is certainly an important incentive in life.It is only when the relaxation gets out of control can it lead to poor performance.Since it is impossible to avoid too much relaxation,certainly there is  no sense trying to do so or compalaining about it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c8008d22-eb59-3fb6-bc3e-93c5c8eb3cd8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,there are a kind of relaxation in life.  Some relaxation have positive effect
to us. But some relaxation have nagetive effect to us.
In my opinion,relaxation is necessary for all of us.However,every time we decide to do
something,we have to make it clear if it is better for you to do such things and what will
be caused.We can not simply devide something into ture or false.
So being responsible to yourself and others is the most important thing. So, as a student,
we should choose the relaxation that have positive  effeceto us. First we should know what
activities are good for us before we take part in. Second,weshould take active part in a lot
of activeties .If you choose the ture relaxaction to take
part in, you will have a colorful life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 558090ce-d15f-3aad-a885-bfe2aa57189d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,we can relax ourselves in various ways such as playing computer games,doing sports,
reading books and so on.Different person has his own way.
Among the relaxation in our life,some are really benifitcial to us but some are a waste of
time or even do harm to us.For example,playing chess not only help us to realx but also increase
our intelligence.On the contray,gambling can cause serious harm and it is difficult to control.
As a university student,I think that it is important for us to choose porper  relaxation.
We can read useful books,do sports or play computer games.But the important point is that we should
not be addicted to them.Our job is to study and relaxation help us to renew our energy so that we can
study better.It is nessary to play games.
In a word,we should realx in porper ways.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 52da6cf9-afdd-3165-8f3f-38a6dd5a0d36> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Ralaxation in life
In the modern society ,as the technology and economy develop faster and faster,people's
environment style becomes polybasic.People has all kinds of activity to relax themselves.This
activity includes sports ,playing  electronic games  ,having fun in the pub,suring on the internet
.But we should realize that these activities are not all advantaged.Some of them ,such as playing   electronic games
,having fun in the pub ,will do harm to our health on some ways .It is wongdergul to participate in the phsical sports
which  can not noly relax us but also strengthen our bodies.As I know,a lot of people won't
choose to play sports because they think doing sports  makes them tired.They would rather stay indoors than go out.
In my opinion ,our society has a serious problem that peple's ralaxation style is not healthful.I think ,after our
nevous work or study,we should have a relax and choose a  correct way to ralax ,which will contribute to our health and
sudy .As a college student ,we must cherish our body ,we should know how to relax clearly.
Also ,we should let others know the correct way to relax ,we should make effors for the health of people in the world.
So ,let's disseminate the knowledge of relaxation to people in the world .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1426c5f5-b36f-32ad-8994-a2198abc9ae4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life, there are sorts of relaxations, like KTV, computer games, desktop game.
It can surely reduce the presures from study, and do let us have a relax heart. But the other
side, too more relaxation in the college life will lead us to a dark life.
In my opinion, we should control ourself to play to often, but not to say never play. As we
know, college is the gate to the society, after we graduate from college, we will have to find
job, earn money and so on. so how can we have a better job or life in the future, it depends
on our ability. So, improve our ability, just like the ability to communicate, the ability to
do professinal work, it`s greadtly important, and we need time to do this, so we can waste too
much time on entertainment, our major is to build us a capable person.
But now it`s 21st century, the one who just know how to study is not who we like. we must
be humour, or just get along well with others. This is the way to success. If you don`t know
how to do some entertainment, others will just think you are so serious, and time to go, you
will find you haven`t enough friends to play with you. Otherwise, we need to relax after we do
some difficult homework, it will relax our body, and let us have enough energy to do the next
work, and it certainly improve our working efficiency.
So, relaxation is necessity in our life, it`s the combination of our work and life. But
remember, never be immerse in the entertainment, or you will have a dark future.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 59546ee9-5723-3c44-876f-179b71d98304> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Entertainment
There are many entertainments in our daily life, such as singing, dancing, playing instruments, playing basketball and so on. Everyone likes different entertainments in his or her spare time.
Among these entertainments, some of them are good for us. For example, doing some sports can keep fit and let us know the meaning of cooperation. Singing songs can make us feel happy and confident. However, some of these entertainments are harmful to us. For instance, drinking beer a lot in KTV is bad for our health.
As an academician, I think we should choose those entertainments which is both helpful to our health and our mind. From those helpful entertainments, we can gain more knowledge that we can not get from our books. Of course, we can also make some good friends to enjoy the same things and make our life more colorful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 67a8dbaf-0e1d-37d9-abc5-4cfa0a038bc8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are kinds of relaxation in our life !We can get so much fun from our daily relaxation.
However,different person like different relaxation .And not every relaxation is safe and good for people!So,as we all know,sports like football and basketball is healthy forour body. They can make us stronger and healthier.but in our life, there are so many people who choose bad relaxation.They addict themselves in computer games or alcohol. It is very harmful to our body even spirit! So,we konw different relaxation can let us be different people!
As a high school student,we should make right choice.We must get rid of computer games,and do more sports!Also, reading is a good relaxation for our student.So,we have own chance to choose our relaxation ,and I believe we can do the roght things!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID be3891ec-368c-31a5-a20b-6c4da7cf7ce7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of economy,people's work pressure is more and more large.
because of that,people need to relax themselves by all kind of relaxation.Only in
this way, people can enjoy their life and better work.
Living in this colourful life,there are all kinds of relaxation we can choose.
First,we can listen to music which is soft or which we like best.It's good for us to
relax ourselves.On the second hand,we can read some books which is funny and humour.
We can study something useful at the same time.Third, we can see some funny files and
play games.Playing sports is also a good way to relax ourselves and it's good for our
health. But every coin has two side. there are some relaxation that are bad for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 50db4b82-2c90-36f8-bf71-31fff5d87c40> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are lots of relaxations in our life,which can make us relax during the stress of the study and
society life.
However,not all the relaxations are health for us.For instant,some people like driking when they feel unhappy.this is
indeed an very unhealth relaxation,even if it may a good way for us to relax ourselves after the work and school.In addition,
many people,especially the university sudents,who own lots of free time,like to relax themselves by playing computer games all
the night instand going to the bed.It is a worse way,I think.because everyone is clear that the lack of sleeping can do great
harm for a people.
So,the following is some of my opinion about what the healthy relaxtions are.As for me,I always consider the doing sports
as good geart way to relax wherever you are and no matter what you did just now.because everyone on the earth is konwn that
doing ercierse can improve our body while they bring funny to us .The second advice I give is movie.Going to see a film is
really a good things after the heavy work or sduty,as it does not need us to pay much moneny and energy beacuse we just sit
there and enjoy them .What's more,the foreign movie can also improve our English day bay day.Fianlly,if you have enough time
having a trip with you friends is a great idea as well for it not only can relax your self,but also can extend you eyes when
you enjoy the great view of the work.
In a word,various of  relaxtions exsite in our life,althought some are not so good .But as for our university sduent,chose
a proper way is not a difficult thing.So,we should choose a more proper relaxtio way and have a day all the time

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 60c39014-cd4e-3468-b224-2c881bc5dbc9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
in our daily lives , there are many different entertainments for us to refresh ourselves.
when we meet many unhappy things or under great pressure , we will manage to do something
which can relax ourselves.some entertainments can help us forget everything annoyed and
really do good to our health. However,the truth is that not all entertainments are benefitcial
to all of us.
For example , when we are down ,we always wanna sing aloud to let out our emotions.So ,many
people will go to KTV alone or with several friends . As we all know , many bad guys like
gathering at KTV and make their evil bussiness,such as selling drugs to teenagers .If we lose
our heads or be ruined by bad moods and wanna try a different way to relax , so go to buy some
drugs.Then we will face a great danger!While we are addicted to the drugs , our lives will be
really ruined .Friends will stay away from us ,family will be sad and dissapointed,we will lose
our money ,time ,friends and health!
In a word ,we should learn to distinguish which relaxation is really good for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bfc8e0be-ff2d-320d-8e41-18653c267b7e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,the entertainments of the college students are more and more colorful.in weekdays,
there are all kinds of sports games or class activities;On weekends,many Students Unionts
appear to have fun or do the good deep.And all kinds of paties to make friends...
It's good for us to join in this activities in some aspects,such as they can make our spear
time more interesting and help us make more friends.But every corn has tow side,the activities
of entertainment sometimes are waste our time and money.
In my view,university students should make a reasonabla schduld of their time. In the university,
our main task is leaning.Leaning more professional or useful knowledge in store,and be ready for
future.In your spear time ,you can do smoe sports.Our time is limited,using your time
in the worthwhile thing to improve you ability but not just for fun.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2044e8f4-37e4-3643-8200-d2fe06c27c47> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainments in our daliy life.These activities make our
work and spare time more colorful and meaningful.
As time goes by ,the forms of entertainments has been increasing repidly.Besides all
kinds of sport games,we now have more choices such as computer games.
However,we cannot make sure that all of the entertainments exsit are healthy and legal.
With the development of the society,there are also some bad entertainments in our sight.
For example ,some hackers even us computer program to control all the lights in a building,
and use the lights to play a tank game!This may seemed very cool in our first impression
but when we think it over we can find that their success and joyment are built on others
loss,what we should know is that we cannot enjoy ourselves and ignore others feelings.
As a college student,we should develop a healthy and meaningful interest,what's more
important is ,we may benefit from it in our whole life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cdae43ff-f6f3-39b1-8843-5981dc326d67> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the morden world, people have lots of pression,it from work,family,school and so on.
Therfor,we must look for some ways of relaxation to refresh our body or mind.There are all kinds of relaxations for us to choess ,but which one is fit us ?
In my way ,some relaxations are really good for us,such as doing some sports,listening music, watching TV.Doing these thing,wo can forget something worried temporary,in other words,we do these things are dood at our body.
Of course,if we do some extreme relaxations,not only do not good for our health,but also ruid it. I heard someone could fighting with others for relaxe,it is terrible.It would be hurt himself and another person.Some boys like computer games , but we all know,playing a lot of computer games can harm and even kill over a long period of time.
As to me , I have many ways to relax . Most time,i like to play basketball with some boys,or listen some lound music.I will never choose the extremely ways. And i wish ,every of our collage students would choose  ways fit himself.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7e9c37ee-7bef-3b49-92b3-d7820a95dd22> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation in your life,maybe you will think of many things when you read the sentence,
such as sports,reading,shopping,sleep and other entertainment.If these different forms of
relaxation are good for us,people have different view.
Someone think relaxation is good for us,regardless of which form it is.They think our
job and study is hard,the pressure is so huge,people are not healthy if they don't try to
relax themselves.And some relaxation can increase our knowledge and make our body more
strong.However,the criticize is not think so.They think some relaxtion is bad for people,
for example,children play computer games and then they forget their study.The relaxation
makes them lost themselves.Adults also have the same situations,like someone always drink,
smoke and so on.These all are bad for their health.
In my opinion,relaxation is necessary for anyone,we can't live a life which only has
job and study.But choose the proper ways of relaxation also is importment,don't use
fall time to relax.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 92ca4d43-9c1b-316f-b697-281d4ffc426e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
To most of people, life is more and more stressful,Chinese even have the lest time to relax
compareing with many western countries.
Many people will find some feel time to relax theirslves,and there are a lot of amusements,
too.
Most activities are interesting ,meaningful,exciting and relaxing.Take the corporation
activities in univercities for example,the are so many intersting basketball games ,
volleyball games,campus drama competitions and so on.In my view, these activities can make
us harvest more. Not even they can relieve our tension,but also promote our abilities. But
have you ever thought that some of the amusements is harmful?Like surfing on the net too
often,play computer games for long time and some games are dangerous for us.
As a college student,we should  connect study and play properly  ,choosing the good
entertainments to join is also importment.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e0a9fea3-b2ae-398d-aa95-5d9d5d246165> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of relaxations and activities in our life ,
such as sports,games traveling,or music.With the help of these
relaxations,we can relax ourselves in our school or working life!Somebody
also think that enjoy some ralaxations can do good to our study or work
because we can feel more comfortable after doing some relaxations!
It is known to us that many things have there both sides.So we can  image easily
that relaxations not only have advantages ,but also disadvantages. Most people conclude
that traveling,listen to music or seeing a movie is that kind of good relaxations!
They also think that playing computer game is a bad relaxation!But i think do some
relaxations regularly isn't a bad habit! Sometimes playing computer can also build
up our friendship.
As a high school student, our first job is to study.We must have a good attitude toward
many kinds of relaxation.Having some relaxations is a good way to release ourselves after
the class.But we should control ourselves and don't be addicted to the relaxations.What we should
do first is distribute our time reasonable!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3279a5b1-0784-356a-9d0e-0a63ca7fabdf> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,we have many kind of relaxation,such as
do sports,play with other people.In a word,Relaxation
is do what can make us relax. Because of so many kind of
relaxation in our live,we can enjoy and get fun.
Relaxation is good to us. First,it can relief our
pressure.Second,the things we do for relax maybe let us
make more friends. Last but not least,relaxation is the
best way to make ourselves happy.But every coin have two
sides,relaxation also.Too much relaxation is bad to us.
For a example,play net games can make us relax.But if we
play it too much,we will become bad and un healthy.
In my opinion,relaxation is good to us. Although it
maybe do harm to us,we can avoid the bad things what the
relaxation maybe bring to us.As university students, we
must know what we can do or can not do.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 32c9134f-042e-3d2b-bede-39fba58da24b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many funny activity in our life,especially for us,university student,we have
many time to study and take part in various activities by ourselfs.But one coin have two
sides,so some activity is uesful to us and some is no helpful to us.
As a unitersity student,I think we should plan our time reasonably.On the one hand,many
people have noidea to do everying because they have not a goal,they will play computer game
all day in dormitory.For these people,I think they can join some canpus activity to harden
their body and their mind.On the other hand,in fact,so much campus activity is boring and
lacking passion.I think that will waste lots of time and make our mind numb.
In my opinion,our unitersity student should paln our time to take part in activity
according to ourselfs and don't try dangerous movement at dormitory. I think entertainments
is necessery in our lives but we need to tell the good ones from the vicious entertainments.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1a8af077-1e51-371b-810f-48df6fa393d7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to us all,there are many activities for relaxation in our daily life.We can do
some sports or just play computer games to relax ourselves when we feel tired.
Different people have different opinions on relaxation,some relaxation may be healthy,
while others may be unfit for us and do harm to us.Smoking is more usual among students
than before.Some students smoke for fun,and some smoke for relaxation.However,smoking
is harmful to us.Smoking not only costs us a lot of money,but also weaken our body.
As a college student,I think we should choose some positive activities to relax ourselves
instead of harmful ones.We will feel truly relax only after we choose the correct way for
relaxation in life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cd758cf8-6e50-32ce-acaf-01e1e791c8e0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relasation   in  life
There are lots of relasaton activities both benifit and harmful in our life.These relasation
events make our life more colourful and boredoen our seesight.Howere,every coin has two sides.
So,we should arrange propolly time to attend relation activity .
Having some relation activities make our life wondeful.there is no dout that we should relax
our both body and mind after a pressful day study and work .Attending some relation events such
as dancing ,singingand surfing can make us feel good and far away the lives pressure just
enjoying ourselves.All known to us ,every thing has two sides so as attending relastion activities.
Aithought taking apart in relasation events has many advantages,it alse has lots of disadvantages.
Spent lots of time in attending harmful relasation events could make us worse which do harm to
our study and daily lives.Nowday,lots of students are additied to internet,which make their
both body condition and  study worse and worse.Worst, some of them stolen their parents money
to surfing the internet and adonben out of school.
In my opinion,as a a student ,there is no doubt that study is the most important thing in our
our dialy life .So we should spent more time in our study as possible .However, having a relax
our body and mind is needed.Thereforewe should join some benificial relasation activities rather
than attending harmful events such as surfing internet too much time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cda72aa4-d29d-399a-9f86-e52b145e90a0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are lots of and kinds of activities in university. As you can see, some of
those activities is benefical to us, it can make our eyes open, can let us prectice more, it
is useful ror our future life. At the same, we can make plenty of friends with others, this is
important. But every coin has two sides, some of activities isn't suitable for us, it may be
bad for us. For example, if you take part in those activities, you must lose lots of time in
which you should study.
As a academician, I think that we should spend lots of time in our study, but when it is
convenient, we can also join that. After all, it is also important for us. Whats more, it is
necessary in our university life. That's all.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 180db850-25ec-3af2-bbfe-cfb0bbbf0378> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all,when we are tired because of working or studying, we often do
things fun to relax our selves. Not only can we play sports but also we can do some
quiet things like reading.But,it is important to relax ourselves by right things.
As far as I am concerned,playing sports and reading are good ways to relax.Because
you relax yourself by playing sports,you also get exercise.It does good to your health.
Maybe some people don't like to go out,alright,they can read books to have a relax.
It is knowledge that they can get by this. Whichever way they choose is good to themselves
to relax. On the contrary,many people relax themselves in the wrong way. For example,some
people prefer to play computer games a long time, some have a party,playing and drinking
all night. These things are truely harm to their health.So,if someone wants to have a relax,
he should choose a right way.
In a word,it is common that you are tired.After studying,working and so on,you certainly
want to have a relax.But remember to relax yourself in a healthy way.Only in this way can
you reduce tired and then, work better!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 51e4433b-4860-337b-88ee-457568f303f5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the huge improvement of the people's life,there are a multitude of relaxation.
When we feel boerd,we can choose to play basketball with our classmates,to sing in the
KTV together,even to go shopping with our good friends.In fact,we have many ways to make
our life interesting and colorful.
Playing ball games such as baseball can make us stronger and let us find fun from
feeling tired.Playing chess or cards would give our minds a challenge,of course,we can
learn something from it.However,it can't be denied that not all relaxation is good for our
mental and physical health.For example,playing computer games spends some people's most
time,it does harm not only for our eyesight but also our body health.Someones are even
addicted to it.
As a university student,as far as I am concerned,relaxation is only an activity that make
us relaxed not our work.We should take part in healthy activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6d73a1f7-46ba-37df-83aa-f779530e6bdf> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society is developing faster and faster，people need spend too much time on
learning new knowledge and it is necessary for people to work hard for their life with
the big pressure.So，is it wise to give up relaxation for a higher pay ？Of course not.
Some reasons may be responsible for my opinion.First of all,as all we know,a strong
body is the most important things in our short life ,as the old saying goes,you will lose
everything if you lose a strong body,and it is clear that if people pay more attention to
relaxation such as playing sports games or having a good rest,they will become stronger
and healthier.Moreover,as the society developed,people speng less time on communicating
with their family,the relaxation provide a good chance for familiers to communicate and
enjoy  happiness ,for example,a family can have a home party by a beautiful lake in their
relaxaion time .
To sum up,I think relaxation is important in our life and it is time for us to pay more
attention to relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e10d94e2-d484-391b-a76f-f2a38f453ef4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of relaxation activities in our daily life ,but not all of those are
good for us ,some of those activities is not good or even bad bring bad to us and society.
After going into the university, I found that there are just pretty more relaxation
activities in every day and everywhere than senior high school,it is different from the
regular life in before,more spare time for us to control.though activities fill in the college,wo should choose what is benefit.
In my view,many activities make sense.Sports are the best choice,no doubt that do sports can bring us srtong ody and healthy life,when you are doing sports,you will forget all things that trouble you,and give up ,after sprots ,you take a shower,and wash out all annoyance.But many people prefer to stay in dormitory and playing computer game instead of go out for fun.I think it is not only bad for their eyes but even bad for their skill of communication,they will lose many opptunities to make friends and learn other things that make sense for their future life.
In a word,as a student of university,we should think carefully before we make a choice of what kind of relaxation activities we need and we should choose,because once you make a wrong choice ,you will regret forever maybe on someday in future.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 43fe0fd4-9662-3516-99e9-e295952c2252> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We are surrounded by various entertainment activities.Because of invisable pressure,we have to relax ourselves by entertainment.It means that nobody can live without relaxation.
Some entertainment activities are beneficial to us,such as climbing mountains and doing sports.It can not only release our burden but also build up our body.
However, not all entertainment has positive effect.Some people think playing computer games days and nights is a good way of relaxation.In fact,it does harm to their body and leaves them more tired.What's more,some people take over exercises to relax themselves.Good as the sports is, over exercises can lower a man's energy.So,some entertainment activities may cause damage to ourselves.
As an undergraduate, I agree that we should choose the appropriate relaxation that fits different people.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c2dd4d70-4e52-3200-8435-a9f0ac511e7b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are so many kinds of relaxation in life which can help us relax
ourselves.Such as computergames movies sports and so on.The problem comes that some of
them are profitableness but some of them are unseemly even harmful.As a collage student,
how can we find a right way to relax after study is a problem worth to discuss.
In my opinion,watching movies maybe the best way which we can relax.Firstly,it is very
peceful,you just need to sit there and open your eyes,then you can enjoy a goodtime.As
for sports,they are a little dangerous.Secondly,we can learn a lot of new knowledgefrom
movies.Every movie is a story ,they make you a deep impression and let you think about
your life.
In a word,relax by watching movies is the best way for collage students to choose!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1b14abfb-a3db-3a73-bf83-9a8a9a56d73b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of technorledge, people have more way to relax themselves than everbefore.Some people may go to
sing songs with friends on weekend after a long and heavy workdays.Some may go to do some sports such as hiking or camping
as a way to relax themselves.Also some people just choose to watch TV with they family.
Whithin those kind of entertainments, some of them are good to people.For example,when you do some sports,not only can you
relax yourself,but also you can fit your body.Such entertainments can do good to you.However,some entertaments may lead to a
bad result.Nowadays, it comes a new word couch pertato,discriabing a person who just sit on the sofa and watch TV when they
are free,which lead to more and more overweight people.This kind of ehtertainment is advantage at all for us if we can not
take a good control on it.
As far as I am concerned, we should choose the ways which is good to us.get away form the entertainments are disadventage
to us.Moreover,everthing has two sides, so we had better take control on it,make sure it will ont have bad influence on us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d34ef239-3f18-3aa1-8ed4-c48309985af8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Life is colorful,everyone needs something to relax themself.there are so many kind of relaxation in our life,such as listening music skiing or drinking alcohol.
As we know,every coin has two sides,so do relaxation.In one way ,relaxation can relax us after working all day long ,and refresh our body so we can get enough energy to get into another day's work.But in the other way ,some kinds of relaxation is harmful,they may do harm to our spirits ,our body, even our health.
As a undergraduate,I'm a freshman in university,I find that we have some leisure in our life,that mean we have more time to do something we want,so how to select right way to relax  ourself is very important.Just like what I told above,we should choose those way which we can get benefit.In my opinion,sports is the best relaxation for a student,we can build up our body,strengthen our spirits and it good for our health.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 772e36d1-ea9f-339c-802b-4ddf3ec9816b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,relaxation plays an important role in our daily life.Virous activities like doing
sports,watching movies and chatting with others are not only beneficial for our physical
health,but also psychological health.
When we have an entertainment,we can get relaxed.And some physical activities help us to
keep fit.Also,during the activity,we may laugh so that we are in good mood.However,not all
the relaxation is helpful.Some unsuitable activities may do harm to ourselves.If we sleep
up late just for playing computer games,it will have a bad influence on us.Drinking too much
frequently may cause diseases even cancer.
As a freshman in the university,we ought to have a good habit at the beginning.We should
think about it from all coneivable angles,not only just for fun.It is having a balance
on study and relaxation that we can get ready for our future efficiously.In a word,
relaxation is necessary but unlimited.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6936e625-c61d-31dc-bad8-a55e92f42abb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With society developing quackly,poeple's life becomes more and more colurful.There are lot's
of enterments and funny activities.Such as skating,swimming,skiing,besides,there are also
much equipment for people to enjoy themselves.Nowadays people often go out on weekends to
to do something they like.It maybe good for themselves but sometimes not for animals.Some
people like shooting,if they only shoot on exercise places,it's nonthing serious,but there
exits someone who don't obay the rules.And there are also some peoplo who like to barbecue
in the wild,but they are careless and often don't put out the fire totally which result in
a big fire.
Looking for fun is not wrong but what is important is that we shouldn't hurt others
including animals.If everyone care not only for himselves but also for others.Our life will
be more and more colurful.So join in some helthy activities,it's good for not only you but
also others.Maybe a small decision you did will make a big difference on others(including
animals)

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4c963333-c12f-39ea-a35b-1da8c273ffe9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
with the development of sciety,relaxat action is becoming more and more.we can take this action in every time even place.we play computer game in diecotry,sing songs in KTV,play basketball and play our new phone in everywhere.
Relaxation in life can help us relax ourselves after studing and working.Then we can put our heat to study and work.Besides we make more friends with others and keep touch with old friends through the relaxation that is very import for us.
Relaxation is harmful fou us,isn't?New some students are playing their "iphone 4" or"iphone 4s" in the class,they play phone game and read little blog that waste there much time in study.there are some playing computer game at deep night.They run away the classes or go to sleep in the class.Besides some students took accident because they had played too late.
In my opoin,takeing relaxation in right time and place may be help for us.We can attend the action,but we should cortil ourselves

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1eee40ab-f440-3cee-a8ec-09bc7012750e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many different way of relation in lief.For example ,we can take a visit to
many intrests. also we can listen to music ,paly computer games and enjoy sports.
As is known to all ,that we should keep a good balance between relaxtion and work.If we
spend too much time on oncoputer games ,we will make  our study remain a messs.It is very neces-
sary to contral the time of relaxtion. as for sports ,It is a good way to releve our stress
However, if it is over contraled,it can do harm to our health.
In my opinion,On the one hand,we need relaxion to make our life more wonderful,on the
other hand ,we should make a plan about relaxtion and time.when we feel upset and stressful
,we can go for a walking and listen music. but when we are working ,we should try our best.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 88b8d3a9-6d82-3175-ba09-72981e81b41f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of relaxiation activities in our life. And people like different relaxiationactivities.Some people like
watching TV,some people like playing basketball, and some people like singing songs,and so on.
But coin has two sides.some activites are good for us, and some are bad for us. For example, if we play basketball as our
relaxiation,we will become healthy. And we will study better. If we sing song,we will get happy. chatting in line is a new
relaxiation in our life,when we chat in line, we can make many friends who are distance from us. But if we chat in line too
much time ,it will waste two much time in our life. And doing so, will we can't finish our home work,we won'tstudy better.
As we all know, playing computer games can make us relax. But if we play too much computer games,it will waste too much time
in our life. And we can't work well.
As a students from universitty,I think we shoud do many activites wich are good for us. we can play basketball,sing dance
and so on. we can also play some computer games. But we can't play too much.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID af748ffc-f97b-34b5-998e-8589ad631f44> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Just as the sayying goes,every coin has its two sides.The same to us,both of the work and the relaxation are playing the significant role in our daily life.Most of us will choose to ralax after a whole hard working day,but I think we ought to ralax ourselves on schedule.
From my perspective,I argue that we should set up a timetable included the study time and the relaxation time.Many people around us always occupy their relaxation time to make up their unfinished work and they always only devote their mind in their work and study so that  ignore their ralaxation.Personally,I totally oppose this beahaviors because stay up a night to do a job or to study are unefficient.Contraily,I will relax myself when I tired on study. In condition that you are tired,why not go for a walk or go to play a sport game,it can help you to renew your energy and then you can absorb in your work more efficiently.
when mentioning the relaxation in our life,lots of famous people emphasize the importance of the relaxation.Like the father of iphone,steve jobs,he often motivate us to intergrate the entertament and the work harmonious.Consequently,we can draw a conclusion that our ralaxation in life shoule be cherished.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bff322de-8097-399c-bb08-be778f2fc0ca> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there are all kind of activities to relax.As we all know,
football,basketball and swimming are our commen relaxtion activites.Also,
that activites are good for us.Because they are intereting to play and
benefit to our health.However,some things bad of relaxtion are not better
even do harm to us.For example,being absorbed in computer game have bad
to us.It not only waste our time,but make me unlike studing and working.
As a university student I am,I think we should have a rigt mind-set
to relaxation.What'more,we have better handle our time between study and
relaxation reasonable.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f9036e6a-b109-3a4c-ab39-41b6811cd97e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It has been acknowledged to all that there is much relaxation in our life.They play
an important role in our spare time.For example,we will go on hiking when we want to
get close to nature and so on.
But,we can not ingore that every thing has two sides.On the one side,it brings us
happiness and relaxation when we feel tired,such as visiting zoos and parks and other
things like that.Meanwhile,It can helps us keep close with our friends.For example,we
can play ping-pong or badmintan and we can go to KTV to sing together.That will surely
make for our friendships.On the other side,it will do harm to us if we can not control
ourselves.If we are addicted to computer games,the precious time will be wasted and we
will lose our aim and dream.The effect is that we give up the most important thing in
our college.
In my opinion,we should plan our spare time rightly.we should make relaxtion healthy
and reasonable,other than an addiction.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8e9cdb15-40b5-33c0-97b2-dc9e21c6d73e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
as modern people,we've got a great deal of entertainments in our life.they enrich our life and make it more colourful.
our world exist quite enough entertainments to meet every one's need.such as watching movies in a cosy cinema,having a chat throught internet with a old friend,enjoying a concert played by your favourite star,singing crazily in ktv room or even dacing in a bar with alcohol.certainly all of them can leed you to a happy heaven,however,not all of them are beneficial to us.a part of them will do harm to our physical and mental health.
entertainments can help us make some new friends by accident,but new friends not equal to good friends.they also can make us relax after a lot of hard work,but if you spend a whole night to relax,the result is you will break up your body and get more tired than before.
thus,in my opinion,we should learn to choose a right way and healthy way to entertain,try to contral our time in entertainments.personally speaking,i consist that sport is the best way to entertain.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 66d9022b-d14c-339a-8bf5-f746e9ee0bd0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of standard of our life,relaxation is gaining more and more popularity.More and more people choose to do some relaxation in their spare time.Therefore,the variety of relaxation become also colorful.
Some of relaxation dose play an positive part in our life.Take badminton for example,it can not only benefit our fitness,but also make us meet more friends.however,others,such as computer game,alcohol,drug,may do harm or even channel us into an dangerous way.
As far as I am considered,though relaxation should absolutely become a part of our daily life,wo ought to take it seriously.It is our responsibility to tell the good relaxation from the bad ones.We might as well do some relaxation such as sports,reading,painting and so on,which may pave the way for a more abundant life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 24f241ad-bf12-32dd-8c39-cee75baa4f53> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society,people begin to trend to look for mental relaxation.So ,there are many entertaintments in our life,such as dancing party,sports,skating,cross-country,playing games and so on.
ON the one hand ,some activiyies are benefinet for us.We can get mental relaxation and exercise.On the other hand ,they are bad.Forexample,some students always play games for day and night.Not only it is bad for their health,but also bad for their study.Besides, some people are addictied to making friends.They often go to dring bars or KTV.Sometimes it may be dangerous.Because we do not have a good knowledge with the seciety,we may be cheatwd by someone.
In my opinion,relaxation is necessiry,but we must countrol ourself well.We need learn how to balance our study and relaxation!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e0595069-9f77-3483-a34d-9f940dee9287> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We all get stressed, so we need to relax.For example, sleeping is a kind of relaxation.But
usually we regard entertainment as the main method to relax.
In this amazing age, entertainment is diverse. The most usual one for us is surfing the
Internet. We scan news, watch online television, play online games, etc. What's more, many
choose to go KTV when free. It's probably a good idea for music lovers. And we can never
ignore the great fun that sports can provide. Nowadays, sport can be the symbol for both
fashion and healthy, and it's way to relax, too.
As you can see, we are dealing with so many chioces all the time, but which ones are good
for us and which ones are not? Take surfing Internet for an example, we can know more about
the world, and it's really an excellent way to entertain oneself which our ancestors
couldn't enjoy. But every coin has two sides, spending long hours online can be harmful,
too. Sometimes you can find youself spending time but doing nothing at all except reloading
the pages. Sports is good in many aspects, but if you overdo it, injuries follow.
If I am supposed to talk as a college student, I'd say that we should be wise choosing
our ways for relaxation. Good or bad is usually not a absolute concept, it depends on our
real situation. One would better choose a relaxation based on his or her hobbies, free time,
health condition, etc. Only in this way can we have a good life stlye and relax in a proper
way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 82375d5d-389b-3222-b5b8-06e17551ed8a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of relaxation activities in our life.And I think these activities  are important in our life.
On one hand,relaxation in life has a kindly affection.Sometimes,when we get worried or feel unhappy and sadness,we could
do some exercise to relax our mind.For example,we can play basketball or just go for a walk.It's possible that the sadness
will go soon.
BUt on the other hand,relaxation sometimes have bad influence for us.Some people like playing games in computer when they
feel tired.Then,their body would get worse while they don't have a rest until a long time.
As a colleage student, we should have exately relaxtion.We must to charge what is good for us and what is bad for us.Then
choose those good relaxation to relax our mind or body.And I believe that we will get more and more outstanding.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3efeb66c-46b7-3585-98a6-b968300f027d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life, there are many activities around us,such as swimming,playing vollyball
and so on.First,the activites held by schools take a lot part and,they may be a little
boring sometimes because they are a bit of tradition.There are also many activites that are
held by students after class. They must be fantastic and interesting so that they can draw
students' attention.
There are many activites we can take, but we should be carefull to think what activites
is usefull for us. In addition, with the development os society,computer has played an important
role in our receation.we can suffer on the internet,chat with qq,listen to music and many
other things.We can also do somethings that is good for our health and sprit,for emxple,
the debate contest,football game and so on.
In my opinion,recreational activite in college is neccessay.But wo should balance the time spent
in study and recreation.From that,we can benefit a lot .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c5dbccb2-11e5-3551-b858-aff1b912e622> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is a quantity of activities in our dayly life, which fanscinate us greatly. Are they all good for our growth?
Some activities has truly a good effect on us.For example, sports is a wonderful acitivity because it helps us to build a stronger boby as well as make more friends.Nevertheless, there is some bad activities among the colorful activity world, which we all cannot deny. We can take gambling as a good case in point. Gambling makes people addicted, even resulting in homelessness of countless people and incease the number of crime.
As a university student, we should learn to deal with the acitivities around us. In my opinion, we should recognize the bad activities from the good ones. As for the good ones, we should participate them without reserve. Besides, we should control ourself strongly refuse the acitivities which are bad for our mind and boby.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 25672dd4-49e8-34d6-a31d-82879049fcd4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern society,there are some sort of relaxation playing a important part in our daily life,some people are interested in playing games outside,while other people may enjoy doing something in the house,in a word each person has his own relaxation.
we can definitely benefit from some of these relaxation,for example,exercises build up our body;reading can clear our minds and souls;traveling widen our eye-sight.on the contrary,some kinds of relaxation not only waste our time but also make us unhealthy,something like drunk,gambling,drug even lead us to a evil situation.
From my perspective,when people get trouble,they usually find their own way to relax themselves,take the point I just stated into account,we should choose a propriate way to make yourself comfortable,otherwise you may get in a opposite way and make it worse.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 288dd1a4-6450-3bdb-a544-2417a9c271fd> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As a university man, I have plenty of entertainment to enjoy in my daily life.
Everyone can find its favorite things to do in its spare time.Who like to do sports can play basketball,badminton,tennis and so on.Who like to read can not only go to the library but also look on the Internet.And who like to enjoy themselves can play computer games or just do something in their dorms.
But not all the amusement does well to a university man.Some of them are not suit for us to do.For example, going to night clubs may be a way to communication and recreation, but I don't think it's a suitable way for a university man to relax themselves, it may cause kinds of problems and hurt themselves in some extents.
In my opnion, A university man can do some kinds of entertainment which will not do harm to themselves, and we must control ourselves what time to do that and concentrade on study is the most important.
Anyway,relaxation is important and necessary but is not the all life,we also have the other to deal with,we must plan our life good.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9d3b6228-568b-326d-bf63-de1ac7d6b8db> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As it is known to all, plenty of relaxations exist in life,varying from different people.
For instance,some like kinds of sports to relax themselves,and some like playing games,
including computer games or table games and so on,while others like going to a vacation to
make themselves at ease.
Generally,these ralaxations contain a large number of advantages,actually,however,it doesn't
always be that.To take my roommate as an example,at the beginning of this term,he found a newly
interesting game,which can help him release the load of study.It sounds great,but however,gradually
,it became worse,for the reason that he became addicted to it that made him detest study.He stayed
in front of computer all the time,which accounted for his falling grades.
Therefore,as university students,about the relaxation,I think we have better to widen the
entertainment ways for that it will relax us more effectively,and further more,we should always
remind ourselves that it is just relaxation for us,we have something vital to do.It can prevent
ourselves from being addicted to the relations.
To sum it up,we need to choose some suitable relaxations for us in life,but more importantly,on no
account can we let our porper work alone just for the relaxations.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID eb039476-b110-34b9-ac7d-03aa96e33a1f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are so many different kinds of entertainments in our daily life.
Some of them are good at our development,while others do not.For example,we can relax our_
self bu sports,at the same time,it's helpful to our healthy.By contrast,if we play computer
games so much,we will hurt our eyes,also,we may get bad mark.
Last year,we graduated from our senior high school,and now we are the students of uni-
versity.In my opinion ,as a colledge students,the most important thing for us is still study.
We should spend much time and pay more attention to it.Only after we have finished our work,
we can talk about the entertainment.That's not to say,we should study all of the day.If we
get so much pressure,we should have a rest and take some entertainments.But remember,do this
with your partner and choose some meanful activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8c72dccc-7d4e-3b13-96ff-f29d320df52f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are all kinds of relaxations in our daily life,but not of them benefit us.What we should do is how
to choose them and benefit from them.
Some activities such as singing and playing chess are good for us.Many people would choose singing as their relaxation
when they want to relax.By singing,they can cut down their pressure,which is good for their healthy.Also,friends can strength
their friendship.Playing chess asks people to think,so it can strengthen our thinking ability and make us know how to calm
down.However,many relaxation like playing computer games may do harm in us.There is no denying that some people can adjust
well between life and games,but most of people are addicted to playing computer games.If a man have a incorrect relaxation,
both his health and study will be harmed.
As far as I am concerned,relaxation plays an important part in our daily life.But we must know how to choose and which
one is benefit us.Only a relaxation fit us and we have a correct and active attitute in it,can we get a lot from it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 503b4a0e-cd1f-36a0-82ed-9f3cf0e9cfaf> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the developing of life qualities, ther are various of activities for entertainment come into our life. For example, playing sports, music and cards, surfing the Internet, gambling and so on.
There is no doubt that relaxation is necessary for us after tired work. We need to relax so that we can work better. So we sometimes playing basketball, listening to music or do other kinds of activities for relaxation. However, some kinds of relaxation is not suitable for us or even do harms to us. Such as gambling and taking drugs, though being high at that time, you must be addicted to it and it will destroy your life.
As a college studient, we must cearly konw what is positive and what is negative. We must keep far away from negative relaxation and can not try a single time. But it does not mean that we should not take any relaxation. We still need some activities for relaxation, the key is what kinds of relaxation you choose.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 05d0872e-5123-32ea-a993-181ee7cfae3f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the rapidly development of technology,now we have a huge amount of relaxation in life such as playing computer game,watching TV,singing in the KTV,reading the novel like science fiction,playing sports and so on.
Some relaxation is good.For example,when you are bored,you can play basketball,football,tennis etc.Playing sports can not only gives you happiness,but also improve your health.It has so many benefits that make your life more colorful and more interesting.
But are all the ralaxation do good to us.I think the answer is absolutely NO.You can see,a lot of students who should study hard in the classroom are playing computer all the days.you can see many students reading novels no matter it is in the class or not.
In my opinion,every coin has two sides.There are advantages and disadvantages in same relaxations,depending on how you make it.If properly choosed,almost every relaxation does good to our physical and mential health,but if improperly choosed,almost all of them do harm to us.
In a word,as a colleage student,we must choose the  relaxations which are good for our physical and mential healthy,and deal with them in a proper way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2c369c8e-88e5-3e2c-a7ff-02f5a1bd2ca9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Everybody needs relaxation in our busy life . As we can see, there are various of kinds of entertainments around us nowadays.
Some Relaxation help us relax and keep us away from stressful work or study for a while so that we are able to deal with them
with full energy , thus they are helpful to us . Sometimes watching a film , doing sports,playing games,or just having a walk
can help us relax a lot . While what we must know is that not every relaxation is suitable for us .If we take some bad entertain-
tainment or unlimted relaxation , it probably affects our normal life or even does harm to our health.For example ,many students
can't realize it and be addicited in computer games.
As colleage students, we have much time to enjoy kinds of colorful relaxation in life. But we must relax in right time and in right
ways. Never rember that the why we relax is to work better. We must take right attitude towards relaxation in life .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5ea99506-5c38-3ee9-8786-98d3d4a0ee02> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is knowed to all,there are many activities for relax in our daily life. For example,playing computer games is a relaxing way to find fun after tireless study or work.Another example is that if we learn some-
thing and spend a lot of time in working,it is reasonable that we play cards or find other relaxure such as
singing,dancing and so on.
It is undoubtly that such relaxion in life sometimes do a lot of good to us.They allow us to relax our tire
body and confused mind.Moreover,we can get some interesting ideas from playing such games.Many of our creative
ideas can be obtainded when we find some relacations in life.However,it is true that many of the relaxions
is not good for our development.It can be seen from many examples.Take a  middle school student for example,
he plays computer games day and night,and many of his study time is wasted.At the end, he cahnnot get any re-
lax from the games.Worsestill,his study is also affected.
As a college student,I think that we should find some healthy relaxion to relax ourselves during our tough
and tire study.I recommend that we play some ball games,or just go out with friends,to talk,to eat out.There
are many good ways we can find in our daily life to relax ourselves,and they can help widden our vision, stre-
nghen our body.All in all,if we control our relaxing time properly and relax ourselves in a healthy way,we can
learn more, and find more fun in our colourful life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 490a2083-c062-3b72-9b19-6a6c267acf7a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainment activities in our daily life. Such as playing sports,climbing mountains,doing some cooking, gardaning,listening music,traveling in some countries, reading, playing computer games, playing kongfu,ect.
As we all know, Some are beneficial to us,while others may do harm to our physical and mental health if we don't control well. Among these activities, we can not only relax ourselves,but also learn some knowledge. But we may become negetive and have bad health if we were addited to computer games, such as dota, cross fire.
As a college student , we are equited with advanced knowledge, we should evaluate it rationally. We should not be addited to  some unhealthy behaviors and try to get off it. I hold the opinion with three reasons . Firstly, we can do a lot of things to relax ourselves in life, not only to throw ourselves in suppositional world. Secondly, it's a direct way to contact with our partners or friends,and we may be more positive and welcome to others.
Last but not the least, we can learn some knowledges to improve the standard of our livings and become more and more happy in life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3e21b562-5ef5-3b8c-8db4-1d688e109b04> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life, we have many sorts of amusement activities for Relaxation.for example:swimming surfing and runing.But as we all know,there are still some unsuitable and sometimes even harmful activities among the activities we take part in,while there are many beneficial activities.
As a university student,I think,we should have the ability to differentiate the beneficial and harmful activities before we enjoy them.We should be capable of making clear our life habits and make effort to avoid harmfulness brought by the disadvantage factors in some activities.
In a word,we just want to have a happy and healthy life.Create a  suitable place for everyone to live in a happiness and our lives more beautiful.So only when we take the essence of the activities and choose the beneficial activities,will we achieve our purpose in our lives.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID db7df9dd-6365-3b2b-aacf-68219fb90abf> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In recent years, the improving of our society which produce more entertainment activities can help us relaxe in life.There are a lot of entertainment,such as basketball,go out for travelling,surfing on the internet,hiking,etc.And different people choose different kinds of activities,for example,some like the challenged activities while others like softy ones.
Because of the variety of the activities,there are also something bad for us.For example,some people would see some uncomfortable information when they surf on the internet,once they get addict into it ,which can make a bad effect on their studty and health .On the contrary,some events such as go hiking,do sports,which can do good to our body,It would make us relaxed,and make us feel confident in dealing with all kinds of things.
As a student in university, In my oponion, I think we should make correct choice according to our own situations.Moreover,we should not condfused by the other people what to say.In conclusion,some reasonable relaxation should be taken to benefit to us and it is necessary in our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3d26670f-d8bf-3f92-9248-178f79a4fcd2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, most people in the society under huge pressure. So, we need some methods to make
our lives more interesting. Fortunately, there're different kinds of relaxation activity for
us to enjoy.
However, among these relaxation activities, some are beneficial to us, while others are not
appropriate or even have bad effects. Take reading for example, some people like to read books
as their way to relax, which can not only provide them a good time to relax, but also let
them know more things about this world. On the contrary, some activities are not that good,
like playing computer games all day long, which is bad for our health and can not achieve the
of relaxation.
As a college student, I think we have the ability to realize which kind of relaxation activities
is good for us. There's no denying that all of us need to relax. But we should find a appropriate
method for ourselves, like doing the sport you like, instead of wasting most of your time on
something that meaningless.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4b63f016-7f1d-3e63-aa38-37dc16664b7c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,we live in a rich and colorful world.
There are a lot of entertainment activities in our daily
life.As the old saying says"every coin has two sides.".
Some entertainment activities are good for us,but others
are inappropriate and even do harm to our health,both physiologically
and mentally.
On the weekends,people always go to play some ball,sing or dance,have a party,drink
something,or maybe just go out for walking,they even can do nothing but be relaxed.
Some are helpful and meaningful for us,like doing sports,you can exercise,while singing
songs,you can get a good intention.But we can not ignore the fact that sometimes some
relaxation are hamlful to our health,for example,playing computer games too much.
In my opinion,relaxation is necessary for all of us.However,every time we decide to do
something,we have to make it clear if it is better for you to do such things and what will
be caused.We can not simply devide something into ture or false.So being responsible to
yourself and others is the most important thing.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2fae054f-5898-3ed7-a2b0-c2291e6a0370> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid development of the society, the daily life is becoming more and more colourful.Many kinds of entertainment spring up quickly. Many people can have their own hobbies,such as doing outside exercise,singing with friends in KTV, shopping and etc.The whole life takes on a relaxed phenomenon.
As an old saying goes "A cion has two sides"As a result, the effects of these activities can make difference in everyone's life. On one side, doing outside exercise can build our strength which can shape our figures.Also, it can makes us healthier and energetic to face the daily fairs which we can hardly finish with badly health.On the other side, some people love to surf on the Internet.So they have a high chance to be addicted to the online games which will do harm to their life. On this condiction, they will lose their dreams and becoming negative. Finilly, they will failed in  their life road.
From my point of view,relaxation is neccessary to everyone,but we should keep a balance between work and relaxation.When we are concentrate on working for a long time,wo could ralax ourselves for a short time which will make us more energetic to finish the work.If we had relaxed ourselves more, we would receive bad effects.The degree is very importment.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID be77e936-7938-34b2-a257-bc7f8dd51b75> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Life can not be always busy, entertainment is necessary. There are various of activities
that can entertain and release ourselves. For example, a celebration party, a short-distance
travel or simply a basketball match.
Many Entertaining activities are helpful to our health, but we can not deny that some of
them may be improper and even harmful. For instance, joining the staff together to play a
basketball game can improve their health condition and makes them more active at work. But
from my perspective, activities like a whole night party in taverns is  no  very  healthy,
which may lead to a bad condition in the next day.
As a college student, I agree that  entertainment is needed in order to reduce the pre-
ssure from our study life. Having meetings with old friends promotes our relationship with
others, and doing some sports benefits our health, which I think is most useful to release
pressure. However, too frequent activities may influece our study,so how to balance enter-
taining and studying is a important lesson we students should learn.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 759deb07-f0a9-37db-aa07-9683c95bb31f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our society,there are too many kinds of activities in our life.When coming in our university ,we find that it is so different.Except for learning,we can do lots of things which we didn't do in our high school.For example,we can join in many club to know more and meet more people.But there are many bad activities.As a undergraduate,we must know what should do and what shouldn't do.
A good activity can improve ourself.When we join in the clubs,we should go to here and there to do many jobs,so if we want to save time,we should know how to work efficiently and how to talk to others kindly.This is a very important skill in our future life.Also,we can learn many knowlodge we don't study in our major.Like playing sports and music, it is helpful for our body and .So we can be benefit from a good activity.
However,there are also a lot of bad activities around us.For example,if we lost in computer games,we won't learn anything and won't pass the exam.And then when we come to society,it is hard to find a job.So if is important to prevent them.
As a student in university,we can do many things and nobody will control us.So it is necessary to control by ourselies.We should know what is good and what is bad for us.Then we can enjoy our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a286de11-c0dd-38cd-a795-24d4f5cf4aa4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Our life is colourful.So is the relaxation. We have many entertainments in our life. But do you care about what we can do for the entertainment in the relaxed time.
As we know, every coin has two sides. So we must distinguish the good entertainment from the bad entertainment in the relaxed time. But how much do you know the bad entertainment. If you don't know, don’t worry about this and I'll tell you more details about this. We always play games in the relaxed time, but it is a bad habit because it is just a waste of time and it cannot promote your ability or knowledge. Perhaps you don't like playing computer games and you like watch the movie or read the novel. If so, you must care about the content of the movie or the novel. If you watch the movie or read the novel that contains violence or eroticism, you must give it up .It is not only a waste of time but also does harm to your mentality. The faster you give it up, the better you will be. There are many bad things that you did it when you have a break. And I think you should think over and over, then you decide to whether do it or not.
What about my opinion? In my opinion, we can do what we want to do that is not harmful for ourselves. So you can play sports, and you will enjoy yourself and strength your body .If you don't like sports, you may have other choice .For example, you can read the newspaper or hear some great music. There are many things that have great benefits to you and you like. Only if we do this can our college students contribute to the development of our country.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7c22a4ae-f88c-3045-9d0e-79fc4524f2b7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
During our lives there are many kinds of things you can relax yourself in your spare time.Like doing sports,such as basketball,baseball,tennis and so on.While others may like playing computer games,sing songs or go to the cinema.
Activities always be the way that people use to relax themselves in order to change a mood.But unforturnately,some activities may do bad effects to our own lives.
We all know that computer games are much more popular among students in nowadays.Sitting in front of the computer  for hours is a tremendous hurt for the students' eyesight.By the way,students may lost in the games instead of learning.
On the other hand,most outdoors acivities are good for people such as football or camping  not only it is benefit to our bodis but also increase our teamwork awarewess.
As a college student,I think we'd better choose more outdoors activities instead of indoors entertainment.When enjoying the relaxation please do not forget the influence that the relaxation breaks to you.Finally,I appeal to all students that when we want to relaxing ourselves in our lives,the correct way you choose,the real relaxation you'll have!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d87fac54-af2d-3616-85fb-2e99f977e319> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the society developed, there are many different kinds of entertainments in our life, enriching our life. For example, people can sing in KTVs, dance in the parks, get together with other people in restaurants and so on.
Some entertainments are good to us, making people live in a positive way towards life. However, there are two sides in a coin. Some entertainments are not suitable for us or even do harm to our health and life, such as climbing mountains without guidance and so on. In my memory, I climbed a mountain with my friend once without guidance. We were lack of the adequate preparations and did not tell our parents. Therefore, we lost our way in the mountain. But to our luck, we got rid of the trouble with the help of the passers-by. Only at that time did I realize that we should have the safety entertainments.
According to my experience, I hold the belief that as a student in university, we should know how to tell the positive entertainments from the negative ones. We are urged to have knowledge on the positive entertainments so that we can have a safety life in our university.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 253ee4fd-f87a-318b-9c49-ec41d0d9fe63> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There're many kinds of relaxation in our life, which let us relax ourselves from busy learning and working. But while most of the relaxation activities are benificial for us, some of them may be harmful. For example, a long time playing of computer game may relax us a lot, but our eyes may be harm by it.
So, if we want to relax ourselves, we should consider about it. Sitting too much may cause some health problem, so relaxation activities which require sitting should not be lasted too long. Sport can keep us fit while relaxing us, but take care or we may be injured.
In my opinion, every relaxation activity may be harmful. So just consider carefully before enjoying it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a32705b2-783c-3524-93f7-2cd70e7db4da> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various of entertainment in our daily life.Like computer games,
chess,card games and some sports.All of above are designed to make us relax
ourself and work more efficient.
Some people think some of the entertainment are good for us,and others are
harmful to us.Because they think there are some entertainment which make the
student who has weak self-control addicted to it.It will cause them lay up
their study or work to play it,which is really harmful.
But I think there are no absolute good entertainment or bad entertainment.
It up to the people who play it.We should not criticize any game like:Hey,
this games make my son addicted to it and can't get higher mark!It just show
that your son can't control himself well.
As far as I am concern,we should bring up our habit of abstention and use
the entertainment to relax ourselves.That will be right.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d4408cad-8720-3455-9a67-2afcea9608f6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In modern life , we have various ways to relax ourselves .The most common way at home is reading news paper , listening to the radio or watching TV. Besides we can go for a trip or have sports which can do good to us . And because of the development of the technology . Mobile devices have becoming more and more important in people’s life as well as in entertaining them . However when people are taking the advantage of mobile devices that they can play anywhere , they also spend less time in doing their work .More over , these small screens can damage their eye sight .As for me , we should have right attitude towards these relaxation in life . The key to it is only just a word ”balance”. Balance your time between relaxation and work , I’m sure your life well be as bright as the sunlight.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1aa299cb-f3ec-3629-8d66-42d72a9d3636> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many relaxation in our life. We can do some sports, play the piano, view on the
internet. All of above can be defined as relaxation.
As far as I am concerned, most Relaxation is benefit, but we should organize and avoid some
relaxation that can be harmful. For example, we can improve our body quality by playing the
basketball, broaden our view by having a travel. But, in the other hand, we may waste too much
time on some computer games. Besides, some relaxation is benefit in a range of time, and being
harmful while out of the range, such as reading novels.
As a college student, I consider that we should make a plan for our worktime and relaxtime.
Worktime brings value, and relaxtime brings sense to our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID befba86f-ad4a-3494-b8dd-f4e7cb0fced3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is not doubt that we will meet many kinds of difficulties on our study and the usual life.So it is very important for us to reduce our stress and anxiouties.
In my oipnion,there are plenty of amusements to relax ourselves in the real life.Such as,listening to music,going hiking,reading books,playing computer games etc.However,as the saying goes"Every coin has two sides."These activities can make us relaxful,in the other hand,they may bring us troubles,too.Playing computer games will waste us too much time that we can't find enough time for studying.And listening too much rock music is harmful to our ears,too.
As far as I'm concerned,we should choose activities that are suitable for us to relax ourselves so that we should adjust us to a perfect level.First,we should realize that what is the most necessary for our brain and body to make sure we can choose the most suitble for us.Nest,don't spend too much time in the relaxation or we may be addicted to them which means we ignore the most important things we should do--living and studying.Last but not least,asking the teachers and classmates for help is also important.
All in all,as a university student,wo should face to the realaxations in life correctly to make sure we lead a happy, meanful and useful life in the four years.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 908d6292-dc49-363f-9478-f999c41ec549> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all,there are a great variety of relaxation in our real life.Everyone has his own favourite relaxation such as play the card games or do some sports or maybe go to coffee house with friends on the weekend.And someone may stay at the dormitory to play the DOTA (an famous game in the internet) as his relaxation.
Take me for an example,as an undergraduate,my favourite relaxation is to find some friends to play the basketball on the weekend because I like this sports games and I think it can keep me health and make me strong and it can also promote our friendship.Sometimes I will stay at the dormitory to play some game when I am bored but it won't take a lot of time.I think is a good way to relax myself after a hard-working weekday and the precondition is the finished-homework.
But someone has a relaxation which I think is bad.Some people like drinking and they will invite their friends to the bar to drink and chat as their relaxation and I think drinking is not good to one's health.we should not take it as a relaxation.Many traffic accident are happened when the driver is drunk.
So on my opinion,as an undergraduate,we should choose a good relaxation to relax ourselves.It can bring a wonderful life to us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6f83ecbd-2733-31d9-9bfe-a9bd435275a8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life, there are many things that we can do to relax, such as listening to some
music, watching some movies, playing computer games, or just reading some books. Doing
some sport is another relaxation in life.
There are so many relaxations in our life, but not all of them are beneficial. Sometimes
we spend too much time on relaxing that we sleep less and can't focus on our study, or even
failed in our exams.But we cannot say that relaxation is not necessary in our life.
Those which help us get rid of our stress in life do be effective.
As a college student, in my opinion, we should avoid too much stress but avoid being
lazy, either. We should keep a balance between relaxation and study.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 648494f5-6be2-3502-b023-c709c91e7975> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of technology,our life has improved a lot.So
there are more and more entertainment activities which make our life
more colorful and interesting.
Many entertainment activities bring us happiness and relaxation
which are good for our health,study and even our life such as listening
to music,climbing mountains,going for an outing and having delicious food
with the family or friends in a wonderful restaurant.There are so many
good ways to amuse ourselves and cheer us up.When we feel upside,we can
consider these entertainment activities to relax ourselves,because nothing
can be done well without good mood.Consequently,entertainment activities
really help us a lot in many terms.
Each coin has two sides.There are also many entertainment activities
which has bad effects.Nowadays,more and more students are addicted to playing
computer games and for this reason,they can't focus on their study and even
leave off their study.What's more,it makes their parents disappointed and sad.
Without a doubt,games can make us relaxed,but if we addicted to it,we are
guatually far away from the real life.Besides,going to bars and playing cards
too often also have bad effects on us.
As a college student,I think we should be responsible for our future,we
should make full use of our time so that we can be the person we want.We should
learn to relax ourselves by taking part in some good entertainment activities
and don't be confused by those bad entertainment activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b719a4ec-2695-3ab0-9875-298cb1b90786> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,we have lots of way to relax.For entertainment,we will do some sports or play computer game or hang out
with friends and family.
There are many activities we can do when we want to have fun.But some of them are not proper.If you spend too much time in
palying computer game or surfing the internet,you probably are addicted to it.Absolutely,it is really harmful to you.You will
reduce the time in communicating with friends and doing physical exercise,so gradually your social relationship will be
terrible and  your body will be weak.And what if you are keen on some dangerous outdoors activitis.That's more horrible.Maybe
you are ambitious,you want to challenge yourslef so you do some very crazy things.Well,it will thereat you life.
In my opinion,it is essential for us to relax ourselves because we often get tired about our study or work.And the most
important thing is how we relax.We have to find a right wany to have fun,not excessively.For example,we can do some easy
sports with our friends.When we play the computer,we must limit the time.After all,I hope everyone can find a perfect way
to be relaxed.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 681c3edc-b8ef-37d6-87e2-9f71bfa88b41> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are lots of different sorts of relaxations in life,such as playing
sports,listening to muisic,reading books and so on.
People will often facing some troubles,thy often fell stressful and nervous.So they always need do something to relax themselves.However some relaxations are beneficial,while others are improper even dangerous.For example: Playing computer games seems can relax  pressure in people's mind,bu if you can not control yourself,it is harmful to both your physical and mental health.
As far as I am concerned,as a college student.Choosing an appropriate relaxation is really necessary,Doing some sports maybe a good way,which can also build your body. What's more, spending on the relaxation should not be too long.Just moderation.With this,you will hava a more colorful life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a18f8ebb-5c57-374a-9381-334883c80a00> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life , we can not just konw how to work ,we need to relax too.
Relaxtion is very important to us.It make us feel good after a long-time work and by
relaxtion we can have a better condition in next work.For example,i like playing basketball
when i finished my homework.Firstly,it makes me feel relaxed and happy.Secondly,I can
have a stronger body too.What's more? I make many friends when playing basketball.
But,relaxation is divided into two part,one part is good for us while the other part
is bad for us.I think ,nowadays,many teenagers are madly cling to computer games.They play
games all day and don't want to do their homework.They forget themselves and may do someth-
ing harmful to other people.Gambling is another bad relaxation.So many family broken because
of it and it creat no value.
In my mind,as a university man.I think we should develop good relaxations and resist
bad relaxations.Only do like this,can we have fun and have a healthy life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 35460dae-9e3d-307c-91a5-c02de126db58> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Entertainment activities are full of our life,such as join a waitz or tango party,do the disco,attend a concert and listen to classical music.
However when you join it, do you be aware of that everything has advantages and disadvantages double properties You may think it is wonderful or think it is just so-so. but do you really know what do you need? Do you consider that when you get around to do some "relaxation", it does fit you or even bad to you?
So now we need to know what do we really need. In my owes opinion, We not only need physical recreations but also intellectual activities. As a college school student, it does not means that the more we attend, the more we get. What we need to do is that we should do what accordance with us .Through that such as camping, participate in more intellectual activities.Do not waste time and never be regret.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID de45ac1f-ead7-3a68-a086-83e75b772d14> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many differents activeties in our life .Some of them is benefits for our life ,but others may haven't good for our life, and then bad for our life.
Making a university student ,I think we should have our own opinion for it .Most of we have 18 years old,so we should haue the ability to
know what benefit we will get from the activeties and what harm we meet in these activeties.Only we have our own know to them ,these activeties
can lend we what we need.And only we have our own opion ,we can reduce harm in these activeties.For example,some activeties about sports usually is
good for our healthy,we should take part in it.But some other activeties is not for our students ,we should avoid .Only when we can know the wrose
and the right ,our life will become more better  .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 76db32b5-c029-38a6-87b6-4072df8bb80b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,we are more and more stressful.Adults are tired of the competition and pressure in work and their relationships,and students struggle for their study.That's why we need relaxation.There are a variety of relaxing activities in our daily life,which is beneficial for us to reduce pressure.However,it's not always right.
When being stressful,some of us may do some exercise,listen to music,watch movies, reading books,etc.These ways to relax are undoubtedly advantageous,while the others are not.
Some people may be addicted to drugs,alcoholic,or computer games,thinking that they are helpful to lessen their mental burden.At first we find that they bring us happiness,and they are good ways to relax,however,when we become addicted,they are harmful to us both physically and mentally,whose disadvantages far outweigh the advantages.
As for an undergraduate,I agree that relaxation in life is of great importance,and we must choose the suitable and healthy ways to relax.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c49ffaf7-d547-3321-9941-451109b9e7e6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all konw, today, relaxation plays an more and more inportant role in our life by
socity developing.The kinds of relaxation also has great increasing.Take my father for example,
In my father's childrenhood,he can only play basketball or other sportsgame.But now,computer
games and singing in KTV is being a big part in his relaxation.
But as a saying goes:every coin has two sighs.With the kinds of relaxation increasing,some
kinds of relaxation which is bad for us are appearing constantly too,such as reading bule
book,gambling and excessive drinking.Those relaxation does harm to our body and our family
so we need to keep a longway to them.
As for me,we are a collage student and we are very important for the country so we have
responsibility not to take part in those bad things.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f653c24a-3f9c-3ca6-aae0-9fea97c178c9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Our sociaty is developing at a high speed that it never had before,and consequently,many  people are working hard not to  be left behind.In the circumstance,relaxation is unavoidable in need.
There are uncountable kinds of way to relaxe.When we want to release our pressure,we can choose to listen to music,play computer games,or paly basketball etc.But among all these ways of relaxation,not every way is a good one.Some of them do no harm to us,but others may help us relax in a runinous way.If we relaxe ourselves by music,games or sports,there shouldn't be any objection to it.Some people consider smoking as a good choise to help them relax,which I don't agree with in that it's a common knowledge that smoking is harmful.Other people prefor going to some places where there are drugs.
In my opinion,we must learn to relax in a proper way,for ourselves,and also for our friends and family.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cc08d9dc-b47e-317e-b820-310047d4feaf> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As a human being in this age which is developing that fast,everyone has his or her own pressures from all kinds of study
or work.Therefore,we need relaxation.
As we all know,there are varieties of relaxation in our daily life.Different people have different method to relax.For a
person,maybe sporting is a good way to relax,but to another person,reading books will be a better way.
But as the old saying goes,everything has two sides.
Among these entertainments,some are beneficial while others are harmful to our mental health.
The internet is a good example of this.With the development of our economy and society,computers have already walked into
every house.On the one hand,itmakes it easier and faster for us to work and study,for example,we can get much information by
means of searching the internet.Then,watching vedios and chatting on line is a good choice for us when we feel tired and
bored of our work.But on the other hand,some people are addicted in it,especially students.They playing computer games every
day,deserting their study and wasting their time and money.
According to example given above,we can get a conclusion that proper relaxation does good to people while if you
relax too much,life will be terrible.It is obvious that we can not live without relaxation,just like fish can not live
without water.
As a fresh man in the college,for my part,relaxation is necessary for everyone,but we need  to relax properly,that is to
say,we should relax at a proper time and in the proper place.The most important thing is that,relaxation is a process,our
study and work is our final goal.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 013a114f-c72e-3292-a8db-e2afc3d3c1fe> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,we are living in a modern life and more and more people are under great pressure.Therefore,how to relax ourselves is a important topic in our life and there is various ways that we are using offen.
However,It is not meaning that all of the relaxation is good for us.such as,many people like singing in the bars,but he will be more tired if he stay for long.On the contrary,some people prefer doing some sports,like swimming,playing balls,running and so on.there is no doubt that these method is very useful to relieve the pressure.
As a university student,I think,there is no the best way to your relaxation but the most  adaptive to you.Facing pressure,some person believe walk is the most efficient way to relax rather than runing.however,some other people maybe prefer running to anything others.Thus,we need to seek to the most appropriate way to rather than the best.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b230a906-3488-3155-bc05-d9158f7f2b4a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, our life really has diversity in recreation. With mordern individuals having higher living standard, they tend to chase after better  quality in all aspects of life, such as fashion、technological production and traveling. This change can be  a positive factor of promoting economic increase.
On the one hand, a great number of these ways of relaxing are healthy and beneficial. Traveling is a typical example of this point. Traveling brings busy citizens to nature to enjoy the sunshine、breathing fresh air、being close to animals. In addition, traveling in a calture-civilized city can be a worthy experience. On the other hand, some of the recreation does harm to people not only in physical health nut also in mental health. It is often heard that a family breaks for the reason of parent's gambling, which easily contributes to kids doing in the same way. Drugs and extreme sports should also be avoided since their leading to bad life habits and making people losing positive attitude to life.
From my perspective, we should have the ability of choosing a healthy way of relaxing .What’s more, we should also consider the expense of recreation and our own financial standard. Having fun in a right way means you know how to enjoy your life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b76610db-5c4f-32a3-80e8-cbdb115648d2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life ,there are varies of relaxation activities around us.Some of them are
benefitial to us ,like sports,hiking and so on.They make us have a good spirit towards life
which improves the rate of our success.However, there are other relaxation activities that
are not proper even do  great harm to our life.For instance,we often surf the Internet to
gain more imformations , but many of us can't defend the various imformation so that we may
'educated' by the wrong thoughts and it may make us live in  a wrong way.In addition,the
computer games can lessen the stress of us students but we are always addicted to it and
then our grades slide down.
As a collage student, I think suitable relaxation is of great importance to us.On the
one hand,it can make us more active in our daily life and bring us more 'play friends'.On
the other hand,it makes our school life more colorful and valuable.However ,it's difficult
to keep the relaxation and study balanced.To make it ,we should have a great ability of self
control ,with which we can give up something for more useful things.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID dc1bcd0c-62d9-38b1-a9f9-b311c7fa4ae7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as the times go by,the life of people are becoming more and more colorful,and
many kinds of relaxing activities play a more and more important role in people'life.Now,
let's talk something about this.
Among all the relaxing activities,some are advantageous,and others are not proper for
people,even disadvantageous.On the one hand,some activities such as playing some sports can help people strength their bodies so as they can charge themselves to concentrate on work better.But on the other hand,some activities like staying up to singing in the KTV or being
addicted to the UNO、DOTU and so on are so harmful.If someone can control himself,it can relax a little,but in fact,these activities are just played when people are bored.People avoid stress and upset through this way,rather than solving the problems ,so they can be addicted these activities easily.
As a college student ,in my opinion,we need some activities to set us free,so that we can study and work better.But we also need something active,for example,sports.We can take
advantages of these activities,but the harmful activities can do harm to us.Of course,we can
do some harmful activities properly,but cannot be addicted.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 605029f1-73ea-3a5a-bc18-fa7a1326f0ba> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many activity that we can take part in today as the technically and the society's development .And the activity can meet all our need, can make us relax ourselves . but on the other hand there are many don't suit us ,or it may have some badly influence to our physical and mental  healthy . As a student in the university, I think relax doesn't wrong .we should relax .because relax can make ourselves feel relaxation, and it's very important especially after a day's hard work. Now there are many people die for too tied .but the pile of it is how we choose to relax.
The relaxation activity quantity is so big, that make we don't know which we should chose .I have an idea to it, that’s we can relax, but the relaxation shouldn't break the limitation. Or it won't relax us ,but may destroy our health .For example ,after a day's learning ,we can have a rest with listening music .we can also just sleep in there doing nothing ,and walking is also a good choice .but the bad choice is to go to KTV to have a whole night relaxation ,but it isn't the true relaxation . The conquence is we may be more tied. The relaxation is brevity .And we can't be real relax from it .So we should chose the best way to relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8c0c6adb-38b4-3c95-b815-80b39336ee2b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Recently,death from overwork has exerted hot debate in our society. Because of this ,more and more
people pay their attention to recreational activities.
There are so many recreational activities in our life.For example,palying all sorts of ball games,
seeing films,reading books and so on.So many choices for us.If you like exercices,spoets games you
can choose.If you like doing something quietly,then seeing a film and reading a book you can choose.
However,not all the recreational activities are benefit.Some of the may be in favor of our health while
others didn't,even worse they may do harm to our development.Just as we all known,exersise and reading
are benifical to us,we should choose them to relax ourselves.But there also some people choose comuputer
games and wine and tobacco to make themselves hurt.
As far as I am concerned,we university students shuold not be a bookworm,deserted us in the laboratory
and see the library as our home.Recreational activities can also do contributions to our development.
Just as the old saying goes,grinding a chopper will not hold up the work of cutiing firewood.So walk out
of the room,do some activities and relax yourself.Then you can reap a different life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 955dde07-a5c3-3aa0-b3e1-15481d38fc41> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In modern society,with the more serious competition,people have much more pressure than
ever before,for which we need badly a relaxtion to comfort ourselves and keep us energetic.
For relaxtion,most of us have a tendency to choose entertainment,such as playing computer
games,helding a party and watching movies.It is various,and we are free to choose any of
them.
However,not every one of them is benefecial to us.For example,no matter your family are
rich or not,you are not expected to hola parties just because you want to take a rest and
enjoy crazy.It firstly do bad to the economic of your family,and to make matter worse ,it
will raise the comparison of money.
In my view,we are required to take a right choose for entertainment.It had better need
less money and can do relax us but not be crazy and make us more tired.Besides,it should be
kept in mind that no matter we choose which entertainment,we should control ourselves and
not to be addicted to it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 16210abd-7a99-314f-8127-9186a375515e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There're many relaxation activities in our life.Without them all we will feel that life is dull.But, as we know,not all relaxation activities are beneficial to us.Some of them will waste our time,money and energy,what's more,they may let us lose our passion to the real life.
For the example,playing the football can strenghthen our body and train our team-cooporating ability.But,playing computer games may more take us far away from the real life.
As a student in a university,I must analyse the problem objectively.I don't be completely against playing computer games or other "dangerous" activities,but we have to control ourself to reduce the time of them.In the same time we should put ourself to work,study or other benificial activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a836da54-7e55-30f8-8480-0efe31783605> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are varitis of relaxation in life .Frankly ,we need relax while we feel tired ,tense.espacially we nawadays live in
a hige-pace socity .We faced with kinds of problems and pressions .So, we need  relax .Some of us may choose to do exercises
,listen to musics ,go shopping ,watch movies or have a talk with others .While others may choose the wrong ways to relife
himself ,such as abusing,drinking,or sometimes gambling ,and that is not the good choose.
Some relaxation do good to ourselves .It can not only makes us feel relaxed but also help building our bodies .when we
feel tenssive or cann't blease under the heavy burdens we suffered,if we choose to do sports to relife ourselves ,we are
right,and the result is that we feel happy and our bodies get exercised . Nevertheless ,some others choose to abuse others
over-drinking or gamble with people. As all of us knowing , abusing people make himself be a bad man and will not accpet by
people ;over-drinking dose dad to his body and gambling wastes his money .
As a univercity student ,I think,we need choose the right way to relax ourselves .On the one hand ,we are students ,on the other
hand ,we should aer the hope of our parents,teachers .so ,thingk it twice while you action.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c788f816-5c1c-33ab-9629-5f5ae7267d1d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,our society is entering a stage of rapid ddevelopment, especially with the rapid
advance of economy and science. As a result of that, everyone in our society is living a rather
buay life. So, knowing how to relaxation oneself from the busy work is really very important
to one's both physical and mental health.In fact, there are so many kinds of relaxation in our
daily life we can choose from.
But, one thing that may draw our attentions to is that not all this relaxation are good for
us. As is known to all,every coin has tow sides.Of course many kinds of relaxtion are benificial
to us, such as doing exercise, singing, dancing, traveling, and so on.While some other kinds of relaxation
are not so appropriate and may even do harm to us, like playing computer games for a long time,
being hard-drinking, taking drugs, etc.
So, as a university student, I think we should promise to choose that kinds of healthy relaxation,
and take the initiative to fight against the harmful relaxation in our daily life. What's more, it's also
our responsibility to try our best to call the persons arrround us to be away of these bad relaxation and help those who have
already taken out of it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 44fd236d-8262-3d68-9be1-f681461f6dab> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are  many differnet kinds of activities for relaxation in our life. Some of them are beneficial
for us, such as basketball, football, chess, reading books, etc., they can soften our freezen brain
after a long time studying, and it can also give us something we can't find on the textbook. Such
as sports can strengthen our bodies, and novel can open our sight, being volunteer can give us satisfaction.
But there are also some impertinent activities to relax and will even be harmful to ourselves. Things
like too much computer games or smoking, they can really give us relaxation, but it will do harm to our
health and our mind. And they will always give endless pain after short-lived happiness.
As a college student, we should choose the correct way for relaxation and arrange our time between study
and relaxation appropriately.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 119aaff1-c59a-3023-8e97-ccc36c55ee0f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
No one in our world can keep working continuously without resting (machines and supermen not included). So, different kinds of ways of relaxing are invented by us human beings.
My uncle is a middle-aged “healthy” man, and I admit that he has a fit body. But to tell the truth, I never think he relaxes healthily. After one day’s working, he always has two choices: stay at home watching TV OR go drinking outside with friends. While he is watching TV, there will always be a cigarette among his fingers.  When my aunt asks him to care more about his health, he says: “I never stay outside for gambling. I play computer games but I never let them influence my job. I drink but I am never drunk. How could you expect a better husband! ”
All right, for a middle-aged man, he may be right. But can we students be satisfied with such status of living? We must study hard at working time, then what about our spare time? Many teens choose to read or play ball games to relax, while the others always play computer games for whole night, or drink alcohols without limitation. These relaxations does harm to both of their study and health.
As far as I am concerned, we should take our roles into consideration when we choose our relaxing ways. Time is valuable, we have no right to ruin our young age. Reading and working  out may be proper choices.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cf93bd1e-06a7-3cf1-bbcc-53735b68856b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,our lives are full of competition.So more and more people
choose to different relaxation to release their pressure.
As we know,there are various relaxation in life.Maybe them all can give us happineess and
make our lives more interesting.But some of them are benificial like travelling aroud the
world or watching some wonderful movies in cinemas, and others may have a bad influence and
do harm to us like being a fanatic of the computer games.
In my opinion,as a undergraduate who has received good education should have more necessity
to choose a correct way to relax ourselves.For example playing computer games can make you
get the transitory fulfillment,but it will let us lose the interest of many things such as
study,commutication with your friends or your families and so on.Instead of it,we can travel
some beautiful places to enjoy the fantastic scenery or going to cinema to see a film .Talking
to your friends is also a good way to realise the pressure.
Relaxation is essential part of our lives,so we should use them in a right way,and don't
let them handle us.That's all ,thank you.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 38112a9a-437f-3494-b48b-ccbf0ec32b99> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of recreational activities in life.Such as playing sports ,shopping ,singing ,dancing ,hanging out with friends ,reading a book that you like ,and so on.These activities play the important roles in our life,they make our life rich and colorful ,and can relax us , make us happy, help us reduce the pressure.
Some of these activities are good,but others are incorrect,even harmful.For example ,the drug taking,which is considered as a kind of relaxation by many people ,even some teenagers, is harmful for our health ,and can destroy our family ,our work ,our life. But although people have known the drugs' harm ,they still choose to take drugs .They cannot get ride of the drugs ,in another words,they are addicted to drugs .So the bad telaxation is easy to make us being addicted ,we shouldn't join them at the very start.
In my opinion,the good recreational activities can relax us from the tired,and also can help us get ride of the pressure,so we should take part in them actively.But these harmful activities are not good for us,not only for our body but also for our spirit.We should be away from them,even stop them if it's possible.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b87c3ea4-17bd-3d65-a37c-171cf0e54d6e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
AS we know,there are various of relaxation in our life.For example,we can play all kind of sports,cards,
computer games and so on.However,every coin has two sides.Some relaxation are helpful for our health as some
relaxation are something we can't fit in.Once we continue these uncertain relaxation,we will get destroy to our
health.As a college student,I have the duty to show my opinion.To be honest,I have many choices when I want to
relax myself and I know that every relaxation isn't good for our health.So it's a must for us to choose relaxation
that are fit to us and helpful for us.In my opinion,sports are helpful when we do them depends on our ability.
And we can listen some music to relax ourselves depends on our mood.To sum up,we should choose relaxation that are
good for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ce18202b-1895-3056-8c87-265995b59f36> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life .relaxation is needed .If we do not have relaxation we will become tired and don't have energy
to domore work ,also our life will become boring .So the entertainment is important .In fact ,our life has a variety
of entertainments .We have many choices .
In fact .many of the entertainments are benefit to our relaxation and our lift .for example running .swimming and
go hiking .But also .some of the entertainments are not good to our lift and hearth .
which even do harm to us such as being addicted to the internet or compurter games.
With such a fact .as an university man we should have an accurate attitude to the entertainment .We should learn
to distinguish the variety entertainments ,to start a hearth entertainment and refuse the bad .Only in this way ,can
we have a really relaxation and beautiful life.
That are all of my opinions .That’s all .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 335ef8f9-c6ac-3c7b-9f8a-e9d9ccd9348e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of sociality we have different kinds of relaxations in our life. Some relaxations are good to us but some of that are bad to us even maybe
harm to us.
I am a studen in university and I have many relaxations in my life. Such as watching move, go shopping, play games. Do some relaxations always can relaxa ourselves
and make us feel happy. It is very important in our life. Do some relaxations to relaxa ourselves can let us do better in study and life.
But I also think we should control our relaxation. There have many kinds of relaxations. And many relaxations are not suit for us. That kind of relaxations will do
harm to us. So we should get amay from that kind of relaxations. And we should judge what kind of relaxations is harm to us by ourselves.
And we need to control the time we spend on  relaxations. Relaxations really help us. But if we spend to much time on it that will bad to us. Suitable relaxations
are what we really need.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 69114579-a658-3d63-9258-d9f5709670c2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know our lifes is more and more busy,because there are more and more works to do.
Therefore,there are all kinds of relaxations to deal with our work pressurre,such as dancing,
exercising,playing computer games,and so on.
There are two sides in one thing.Some of these relaxations are good for our physical and
mential healthy,for example dancing,doing exercises.But some of are not  good for us,even
do great harm to our physical andmential healthy.If you are additided to playing computer
games day and night,you may lose interesting in study,and it is harmful to you healthy.In
a word,there are advantages and disadvantages in relaxations.
As a colleage student,we must choose the  relaxations which are good for our physical and
mential healthy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9bae8b86-ff69-3f1a-81fa-441a2e9e3960> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As wo know ,humans is a creature that lives together.And besides working and studying ,
we have a lot of activiies to relax ourselves and communicate with others.It is obvious that
we can have fun from taking part in it.
Are you keen in joining in social activities? Many of us judge a person outgoing or
not from it.  They think it as a relaxtion,and learn something which can't learn from
classes.Of course, some others may take sports ,listen to music as a kind of relaxtion.
And they are just a necessary for the health of physics ang mental.However,there are so many
activities to relax ourselves, does each one do good for us? We can't admit it. Activities
such as video games,smoking and even druging,how do you think about them ?They may really
bring relaxtion to you,but once adit to them ,you just can't live without them.
As a college student,I think the exitence is the fact that we can't change,but the
choice is in our hand.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 941f5dfb-ed4b-3de2-bb68-ce4c47cb7d92> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the ever-accelerating development of Internet and the rapid spreading of diversities
of electronic gadgets,21st century has witnessed the unprecedent changes in our lifestyle .
And,for instance,we cannot have access to more entertainment than now.Literally,our recreations
are so various that we can safely put that our life is stuffed with recreation.
Nonetheless,not all the entertainments we are subjected to are beneficial.Even worse,some
of them can have our health savaged,spirit corrupted and emotion dampened.
No ona can cast any doubt on the fact the relaxation is a double-edged sword.
Well goes the proverb"No garden can be without weeds"As a college student,i highly recommend that we should take the essence and discard the
harmful part of it.Attractive though relaxation may be,self-controling is required to
prevent us from being a victim of vicious entertainment.Therefore,comprehensive understanding
of certain sort of recreation will be indispensable before you absorb yourself in it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 56beeb41-c086-3b90-965f-770dde2aee8b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many relaxtion in our life,such as swimming,sports,surfing the internet,
watching TV,singing,dancing.Of course different relaxtion have different influence on us,
some relaxtion are benifitcal for us,but some are not,they can even have much bad influence
on us.
Obviously,if we can not tell different relaxtion,the chance are that bad relaxtion will
lead us in danger,So as a collage student,I think we must learn to tell different relaxtion.
And we should not addicted to one relaxtion,we ought to take part in various relaxtion so
that we are able to develope us in an all-around way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 92bee80c-da13-370e-8834-ebc24387c5dd> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are a lot of relaxations in life.For example, we can play basketball,football and other sports,we can sing  and dance and we can watch a movie or watch a game.And of course,these ralaxations make our life more colorful.
However,although there are many good ralaxations in life,there are many bad forms and they do harm to our society.For example,playing sports can build our body and makes us more storng,watching a concert can edify and improve our mind.But if you hit the pipe,although you may be happy for a moment,after this period,you will find it harmful and  ghastful.So there are not only good relaxations ,but also bad ones.
Form where I stand,we should learn how to choose these relaxations.Although some are bad for us,we can take actions to screen these relaxations and then make our society  better and better!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a945324e-31da-356b-8331-8547de9b6d26> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In modern  life ,in order  to relax seflves  in daily work ,we have more and more amnsement
activitives ,such as  going camping ,going to KTV and so on.
H  owever,is every activity good for us?There is no doubt that most of time  they can help us
.With the high pressure in work or study ,we can play basketball,go shopping ,go singing when we fell
tied  at times.But  some  people get into drugs  unexpectedly to get away from the pressure.
Also,activities we ofen take part in may have bad influence on us.IF we just think about going out to
seek happiness.We may let our work and study alone .
As a college student ,relaxtion  in life is necessary.Also,moer acyivities can help us with our student
relationship.But, we must put the study in our heart alaways.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b230a906-3488-3155-bc05-d9158f7f2b4a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, our life really has diversity in recreation. With mordern individuals having higher living standard, they tend to chase after better  quality in all aspects of life, such as fashion、technological production and traveling. This change can be  a positive factor of promoting economic increase.
On the one hand, a great number of these ways of relaxing are healthy and beneficial. Traveling is a typical example of this point. Traveling brings busy citizens to nature to enjoy the sunshine、breathing fresh air、being close to animals. In addition, traveling in a calture-civilized city can be a worthy experience. On the other hand, some of the recreation does harm to people not only in physical health nut also in mental health. It is often heard that a family breaks for the reason of parent's gambling, which easily contributes to kids doing in the same way. Drugs and extreme sports should also be avoided since their leading to bad life habits and making people losing positive attitude to life.
From my perspective, we should have the ability of choosing a healthy way of relaxing .What’s more, we should also consider the expense of recreation and our own financial standard. Having fun in a right way means you know how to enjoy your life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b230a906-3488-3155-bc05-d9158f7f2b4a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, our life really has diversity in recreation. With mordern individuals having higher living standard, they tend to chase after better  quality in all aspects of life, such as fashion、technological production and traveling. This change can be  a positive factor of promoting economic increase.
On the one hand, a great number of these ways of relaxing are healthy and beneficial. Traveling is a typical example of this point. Traveling brings busy citizens to nature to enjoy the sunshine、breathing fresh air、being close to animals. In addition, traveling in a calture-civilized city can be a worthy experience. On the other hand, some of the recreation does harm to people not only in physical health nut also in mental health. It is often heard that a family breaks for the reason of parent's gambling, which easily contributes to kids doing in the same way. Drugs and extreme sports should also be avoided since their leading to bad life habits and making people losing positive attitude to life.
From my perspective, we should have the ability of choosing a healthy way of relaxing .What’s more, we should also consider the expense of recreation and our own financial standard. Having fun in a right way means you know how to enjoy your life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0c4fe5a5-37b1-39f9-bd48-b8a8fb04e55f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation is in plenty forms in life like colors painted on the cloth.Take the following for example:
watching a movie,going out for a walk,listenning to some music and even playing a game or hanging out to shop,etc.
Most of these relaxation,or in another words,entertainments do ease our mind,get the stress off our chest and help charge
our energy.As both the busy work and the stress of living or study pushing us quiker and quicker,a great many people
have a very gloom feelings,some of whom may even find it too stressful to deal with.So vital is the entertainment that it plays
quite a part of life.Different people have different ways to relax themselves.It is one of the best ways to go on a trip because nature
is our best doctor.Talking with a good friend will also make us forget the reality for a while and light up our spirit again.However,
like coin has two sides,some entertainment,instead of doing good to us,it ruins not only our physical heath but also our phycological
health.Some people are crazy about shopping without even knowing why.Whenever they feel unhappy,they go for a shop and buy a lot of
things no matter whether they need them or not.Others are too disresponsible to themselves that they let themselves drink,or smoke
and commonly in college play computergames in lesson time.Of couse there are a lot others destroying some lives.
As far as I am concerned,whatever it is shoud have a sphere of activity.When we loose it,it will propably get out of control and harm us
in a opposite way.A bit of wine benifits our skin and help sleep well while more amout destroy our liver.Entertainment is a way of relaxation,so
so we must know clearly what we are going to do and whether we are doing right.To make it,we should form a good habbit of relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 232d4c40-107c-36af-b7b6-1cba6b2c1fce> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various entertainment ways in our life.People always take the entertainment activities
to relax themselves when they finish a hardworking day.What the entertainment activities do is
to make people happy and forget the unhappiness in their life.
However,just like the weather will not always be sunny,not all the entertainment activities do
good to us.While some activities like doing sports benifits us,something like gamebling may
do harm to ourselves.Many people choose the way to relax themselves based on fun.But if you
are addicted to it,it will do harm to you.
In my opinion,relaxation should be taken in a healthy way which means you should be rational.
Nither playing too tired nor no relax is good.Of course we should take more activities like
sports than playing computer games which will be easy addictted. So we can relax heathier .
Let's enjoy a heathy relaxation in our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 42fea97b-cac4-326b-909b-cb4fc92b9bc4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to us all,several kinds of stress in our life are around the corner! Also,
our shoulders are hard to stand life burdens which are much heavier and heavier.what's more,
under the dark pressure,we 're easy to assume the worst,even make your life appear grey.For
these,I stick to the idea that wo hugrily need a gentle breeze,which means relaxation in
our life!
There are different kinds of relaxation in our life! For examples,some people harbor the
idea that taking exercise is good for their stress relief,including playing basketball,swimming,
baseball and so on! Also,to some people's perspectives,they enjoy playing computer games which
make them high!
From my perspective,some of above relaxations are good for our life! Just like exercise, through
exercise, we can exercise our body to a healthy as well as strong body! Otherwise, some relaxations
are bad for our body and even worse for our study,just like games! They only waste our time
and energy,which means nothing good for our life!
As a senior student, I stick to the idea that we hardly need relaxation in our life with the
reasion that we can not stand the heavier burden with our shoulders! Not only it can relax our
body,but it also good for our study! With this, how wouldn't we do it?

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7bd9f299-346e-3ef3-83fd-1fb6be5199a5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, as kinds of pressure in our life increase, people are hunting different ways to relax themselves. For example, some people may go to the cinema or enjoy a good book or listen to some beautiful music. Some may choose to do sports and play exciting games. Others may have a family or friend party.   In a word ,people relax themselves by doing something that can help them forget or decrease their pressure.
Of course ,proper relaxation may help us ,but every cions have tow sides. For example, some women may relax themselves by doing shopping ,which may spend their money for the next month. And some man may choose to have a somke or beer, which may does harm to their heath.
As a university student, I think wo can relax ourselves by doning some sports or reanding which can rich ourselves at the same time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8c16ab9c-7595-33f5-bb96-b9024934a192> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainment activities in our life.But every coin has two side,some entertainment activities
are good for us,but somedo not,even will lead to gread harm.So as a college student we should have bright eyes to
distinguish them.
But sometimes,it is not easy to distinguish.So what should we do?Firstly,I think listen to the elder is necessary,like
your parents,teachers,senior students,they can give you some good advices to advoid this problems.Secendly,if nobody have
told you,you should distinguish by yourself,you must use your experience,knowledge to distinguish them.Thirdly,if you
are already suffer them,don't be self-accusation,remember them,they will be the good wealth to your future life.
So do your relaxation well,your life will become abundant.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8a2d272d-047f-37b1-873e-087346cb08d5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, there are many relaxation in our daily life, such as TV programs, computer
games and music.
Nowadays more and more people choose travelling as one of their relaxation, during travelling
they can both relax themselves and try a new lifestyle at the same time. It is a fantastic way
to relax, isn't it? Another relaxation which is good for us is doing sports, it can make our
body stronger and let our worries disappear. However, there are some relaxation which can not
benifit us, for example, the computer games, if we can't control ourselves, we will miss ourselves
when playing computer games and the games will do harm to us.
As a university student, I think we should choose suitable way tp relax ourselves. To myself,
I like to play badminton,go shopping and sometimes go dancing. The right ways to relax are necessary,
we should learn to control ourselves and learn to enjoy the suitable relaxation in our life,
then I am sure we can get more besides relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bb7a28a3-d625-3196-b1e3-438f1e9b1e10> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are a lot of different sorts of relaxations in life,such as playing
sports,singing,dancing,reading and so on.
It goes without saying that some of the relaxations are beneficial,while others are
improper and even dangerous.Take sports and computer games as a instant.Playing sports not only
are favorable to people's body,but also can relax pressure in people's mind.However,playing
computer games seems can relax tension,it is harmful to both your physical health and psychic
health.
As a college student,my perspective to relaxation is dialectical.First,choosing an appropriate
relaxation is really indespensable,which can assist you when you need. What's more,time you
spend on the relaxation should not be too long.Just like an old saying:too more is too bad.
Therefore,my conclusion is everybody need a decent relaxation in life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3bae026a-7093-3f5b-873c-b0a724a6e6a7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life ,we may work and study long time.So we thirstyly need to relax.
Naturely there are many kinds of relaxationn.
Different people has different way to relax themselves.But some relaxation
is beneficial,the others is bad maybe dangerous.The proper way to relax can
genuinely rest people.Many people likes to play sports when they feel stressfull
when they run or swim,they can forget the frustration and unhappy thing.In addition,
they can build self-confident.But some people use impertinent way to relax themselves,
Not only no use it is,but also do harm to people.Many students like to play
computer game in weekends.They will feel tireder when Monday.
personaly speaking, I like to play basketball when I want to relax myself.I think the
way I use is pretty good.When I finish.I feel so good.It is the basketball that refresh me.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 23ad77ec-e359-35b2-be1b-6281f5b1c140> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many different kinds of entertainment activities in our life.We can  play
sports after the hard work and study . When we feel bored , we may play the execiting
computer games to kill the time.
But every coin has its two sides,entertainment also can be good or harmful.Some of
them,such as sports , chess,is good for our health ,which can help to strengthen our
bodies and pratice our mind.But  other of them,if you take it inapporiate,can ruin your life. If you play dangerous sports,it may harm the body .When you are out of control and indulged games, it ruin your study.
As a university student, I think attitude decides everything . We can't live in a world without entertainment . We should relaxe when we are tired or bored so that we'll have the power to face our life .But we should take it moderate so that we won't be affected by the harmful side of the entertaiments.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 50acf2e7-82fe-3ad1-bce7-824e12018c73> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are a large number of entertainments.They make us get relaxed
after work and study.As we all know,it is important to hold the balance of the body,so
entertainments became necessary.But something we should keep in mind is that some entertainments
are not suit for us and even cause damage to us.
on the one hand,entertainments like reading famous books,singing songs and playing
the piano are good for our mental development.but on the other hand,such as drinking a lot
to reduce the pressure,smoking to relax are not the good ways for our health.
being a student of university,frome my point of view,only to have a soft time after
hardness time can we know the truth of the life.We are not robots.But at the same time,we
also should keep our eyes open to get away from the bad entertainments.Only in this way can
we enjoy a better and relax life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7bbf81d3-7fa8-30f4-8d76-c07495efd008> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the development of the society, we have many kinds of advertisement activity in our life. Like computer games and BBQ. We can fulfill our life with them in the free time. With more and more advertisement activity coming out, the social life becomes more colorful.
Actually, some of the activity will do good to us, but the others is not suitable to us, even doing harm to our life. In our life, the opinion of the activity is vary from different people. Like the limit sport, the teenage will have the point that it can show the ability to the sport. But meanwhile, it will do harm to their body.
As a college student, I have the opinion that we should make the choice of the activity in our life. We have the ability to tell the differences from the goodness and the badness of the activity. In one hand, we can have more chances to take part in the game. In the other hand, trying our best to enlarge our goodness we can get from the games.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6fb1ca28-8d26-31e1-80af-9bfc1ce854e7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our society,people enjoy more and more entertainment to relax themselves.So there exist many varieties of entertainment for people to choose,which makes our life really colorful.
Although we have different ways to relax,some are good to us,some are not suitable enough,even cause harm to us.For instance,when we feel so frustrated and upset for some reasons,the most convenient way is to listen to music.Everyone konws the good spots music has,it can let our brain calm down so that we can get much relief.But if you choose to somke,drink,sleep or play computer games all day,it might do harm to our health.Not only not can we be calm,but also feel worse.So it is really important for us to choose the right ways to relax.
As a college student,we should have a specific brain to decide which one to choose to relax.We ought to choose the good ways and refuse the bad ways so as to make our body and mental be strong and healthy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 57ed86f8-fb9f-38a7-a9f6-3d93c525ba9e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Our lives is filled with plenty of amusement,such as swimming,visiting parties,playing
computer games.To keep health body,we go swimming and play tennis.To meet the challenges,
we play the games.what's more,we visit kinds of partys fot building good friendship with
friends.The activities stay in all the conors of our lives.Therefore,it become nessary to
us.
However,some of amusement is of great importance to us,others is not.We'll have the sick
feeling,after playing computer games for several hours.On the contrary,if playing sports
tegother with friends,we can not only get the strong body,but the nice friendship with
feiends.
As a student of university,I think we are not support to leave out the advantages of
amusement.Therefore,we should try our best to join in the activities.But when we do any
of them,we should take the reasonable time to do it.Because anything is wrong,when we do
it out of the standard.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f934b451-0a69-3021-ac26-a099b0bb79fe> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our society in recent years,   people's life have changed a lot. Most people live a rich but fast rhythm life.  In the sane time, many people always feel  tired and stressful. Therefore, varietis of  relaxations come into being.   However, everything has tow aspects, so as to our relaxations. On one hand,some relaxations are not only benefit to our physical health but also good for our mental health. Like singing , hiking and playing sports and so on. On the other hand, some bad relaxations are poison to us. For example,some stars are crazy in wasting moneying buying luxurations. Even more, they also drink wine and smoke drug  to seek a short fun in the heavy pressure. This also can happen in some students!
As a college student, I think some necessary relaxing can adjust our life. We can exercise ourselves and develop friendships with classmates in kinds of sports and entertionments.But it's dengerous to take part in those bad relaxations,they will be bad for our health and even cause crime! So ,we should be cautious when we choose the way to relax ourselves . And it's our duty to advise people around us to pay full attention to this.  Then, we will live a really happy life!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 73bc5b5c-645e-3944-9875-613520db28eb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that varies kind of entertainments surround us in our daily life.But as
every coin has two sides,entertainments have advantage or disadvantage one.
As a college student shouldering with the bright future,we must responsible for ourself in choosing
what we relax in our daily life. If it leave for me,I will not hasitate to choose reading
books and listenning to the music.Just like the old saying goes:Knowledge is power.Life is
not all rose, when I'm down or lose,books may act as a beacon to shake away the dark night
of my heart .Besides, reading books can enhanse my knowledge and widen my horizen.On the other hand,
with the development of society, computer plays a more important role in our daily life,but
we can't depend on it.
We should calm down to think over what is more advantaged for our life,as far as I'm concerned,
reading can let me fly higher.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e34ddd39-3d71-312a-9c0e-cea4951fc2d5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of amusements for us to relax ourselves in our life nowadays,
such as singing in KTVs,having a picnic in a park or on the shore,dancing in the bars
and so on.
Just as a coin has two sides,these amusements do not all have good benefits.Some of
them are good for us,such as singing in KTVs on weekends with several friends,having
a picnic with families.But some of them are unsuitable even harmful to us,such as riding
bicycles or motorcycles in a high speed just for excitement without considering others
safety.Some people may drink a lot of wine for bad feelings, which is bad for his health.
In my opinion as one of the students in university,I think that there need to be a limit
when we relax ourselves through some amusements,otherwise all amusements which are
aimed at finding relaxation will end up with bad results.It can be proved in many cases.
For example,a worker felt so tired when he continued working for many days,so he decided
to relax himself by drinking some wine,but he drunk too much,and lost his life due to his
limitless drinking.Besides,except the limit to our reflaxation,we also need to choose the proper
ways to relax,which is also important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6b7af063-b0d4-3d23-9729-e9e3f58b0311> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are uncountable kinds of relaxation in our colourful life.Just as a man said,"one
can't work all the time ,or he will be a slave."
Relaxation does good to our body.For example,reading a book quietly at home alone can
relax our nerves about life and broaden our horizon.However,not every relaxation is beneficial
to us,such as drinking alcohol,playing computer games for a long time or driving a car crazily
on the road.These may do harm to our or other's health.
As a university sudent,I suggest that everyone should choose a sport game as their relaxation
,because with technology developing quickly,people lack exercise a lot.If sports became relaxation
people could both feel easy in their heavy life,and strongthen their body.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bdb62c07-9695-3658-8802-fdd23b890ed2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of economy,we have many various entertainment activities which made
us relaxin our lives.Such as,surfing in the internet,watching TV and playing mobilephone
games.There are too many entertainment activities to we don't know what we should choose.
So we should know what entertainments is good for us and what entertainments is bad for us.
Excepet the relaxation which the entertainment bring for us,wo also can get some useful
things from these entertainments.For example,we can open up our view when we surfing in the
internet.But some entertainments would bring harm for us.Just like climbing mountains,some
people was dead when they do this for relax.
As a college student,my opinion is we should be careful to choose our relaxations.We should
choose should entertain is benefit for our studies,which reading the professional book is good.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 51afa99f-0fe8-3a8d-8a76-5f35c73f28e0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as the rapid development of the society,there are more and more
entertainment appearing.For example,watching a film,going to the pub,singing in the
KTV and so on.
Entertainment activities can make us feel relax after a whole day work or study.
Both our body and mind can be full of energy after relaxation.Obviously,it can let us
continue our work or study at the night time with a great condition.But every thing has
two sides,too much entertainment activities can also do harm to ourselves.Entertainment
can let us feel relaxed,but sometimes it also do the opposite thing.If you spend too much
time in playing outside with friends until midnight,it will use up your body energyand make
you feel more tired than before.Apparently,you sleep less and become extremely tired the
next day.
As far as I am concerned,we should take a right way to enjoy the entertainment
activities.First,we should find the one which you like and suitable for yourself.Second,
we should not spend too much time on it or it will consume the extra energy of your body.
By and large,if you do it in the correct way ,it will be great to your life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 983abd26-62b1-38ff-b8c9-c9de86a989aa> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of relaxations in our life.People has their own special style to have a relax to reduce their life stress in work or in study.All work and no play make jim a dull boy.It's impotant for us to have a break.
Listen to music、have a holiday、walk in the park、watch movies...oh ,there are kinds of things we could do . Some of them are benefit for us,we could have a positive attitude toward life and full of energy.However a part of activeties are harmful and may bring an big influence.Like teenagers prefer playing computer games,.As a result it takes their  much time which they should spent on studying.
As a undergraduate student,I think choose proper relaxations  entertain you but would not bad for your body or mind.It's only need for helping us avoid stress when we  on our way pursuing dreams.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID de3df407-fbd8-3767-83aa-4dbdd14a34c5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the morden life, there are many kind of ways to relax oursleves.For instance, we
can whatch TV ,play the computer games,play the basketball,play the gituar.We can also
have fun with our friends.Therefore,we may never warry about the relaxation in life.
However,not every kind of way to relax ourselves is good for us.Playing the computer
games is a good example.Some people are addicted to it.What's more,they can not control
themselves,playing the computer games become the only thing they can do.So,some kind of
relaxtion ways may inflence our normal life.
Not all the ways are bad for us.Some of that are good.And can help us to become healther,
such as doing some sports,listening to the music,talking to our friends and so on.
As a university student,I have my own idea.In my opinion,we should find the best way for us
to relax ourselves. And remember that,whatever you want to do,do it in the right way,control
yourselve is the most important.
Life need relax,life need fun.Let's have relax in the right way.And be a happy man.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 49e66e40-1ed7-3dd9-8bed-6def7fe1123a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
entertenment is the nessesary things of our daily life.with the development of economic of our
world the kind of entertenment become more and more rich.and the condition of our entretenmend
dustry also bring about many problems.
we often go swimming and sometimes we chat or play computer game on line.movie is also popular
among on our teenagers.so we have  assce to many kinds of activities to get relaxtion.but every coin
has two saide .the disadvantages of this kind of retertenment are also  obvious.like play computer games
and do some ultimate sports.lt may bing about bad infection even harmful to our health.
as a freshman.i think we should considor many times and then todicide whether do it .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d7390170-697d-37f2-9300-ffa81d5697e7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are all kinds of relaxations around us,and It is no doubt that we
need them to make us get relaxed from the busy daily life,when we feel anxious before going
to an interview,we can listen some soft music,which can get us not be out of breath.After
five-day-work from sitting on the chair,we can go to play basketball or football ,keeping us
in a health state.
But everything has two sides,relaxations still have some disadventages,for example,the
computer games,it is a good way to make us get relaxed if we play it in a fitted time,but
unfortunately,many people are indulge in it,even get into a no sleep,no food lever,it is
not the relaxations what we said to,it doesn't do good to us,just short our life.
As far as I concerned,we need relaxations,which may make us happy and get relaxed from
the fast-pace world,but we need to clear that relaxation just relaxation ,it can't be a part
of our common life,we need health ,we need to get developed,so not to indulge in them,and
keep clear that our life will become fantastic because of relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 37c45a0f-fc7f-36e1-891a-c86948133fbb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there is no doubt that we live in the world which is multicultural and creative.Along with
the rapid developement of the economic,it brings out more pressure to our people in the earth.In the
consequence,our people need more relaxation in life.
As is known to all,there being more and more people who are aware of pressure release,we creative mang
kinds of amusements around us.Just as what we students can enjoy everyday,movie theatres and KTV would
not be the worse place to go.What'more,we are able to surf the Internet as long as you like.Boys'favorite
sports like soccer,basketball,tabble tennis,volleyball would be a good choice while girls'love for dancing
and singing.At last,it seems that playing golf,fishing and many other things are popular withthe rich.
There is no denying the fact that every coin has two sides.The amustment is not the exception.They make us
relax while some of them make us lose ourself like online gaming which does great harm to us.
For my part,it wuld be better for us to choose the amusements that are beneficial to us.Otherwise,you would
be the one who may lost your goal even your life.From now on,have a goood choice and enjoy your life
.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4ce9e136-055b-3d5e-b2e3-5af71078e31f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many things for  releasing our pressure in our campus life.Such as
doing some sports,playing computergames,wacthing films.
College  life is more out of schedule than we in high school.So we have more
time to do what we like to make our pressure get a release.Nobody can live in a
high pressure enviornment for a long time ,so we have to get little relax at times.
So,it's important to know the right way to release ourself.
Some activities for amusement are good indeed,but there are also some activities
that may do harm for our well-being.We should get to know what is right and what is
wrong.
As a college student, most of us are in our adult age,we have the responsibility
to do the right thing as exampels for the young. There are some exampels of harmful
ways for relaxation .Wacthing porn films ,doing dangerous deeds ,teasing at someone
and so forth.All these things are meserable.I hold the idea that we should do something
that is good for our society's stablebility .
We should find the right way for our relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 19ab9930-566d-34dc-bc37-03a6369b15f3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are many relaxations.We can relax ourselves and make us ready
for the new challanges.Sometimes it may be good for our study and work,but it does harm
to us when we take wrong activities.
With the developement of the society,the ways of relaxation are changing,too.Most young
people like going to singing or dancing sometime.It's a pretty good way to put away the
work and have a really good time.After that,we can have more energy to start our work and
the relaxation plays a important role in our life.And by that way,we can also have a healthy
lifesyle.However,not all relaxations are beneficial like the singing or dancing and other
good ways of relaxation.If you take the staying up late or playing computer games all day
as a way for relaxation,you can not have a healthy body.In another word,It can not relax
yourself at all.
As for my opinions about relaxation activities,I think we should balance it and our study
or work.Just like the two sides of one coin.Choosing the right relaxation is important for
all of us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8606f766-33c3-3369-b629-54c5cb590104> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Everyone roading a boat in the ocean of life.When you feel tired and oppressived,what would you prefer to do to relaxed yourself?One thousand readers have one thousand Hamlet.Some people would like to play computer games,others may like to do exercise.There are many roads to Roman,which do you perfer?
Every coin has its two sides.The ways to relaxed just like it.The amusements for example running,exercises,reading,pouring your words are healthy and positive.But such as fighting withers,playing computer all day and night.They are halmful for your mood,which make you boil at times.A right way is so important that a person not to lose.
In my oppoint,As a college student,everyone should have a personal way to relaxed.But we should differentiate them first.And don't take your majors to relaxed.We can choose the positive way to not only relaxe yourself,but also improve yourself.The relaxations should play a part in life because of you.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ef1d0a56-8ebf-3109-a329-f729a8c6c115> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern world,people all have hard work and always under the hard pressure.Because of that relaxation in life is of importance to people.There are different activities of amusement.As what i know,we can shopping,doing some sports,going to ktv and so on.Different people will choose different activities.These activities make our life more colorful and relax us.
But in the real life,we will find that it is not all the activities benify us.In the one hand,some activities really are favour of us.Take sports as an example,it is a really good way for people to relax themselves.Doing sports,people not only can relax themselves,bu also
can strength their bodies.And sports also can make people become energetic and out going.In the other hand,some activities do harm for people.For example,some people like to go to the ktv and sing.But ktv is a place which can make people confused.Ktv is not the place for students.Some bad people in that will hurt the students.
In my opinion,we must choose the way which is fit for ourselves.There are lots of relaxation in life,but not all of that are fit for us.As a adult,we should differentiate it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 49340685-4168-3324-bbef-fb9e92dd4494> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainment activities in our life everyday.Some entertainment activities are beneficial to us.But there are also some are not proper,even do some harm to us.
As a colledge student,I think Relaxation is very important to us.AS we have study oneday,We can do some activities we are interested in to relax ourselves,such as do some sports,watch TV or surf on Internet.It's not only can make ourselves relaxed and happy,but also can develop our habbit.What's more,when we do some relaxation with lots of people together,it can improve our ability of communication and makes friends with other.We will feel our life is colorful.On the other hand,we can't set your works and study aside just to play.Relaxation should be proper,We must contorl the time and can't indulge in it.Choose entertaiment activites is also important.It must be healthy.We must relax ourselves in right way.
In a word,Good relaxation is nesseary,but we must do it in plan.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 43bf9da6-4119-3b55-9c6d-7adc253dd5c5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development  of  the  society  and  economy ,people are busy working and study-
ing,they spend little  time  or  even  no  time  in  doing  sports  and  activities  to  rel-
ax  themselves ,especially the white collars.
There  are  many  kinds  of  activities for us  to   choose  from  .we  can  choose  it
basing  on  our  interests .however,some amusement  activities  are  good  for  us ,some are
had  a  bad effect on our body  and  mind ,so we  must  pay  more  attention to  how  to cho
se  it .for   example ,drinking  is  a  bad   choose  to  relax ourseves.
In my  views,as a college student we can  take part in sports  and  orgnise a  party  to singing and dancing ,and traveling is also a
good way.Only  in  this  way  can  we  relax  ourselves and   live  a  happy  and   healthy
life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3cd4b0ad-f702-359c-9091-4fea09b28e37> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is a great deal of way to relax ourselves in our life.For insistant,we can choose do
some sports,sit down for a cup of tea,sing songs,talk to dear friends and so on.Different peo
ple choose different way to relax,to get them away from their work or study for even a little
while so that they can feel a bit relaxed.
However,not all the ways of relaxation do benefit to people,some of them may not proper for
people,even do harm.When you consider sports as a kind of relaxation ,there is no doubt that
it will be beneficial to your health.But if you think relaxation is equal to seeing movie at
home for a whole day,you may have a bad eyesight.Even worse,if your way of relaxation contains
alcohol and drug,you will stand the bitter they bring to you.Only when we judge the good way
of relaxation from the bad ones,we can do the real relaxation.
As a college student, I think we should realize the true meanings of relaxatinon so that
we can choose some way of relaxation which is fixed to us.First, we should do more sports and
travel outdooors if we can .Instead of watch TV in the house,we should go out to appreciate
the scenery of nasture and breathe some fresh air.Second,we can read some books we like to increase
our knowledge.Afterall, the relaxation good for us is worthy to do.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9cdc92ea-d17b-31a9-89b2-3e096821fa6c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are a diversity of entertainment activities in our daily life. Some of
them are benificial to us,however,still some are inproper.Sometimes they may even do bad to
our life.As a college student,following are my own opinion.
As far as i am concerned,exposed to plenty of entertainment activities,we should keep calm
learn to make choices.At current,every person all has his or her own pressure,so entertainment
activities are becoming necessary. Good relaxing project can make us do better in our work or
study.I prefer doing some exercises such as walking ,runing ,swimming ,playing badminton and so on.
in my opinion ,we should consider the price ,time,the advantages when we choice relaxing activities.
And the most important thing we have to consider is whether it do good to your own life.we should have
our own ideas and try to find the correct ways to relax.
what's your opinion about relaxation in life?

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7e996b4b-d5b7-3d6f-8c8f-8c26b8bf6099> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our lives, there are kinds of enterainment. For example, in the Spring Festival,
people will hold a lot of Full-length theatrical performances, like Spring Festival Gala,
and dance of dragon or lion.
Some of the relaxation can help people relax and make them happy. However a part of enterainment
would be unsuitable and even do harm to people, such as playing mahjong, which may make
people addictided and waste much money.
As a college student, I think we should have a number of relaxation, and the relaxation
should be suitable and help us relax or learn something, such as listening to the music,
watching movies, doing sports, and so on.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f83b0cb2-9a60-3044-ac31-3be5dda095a3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, people can not live without recreational activities. Entertainment has become an important role of our lives. It can make people relaxed so that people can be less stressful.
There are varieties of entertainments such as watching a sport game, watching a movie, singing or dancing and going to shopping. However, whether all the relaxations can do good to us? The answer may be No. Some relaxations, for example, playing video games attracts a great deal of people including children and adults. If you play video games at a proper time in a proper place, they can be beneficial because they can relax you. But if you get addicted to it, the cause may be terrible.
From my perspective, relaxations is necessary but not too much. We should relax ourselves in a proper way. What’s more, we should choose some correct relaxations. Playing sports are much better than drinking, do they? If we have relaxations in a right way, they can be beneficial.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4473793b-5292-3c6b-b557-61ad4d7dcc0c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are so many kinds of relaxion ways in our life.Thanks to that,
our life become more colorful and less pressful.
On the one hand,the right way of relaxation can lead us to a better life.It makes us
feel more relaxed after doing relaxation.What's more,it makes possitive effect upon our
life.On the other hand,if we choose the wrong way to do relaxation,the situation will become
worse.For example,some students always say that they feel pressful and couldn't afford it
any more.So they turn to play computer games.But lots of students are addicted to the games
and can't live a healthy life.What's worse,their study and relations with people become
nervous.
As a modern college student,there are some points in my mind.Different choices makes
different effects in our life.We must be careful of choosing the relaxation in life.In my
opinion,what the good relaxation is reading classical book,listening soft music,doing some
sports you like and so on.
As fact,there are a variety of relaxation in our life.If we choose a right way,I bel-
ieve your life will become more easy and relaxed.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 64440138-856d-3039-8d43-a4660ca5b6d3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the devolopment of our society,there are more and more amusements provided to us,
such as playing games on computers,dancing in a bar,and singing and so on.
As the saying goes,"a coin always have two sides".Some relaxation is good for us,like
doing sports with our friends in free time,which can both make us happier and our body stronger.
But,in some ways,some of the amusements are unsuitable,even harmful to us. As we know,
many young people like singing in a bar at night and go back home when it's very late nowadays.
It must be bad for our health.
Because of many ways,our amusements are too many so that we can not make right choices.
In my view,as a student,we should not pay much attention to play or relax ourselves,and it is
more important to us to be good care of our study.Of course,we can do same relaxation when we
have over all thing we should do.And suitable amusements will make us relaxing,and have more
energy to work and study.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7a856fc3-8d6d-3109-8170-006486ba0183> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
nowadays,there are more and more entertainments in modern society.Moderen people are serious
about ther job so they have a passion for doing something happy for fun.It is usual for people
to surf the internet,play basketball and so on.
As is known to all ,there is two sides in one thing.Some relaxing activities are beneficial
for us while some activities are harmful for our mind.We can not take it for granted that
our body is very strong with the help of the developement of the medicine.Drinking too much
will do harm to our mind and takes up  a great deal of our time to recover.Instead,doing sports
contributes not only to our body but to our mind.
As a student of university, in my opinon, we ought to choose the relaxation that suits
our body and our mind.The balance between body and relaxing activities can not be broken.I hold a opinion
that the most fitting way to relax is to take  part in all kinds of sports .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 96a1d076-0994-3507-b63e-1be54b42d7d2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our regular life, there are all kinds of entertaining ways for us to relax, descreasing our tireness and worry, after
we end our daily job. For example, we can run on the track, play computrer game, see moive and so on.
Also, for erveryone, such relaxation ways always play different role in our life, and some would do well to us, while
some would be bad for us,and even produce some damage. At present, nearly all person think that the way which influent our
job or school work is the impertinent entertainment, such as playing computer game,seeing moive,etc.So naturally,such way
will be sort out to bad things for us.This is the present trend in our society.But is this trend right?
As a university student,I don't agree this incorrect thinking, or viewpoint with prejudice. For me, there aren't any
harmful entertained ways for us,even playing computer game and so on. Another, any sports also can do bad for us, if we are
addicted by it and use too much time in it ,which makes us forget our work. So any entertained sports can be tried,but firstly
we can't use too much time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d406d8b0-8f2c-34ce-bed9-ec1ac09fb295> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the technique developing, there are much more ways to do the relaxation
than before. Such as doing sports, playing instruments or more often to our
freshmen, surfing the internet. But the question is, which is the best way
to relax?
Some of the relaxation are beneficial while the others would do a little
harm to us. For instance, getting exercises can help us get fit while playing
a lot of computer games may cause serious short eyesight and a lot of pain in
neck. Recent years, increasing students are preferring to stay in house and our
figures are decreasing rapidly. It means a lot to us to find a both healthy and
good way to relax.
As a university student, we should learn to control our ways of relaxation.
Going outdoors to breath the fresh air may be a good choice. We must choose a
healthy way to relax.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2da6e0ee-8cf0-387d-9681-fa99759c8bf5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the technology and ecomy develop so fast,people's life become more and more multiplex,
also more and more pressed.Consequently,when people is anxious for relaxation,them have many
ways to make it.However,not all the modern relaxation way is heathy.Some is good,some is
neutral,and even some is bad.
when it comes to relaxation,many people think about sports or Internet immediately.As for
sports,it is good for people's physical and mental health in the most terms.But for Inte-
rnet,it will be harmful to people's health sometimes,especially for teenages.Of course,
Internet is so helpful at most times.But when it come to grambling,it will be so terrible,
no good things.
As above,when wo relax properly,we can also learn something that isn't written on paper.
Widen your heart,and adjust you mood,then you'll find every day is fresh.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 74086ce5-034b-3f0a-99be-0d8790f3aa81> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid development of economy,relaxation activities have been playing an
increasingly important role in our day-to-day life.There are all kinds of relaxation
activities in our life,such as playing basketball,listening to the music and watching
movies.We can relax ourself throuth these ways and work more efficient.
However some relaxation activities are good for us,the others are bad.Even some relaxation
activities will do harm to us or others.For example,if we sing aloud at the night,it will
affect others and our relationship will brought up.So it is important for us to choose
relaxation activities.
As far as my knowledge is concerned,undergraduates should choose approprite relaxation activities.
In one hand,the relaxation activities we choose should be good for our study and life;in
the other hand,these activities can not do harm to others.If we can

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID deb99bc8-fd1e-3335-9c0f-4e6bffadc761> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
The society developing fast, people are forced to get accustomed to high pressure and less
leisure time in their life. Hence the relaxation activites in daily life take a more
and more significant role.
In fact, there are abundant and various entertainment activites in life. On one hand,
many choices on physical entertainment are always available for us. Thanks to the technology
traffic and economy develop, we're able to travel on holiday; we enjoy great fun in hundreds
of playgrounds; we will never be bored with some hiking or gymnastics practice. On the other
hand, life is filled with mental entertainments. Thoudsands of moves are always available;
museums always provide us with good exhibitions; hobbies relax you yourselves even at home...
However, some of these activities are beneficial while otheres are not reasonable even
harmful to us. For the beneficial ones, we relax in a healthy way. Futhermore, these activities
have the function that providing knowledge or inspirations to people. But as some people only
cares about money as profit chasers, they create some harmful ones. Take gambling and watch
violent or porn videos as examples. People,especially children and teenagers, enjoy no relax
but recieving terrible misleading.
Being a university student and educated well, I put great emphasis on making wise judgement
while relaxing. No matter what your hobbies are, what your age is, it is obvious that you should
never forget to stay in critical thinking and correctly recognize the surroundings. Hence we
should relax ourselves in a right way and choose healty activities. Only when you do properly
can you get real relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 119aaff1-c59a-3023-8e97-ccc36c55ee0f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
No one in our world can keep working continuously without resting (machines and supermen not included). So, different kinds of ways of relaxing are invented by us human beings.
My uncle is a middle-aged “healthy” man, and I admit that he has a fit body. But to tell the truth, I never think he relaxes healthily. After one day’s working, he always has two choices: stay at home watching TV OR go drinking outside with friends. While he is watching TV, there will always be a cigarette among his fingers.  When my aunt asks him to care more about his health, he says: “I never stay outside for gambling. I play computer games but I never let them influence my job. I drink but I am never drunk. How could you expect a better husband! ”
All right, for a middle-aged man, he may be right. But can we students be satisfied with such status of living? We must study hard at working time, then what about our spare time? Many teens choose to read or play ball games to relax, while the others always play computer games for whole night, or drink alcohols without limitation. These relaxations does harm to both of their study and health.
As far as I am concerned, we should take our roles into consideration when we choose our relaxing ways. Time is valuable, we have no right to ruin our young age. Reading and working  out may be proper choices.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f2ba41f1-dccb-328d-8483-f15d8d9b710c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Without relaxation,life can't be called life.Someone famous said it.
I can't agree more with him.Especially at this time,more and more people choose to work hard day and night to earn more money and make a good impression on thier boss,even forget to relax themselves.It's unwise,at least in my view.Every one
of us need relaxe.Relaxation is one of the most essential thing in our life.
Nowadays,with the fast-improving of the technology and the economy,varies of entertainment activities flood in our life.
KTV,Carnie,Bar and etc.,we have many chooses in choosing where to relax ourselves,to release our stress in work or in study.Singing,dancing,eating delicious foods,drinking with good friends and so on ,we have so many way to relax.
But there is no doubt that some entertainment is advantage to us ,but some is unpropriate,even harmful.
As a campu,from a perspective of mine,we should choose what is good for us and keep clear.We need relax,but not overindulag.Freaking-out is not our choice,even though,it can make us happy.In one word,Relaxation is the must,but not the bad one.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1d9048e6-0584-3535-85e6-f2c15b599e6d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a variety of relaxtions in our life,such as joining clubs in school,doing gyms after work,having a party with
friends on holiday.
Many kinds of relaxtions are benefitial to people.For example,doing gyms is a great contributor to our
health.Apart from this,having a party with friends and communicating with them regularly do help to our social
relationships with other people.However,another sorts of relaxtions may do harm to us.For instance,gambling,which is a
waste of money,is also considered illegal.
As an academincian,my opinion towards relaxations is that we should maintain the good entertainment activities and keep
away from the harmful ones.We can get rid of tiredness and boredness through beneficial relaxations which have a good impact
on our daily lives,and remember that the harmful relaxations will only do the opposite.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 119aaff1-c59a-3023-8e97-ccc36c55ee0f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
No one in our world can keep working continuously without resting (machines and supermen not included). So, different kinds of ways of relaxing are invented by us human beings.
My uncle is a middle-aged “healthy” man, and I admit that he has a fit body. But to tell the truth, I never think he relaxes healthily. After one day’s working, he always has two choices: stay at home watching TV OR go drinking outside with friends. While he is watching TV, there will always be a cigarette among his fingers.  When my aunt asks him to care more about his health, he says: “I never stay outside for gambling. I play computer games but I never let them influence my job. I drink but I am never drunk. How could you expect a better husband! ”
All right, for a middle-aged man, he may be right. But can we students be satisfied with such status of living? We must study hard at working time, then what about our spare time? Many teens choose to read or play ball games to relax, while the others always play computer games for whole night, or drink alcohols without limitation. These relaxations does harm to both of their study and health.
As far as I am concerned, we should take our roles into consideration when we choose our relaxing ways. Time is valuable, we have no right to ruin our young age. Reading and working  out may be proper choices.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 60f9a7e4-42f5-37bf-9bab-e3bad78e0808> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We have too much work to do everyday.But we also need to relax everyday so that we can
have a high spirits to work.
There are many ways to relax in our life.When you are tired of your work,you can take out
your mp3 player to listen music.That is really a good way to relax.When you go of work ,you
can surf the internet.And there are many computer games you can paly.But don't forget
that the world is amazing.When you feel tired,you can go on a journey with your friends.
But not all the relaxations is benifit for you.Don't paly games too much time.Don't watch
too much TV.It is bad for your eyes.And playing too much computer games makes you don't
have passion in work.So if you really want to take a relax,you can go taveling.That is really a good way to relax.
In my opinion,listen to music or go to a concert canhelp you relax you spirits.When I feel
tired,I'd love to lie on my bed to listen music with earphone. That's  comfortable.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b153f518-df4d-3810-bb83-c32d925254ec> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is a common sense that people work continuly without relaxation must die nearly for
running out of energy.  As a result, there are various types of relaxation in life, such as
playing computer games, for most of boys, and enjoying shopping, which always be considered
the most effective approach to relaxing.
However, not all of them are suitable for us. Some of them, like indulging in computer
games, are undoubtfully demerit to us, though making people forget the duty, such as study
and work. Moreover, something like taking drug, which also have effect that "relax" tired
people completely, are poison actually!
In my view, as a university student, it is said that things getting excessive always
can't give rise to a happy ending. That is to say, some acceptable relaxations can also do
harm to us when do it unduly. For example, exercising can make you feel more tired if do it
beyond your body energy endurance. And if you shopping more, out of budget, it can increase
life pressure to your next month with little money.
As a result, doing helpful relaxation in appropriate limit is good for us!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID eb6ca11a-2ef5-32aa-adbe-be1cb71c5488> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Relaxation is an important part of our daily life,especially in this fast wold full
of pressure.
Diferent people choose diferent ways to relax themselves according to their
interests.Some people enjoy traveling in their holiday.Some are fond of engage themselves in
sports to release their pressure.Other people also consider singing ,sleeping or just playing
with their kids as their ways of relaxation.But it seems that some people are just too busy
to go travel or play sports.They may just stay in front of their office desk and smoke to
take a break.Some people even  get drunk when they need relaxation,which is bad for their
health.
With so many ways of relaxation to choose,university students should choose their
own ways carefully .Good ways to relax may relax our soul and mind perfectly and be good
for our health .But bad one may not work out as we expect or even spoil our health.As a university
students,we can relax our mind by reading books which can also enlage our knowlege.Playing sports
is also a good way .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 41fea17b-bb45-314a-a6a8-4865aa07bb7d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of  our sociaty,here comes more and more relaxation in our life,which  is  making an vital influence in our daily
life.
As we know,there are many different kids of relaxation in our life.
For instance,playing sports,listening music,watching movies , singing
with friends and so on.
Indeed,some entertainments could help us relax ourselves so that we
could do better in our life and work.However,just as the old saying goes:
Every thing has two sides.Some are good for us,but in the other hands,these
maybe  do more harm then good for us.Just like watching movies,if you watch movies all day.It's not only do harm for your eyes but also bad for your communication with you friends and families.
As my own point of view,just like a student of university,i consider that we are supposed to control  ourselves to  having  some  entertainments.We must  have a suitable plan for  relaxation.It's necessary for us to know which activities are more suit for us.As long as everyone of us realize  the importance of relaxation in our life,i am confident that relaxation could make our lives more better!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b10ccd4e-f834-3050-ae75-55d9bec26560> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As a person in modern society,we have a plenty of entertaining events.Watching TV is one
of the most popular ways for people to relax theirselves,which can admire many intersting
and excellent programs.Nowadays, there is no doubts that the most popurlar entertaining
events is the computer and Internet.As a music lover,i think listening the music i am fond
of is a wonderful relaxation.
Modern entertaining events do let our live more colourful.Firsty,they make us relax
after work and study, which it sometimes is dull.Secondly,the events like TV and Internet
can provide latest news in the world fastly for us.We can know the newly events by moving
our fingers.However, as a saying goes, the corn has two sides.The modern entertaining events
can make a negative effects on us.For example,there is a growing concern to the students who are
addicted to the Internet.
As a college students, i think we should make good use of these entertaining events.
Using them rationally is not only good for our study,but also our physical and mental health.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4c0e19e4-9ccb-3ab6-91bb-b90e8aab78a5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily spare lives,there are a variety of entertainment activities for us to relax ourselves.Such as playing sports,travelling,chatting,watching TV,listening to music,playing computer games,playing chess,etc.In today's modern busy city,these amusements are indispensable parts in people's lives.
As it is known to us all,most entertainment activities make contribution to relieving our stress and refreshing energy.So that we can more likely devote ourselves to work and study as well as enhance efficiency.In fact,not all the multifarious activities are beneficial to us,even do harm to our mental and physical health.For example,some people are in favor of going to a pub to drinking as an entertainment.After get drunk,he may lose control and becoming unconscious.So he can't refuse the tempt of drugs.In case get addicted to drugs,his life is in ruined.Others like watching eroticism clips are also evil.
As a college student,it's necessary to enhance the skill to selecting,distinguish good from bad.That is to say,before we make a decision to take part in amusements,we must consider the consequence and result of it.Being students,shirk the responsibility to others that being determined to refusing insalubrious activities.Because we are the role models in society.
All in all,chose suitable relaxation and enjoy happiness life!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID df934937-24e2-37f2-948a-b38dcb7aff96> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life, there are various entertainments for us to choose ,such as sports, video games music and
movies ,which enrich your daily activity, and make our life more enjoyable.
However, not every entertainment benefit our study and health, some students addicted to computer
game, which has a negative effect on their life, makes them feel depression and loose heart, which may ruin
their future. on the contrary , other activity such as football, basketball and table tennis can strength our
body health. Movie and music can relax our stressed out nerve and
cheer up our mood.
To sum up, entertainment has it’s own advantage and disadvantage, so that if we entertain properly
it will improve the quality of your daily life and study, however if we addicted to it, will lead to a bad
affection

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cb3ef6ab-beab-3a1e-8a89-5fb0993664ff> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are so many relaxation and amusement in our life .But every
coin has two sides. some of the relaxation is benefit to us though some of the relaxation
is bad for us.
From the positive part we can see that there are so many good ways for relaxation
Such as doing some exercise,listen to music etc. These relaxations can relax ourselves
and give us a good chance to learn more things.It is a good idea to have a relax and face
challenge at the same time.
From the opposite sight,there are also some bad ways to relax.Nowadays there are
lots of teenagers addicted to computer games.This phenomeno recalled our attention to this
kind of bad relaxation .Maybe we will face presure in our daily study and life ,then some of
the students choose alchohol ,smoking and playing computer games to relax.This  kind of relaxation
is not only bad for our health but also bad for our study.
To sum up ,as a university student ,we should learn to have the ability to tell the good one
from the bad one and learn to choose the best way to relax.Only by this way ,you can have a relaxed and
elegant life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ee958376-d5f8-3468-ab44-3f742174019b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Accompanying with various relaxation,our social life shows diversery entertainment which
enrichs our spare time and have important effects on our life.
As beneficial activities ,some relaxation improve individual abilities and refresh one's
mind,some promote harmonious atmosphere in circumstance.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 55b74bb8-cabb-3c01-b640-5be7d2de9bf3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the rise of the working stress, people should find a hobby fitted themselves to release their stress. take care of things around you, you will discover various enterainments in your daily lives.
If you like sport, walking to you working place must be a better relaxation than other intense sport like football. Not only you could strength your body but also let you out of the trouble made by traffic jams. However, not all entertainments are beneficial some might even be harmful. Addicted to the online games, people will ignore their routine works, and afraid to face the ture world. Therefore, relaxation should be limitted in order to have a better effect on yourselves.
As a freshman, there are a lot subjucts to learn.  I will go to the library to find some books to read when I feel stressful. Sleep is also a useful way to decrease your stress. In short, a suitable way is the best way for yourself.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9520b4b9-8b27-3fce-be84-dfe177f65f90> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are different kinds of entertains in our lifes.
Some of them are beneficial forus to reflash ourselves e.g. sports,because it helps us to enhance
our bodies and intelligence.But some of them are not appropriate for us and even do harm to us
e.g. binger drinking,take drugs.
As a college student,we should know how can we choose to proper way to relax ourselves.Because of
the stressful world, we seem to lose ourselves.Everyday, we can find news in gossips pages about some
celebrities got suicide themselves cause they go binger drinking and take drugs and deeply they get
lost in this colorful world,they got too much stress but the problem is they don't know how to relax.
To relax ourselves doesn't mean indulge us.We can read to broaden our horizons and swimming to strength
our bodies.It has many good ways to relax ourselves.But the key is don't lost ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1a8f9a00-4543-3b93-93d5-7863858a92cb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the era of information and technology, there are all kinds of relaxation in our
lives. Such as jogging, surfing, hiking, which really relaxs us both mentally and physically.
That's why some people think the relaxation activities are good for people themselves, freed
them from boring and tired lives. Opposite the opinion,other people think so much relaxation
for us does a bad effect on our lives. You may not consist on one thing because of so much
choice you have  giving up it and choosing a easier one. As for you,relaxation is better
than your work or study a lot. It's natural for people to choose relaxation rather than
working hard.
As far as I'm concerned, the relaxation should be done within a certain limit so that
we can keep a good balance between relaxation and work or study.
shenghuo zhongyou gezhonggey d yule huodong
youli youhai buqiad
zuowei daxuesh w d kanfa

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 80ab4ac1-5d3f-31a5-8561-12d3e1b3221e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know ,everyone has stress. And everyone need to relax himself or herself through different entertaining activities, such as playing sports, singing and dancing , playing games and so on.
But actually, not every kind of entertainment is good for us .Some may be not suitable for us. Even worse, some may do harm to us both mentally and physically, like playing computer games. Many people will be easily addicted to it. Once we become addicted, we will lose ourselves, abandoning our study and daily lives. And playing computer games too much will also impair our eyesight.
Thus, in my opinion as a student, we should be able to choose the right and suitable one from all kinds of entertainments. With the right entertainment which can help us relax ourselves, I believe our lives will become happier, easier and more beautiful!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f5643672-d5c3-3f0b-9816-230cb55c07e5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various of entertainment in our daily life for us to relax so that we can reduce pressure form stressful work.Actually,some entertainments are good for us while some entertainments are not suitable ,they even will do harm to our life.
As a university student ,I believe that it is necessary to take some entertainment to relax but we must follow these 2 suggestions.Firstly,when we choose the entertain we must think about that whether this entertainment is of benefit to ourselves.For example,some people may choose smoking as their method to have relaxation.There is no denying that smoking can make the brain comfortable in a way,but it do harm to our body and we will get addicted to smoking.Finally,many illnesses will invade us. So when we choose the entertainment we must choose that do good to ourselver, such as sports, reading books and staying with family.Secondly, we must control the time we relax. For example, playing computer games is a good way to relax. But if you keep playing for a long time, you may get shortsightedness and other illnesses. Most importantly, you will eventuallyget addicted to the games so that you will abandon the work and the study. To sum up ,we must be careful when we choose the entertainment.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e985e21b-8bd7-3451-8d7d-d761f711ee49> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to us, our daily life is filled with various entertainment which is always amusing and relaxing ourselves. Thanks to these relaxations like playing basketball, playing computer games, reading books, and so on, we are able to live a more and more colourful life.
However, every coin has its both sides. In one way, it is relaxation in life that prevent us from the stress coming from our work and study and provide us a meaningful lifestyle, which is of grest significance. We will be certainly surrounded by bore and trouble without it. But in other ways, relaxation seems to be kind of harmful. Once addicted, people tend to focus more on amusement than their work and study, which play an importang role in most people's life.
As far as I am concerned, we college students should choose our ways of relaxing more wisely and seriously at first. Secondly, before relaxation, we'd better make sure that we have finished all assignment in our field of work and study. Finally, don't lose ourselves during the entertainment. In short, it depends on your attitude towards it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4473793b-5292-3c6b-b557-61ad4d7dcc0c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are so many kinds of relaxion ways in our life.Thanks to that,
our life become more colorful and less pressful.
On the one hand,the right way of relaxation can lead us to a better life.It makes us
feel more relaxed after doing relaxation.What's more,it makes possitive effect upon our
life.On the other hand,if we choose the wrong way to do relaxation,the situation will become
worse.For example,some students always say that they feel pressful and couldn't afford it
any more.So they turn to play computer games.But lots of students are addicted to the games
and can't live a healthy life.What's worse,their study and relations with people become
nervous.
As a modern college student,there are some points in my mind.Different choices makes
different effects in our life.We must be careful of choosing the relaxation in life.In my
opinion,what the good relaxation is reading classical book,listening soft music,doing some
sports you like and so on.
As fact,there are a variety of relaxation in our life.If we choose a right way,I bel-
ieve your life will become more easy and relaxed.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7f6a3bd0-5d57-31f5-b749-b358711c9738> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the developement of the society,people's life become colorful.
There are many entertainment activities in their life,but some of it
is harmful for them.
For example,taking a walk after supper or watching some TV shows
is good for us.But I think playing cards for money is no properly.
Some people like exciting activities,and they think just excited things
can make them happy.It's a worry point.Exciting activities mean not only
happy but also dangerous.If we can't promise our safe,we can't feel
relaxed,too.
In my opinion,entertainment activities is necessary in our life,
but we must handle it properly.We can do some benifit activities rather
than excited.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5b6b7c75-109e-3287-97be-e9f3484f9eb7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With rapid development of economy,the level of people's life has rised a lot.So there are more and more various entertainment activities in our life.
Of course,some entertainment activities are good for us,which can benefit us physically and mentally.However,some are not fit and some even do harms to us.As a college student,I think we are supposed to have a correct attitude towards entertainment activities.In my opinion,what we should take part in is the entertainment activities that can relax us but not the dangerous or illegal entertainment activities.We all agree with the thought that the pupose of doing entertainment activities is to relax ourselves so that we can have a healthy body and a relaxing mood.
So,let alone the bad entertainment activities and take part in the good entertainment activities a lot.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e19b3ba0-e08f-3d3a-81c6-4a37c8d89288> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As it's known to us all,there is a lot of relaxation in our life.We can relax ourselves by listening music,playing game,having a nice traval and so on.
However,are these ways of relaxation all benifical to us?On the one hand,we know that some of them can be entertaining and relaxing,so we always take some df them after woking so long.On the other hand,we find that some of them,can do harm to us.Take computer games as an example,wo have known that lots of students are addict to them and do bad at their study.
As a college student,in my opinion,wo should take relaxation earnestly.We should take the enterment as a little part of our life,not a huge part or the hole life.Relaxation is an activity which should be taken after a long time of hardworking,it can help to relax ourshlves and ready for the next hardworking.At a word,it will be nice if we take it seriously.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d2733a41-5b7b-377d-adba-55f759eb4971> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various relaxations in our daily life like singing,reading,playing games and so on.And people could choose what they like to relax themselves in their spare time.Relaxations can also bring the excitments to the returning to work and school.What's more,people can get to know where their interests are or what they are good at.
However,though most of the ways to relax are good for people,there are some that not suit for us,even doing harm to our body or mental health.
It's evident that playing computer games is dangerous in a way,causing loss in study or work,weakness of eyes,little hope to the real life if addicted in.That's what we said the mental damage.What parents pay attention to is the children may imagine or concerns a lot for the vitual world and show little excitment to the reality.Of course,every coin has two sides, and there must be something good.If we pay more attention to,we could discover that those who like playing games may have gifts of laeding or have a different thinking system.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ef8ff4e9-bbf9-3625-bb15-9a8542141bf9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, there are ways to loose ourselves and have fun in our normol life. As for what kind of
relaxation we are going to have, it totally depends on your own life style as well as personal interests.
SO, when you get sick of the heavy work, just phone your friends and have a break...
Nice relaxation behooves us to reduce our stress in life so as to make a better performance tomorrow.
However, physical or mental relaxation, do not always play an active role in your life. It's
important to choose the proper way to relax. Some kind of relaxation, such as extreme sports, sometimes even does
darms to our body. That's why here I advice -- Don't take relaxazation which in need of too much energy
and time.
Being an university student, I enjoy toddling down to the park every evening, thinking it is
a perfect relaxation behavior that has a positive influence to relax our bodies and ease our minds.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9b2d2fef-bad0-34ec-9cb4-ffaf76c88b77> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern society,people are concermed with how to relax after they finish working or studying.There are many kind of amusements in our lives.Some students will play computer games or watch movies,some students like to go out with their friends.The workers' activities after work will be different with students.They may stay at home with their wife and watch TV to say goodbye to their tiring.Some workers like to eat dinner with their friends and drink beer to relax.What's more,some people will go to a bar or disco in order to produce their stresstion in their lives.
However,some relaxation activities will do harm to our bodies,such as playing computer games and drinking in a bar or disco.The students who like playing computer games always forget how long they have played and they will be cracy about it.The people who like drinking beer to relax always be drunk after drinking.Because of this,playing computer games or drinking beer are not suitable for us to relax.I think the most wonderful activity to relax is having a walk with your family after dinner.
As a college student,there are many different kinds amusements for us to relax too,but we should judge which amusement can help us to relax truely and which will just add tiring to our bodies.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 72c38e2b-657f-39c3-823d-e6e8b27148b1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
in our everydaylife ,we notonly have a meal ,we also have enjoy the happyness ,
for example we have a variety of exercise like basketball ,football,computergames.how do
you enjoy you life ?
but when we enjoy the exercise,we must be careful,wo may hurt our bady ,what is
more ,we may wallow in it .you may lost your learning ,your working, your family ,even your
heart .I am not making a mountain out of a molehill. for gambling, we all know it ,but do
you know how many family resolvebecause of it ?dou you know how many people walk up a rold of
crime? we must be care ,be far away the unhealthy exercise.
to be university ,what standpoint can we have ?what can we do for it ? I think we must
be care for the lure from the society , especially the heresy.we should take an active part in
the socially usefui activity, learning knowledge. ok ,let us enjoy our life ,be traveling ,be
learning,be happy.no drug ,no heresy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1f05f943-9277-3709-a50d-86060dccdbdd> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays,more and more people feel stress because their life become more tough and hard
and the need to work all their life to support their family.So,it is necessary for us to re-
lieve the life's stress.And many relaxation activitys have been built for people who have no
time and place to relax.
There are many motheds to relieve our stress and relax.First of all,what the most effective
way we can relax is go out with friends and have fun.We can go to the park for dancing,walking
and so on.Second,we can talk to our family or friends about our thing that happened to us in
a queit place.We can pour our unhappiness by the talking.Last but not least,it is also imp-
ortant for ourselves to form a positive mind.No matter what happened,we can't loss hope and
stick on it.
Like every coins have two sides so the relaxation is not a expectation.Some relaxation is
benefit for us but others do harm to us.For example,some people like to help others as a way
to relieve while someone use their power to hurt people or himself so that their can feel relax
As a university student,I think it is necessary for us to have a relaxation to relieve our study stress.But we must
chose the right way to relax.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8a2da0b7-8c92-32f3-ae07-52f6a0ec0e42> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,we often take many kinds of activities for fun.Such as playing basketball,watching movies,playing computer games.
But we must realize that,not all the amusement activities are benefit for us.We had to make an adjustment by ourselves.If we play basketball for fun,it will benefit us a lot.On one hand,it can make our body become helthy.On the other hand,we can also build up friendship with our classmates.However,if we chose playing computer games to realx ourselves,it may cause a lou of damage.First,playing computer games is a watse of time.You will spend many time on it that you have less and less time for your study.Your school work will problely  be suffer.Second,when you look at the screen all the time,it does great harm to you eyesight and you may wear glasses.Last but not least,it will do harm to our body,we will become week if we often sit before the computer.
As a college student,we should make a wise deceision and protect us from hurting by the damage activites.As far as i am concerned,we should make good use of our time and spend it on some meaning activities.When we realx ourselves,we had better choose some benefit sports.But not just sitting before the computer.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 13b41822-8bf8-3187-9751-7fcba0c07b0e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our beautiful college life there is mach entertainment which wo can do to kill the time .When we have some time but we don't want to study,we may play computer games with our friends.When we study for too long time ,we may go out to play basketball to relax ourselves. When we have something sad,we may go out drinking with our friends to forget the unhappiness.The entertainment is so good for us and is makes our college life more beautiful.
But everthing has two sides,there are also many harmful things in the entertainment,something which will really kill our time and lead us the wrong way.Sometimes you may head that some college students are lost in the computer games so that they can't graduate.They waste their energy and time on the virtual things,and they are fooled by the entertainment.There are many similar cases in our daily life.And those things just happened around us.We must take care of this problem,we must choose our entertainment carefully.Don't forget what we need do in the college.We are the students,who take the learning first.We must be responsible for ourselves.
So in my oppion,we college students need entertainment to relax and make fun,but we must choose the right one,we must know what we are doing and what we must do.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4e77e296-beb1-36f2-83c6-343c1ca16962> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays there exsist a wide range of entertainments in our life,which makes our life
more colourful and interesting.
On one hand ,Some entertainments benefit us a lot.We can relax ourselves by playing sports with our friends in oder to release our stress.In addition,listening to the music can make us feel happy and foget the pressure in the life temporarily.Also,going to the cimena and enjoy the films can make our life more colourful.
On the other hand,some entertainments do harm to us.Playing computer games is very popular among the students.But a great deal of students are addicted in the computer games,which has a bad impact in their study.And some students go to the bar to drink alcohol
and dance with the stangers ,which may damage their bodies and health.
As a college student,I do believe that we should choose entertainments carefully.We should pay more attention to the influence of the entertainments,and try to aviod the harmful activities. Last but not least,making frinends who can help us get away from the bad  activitis is also an important way for us to grow up.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 65452a97-7db8-3f77-b77a-4b19827dd384> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
nowdays,people became more and more busy,workers are busy in working,students are busy in donging homework,businessmen are busy in searching for oppotunities.as we all know,tense life is not good for our life,so we should learn to relaxing ourself.there are varites of amusements.however,not all amusements are good for us,some is not suit for us and even is bad for our health.
as a academician,my opinoin is that doing some sports and lisenning to some great music.besides ,we can aslo choose to go hiking or trvle if we have enough time.sports can let our body move and accelerate blood-circulation.and soft music can let our soul relax and make us happy.if we go hiking or travel,we can get close to natrul and we will forget our trouble,even in my opinion this is the best way for us to relax ourself.
however,i disagree with going to the groggery,it is not good for our health

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 92f6cf1a-9eb7-35f8-bb57-58f57a6fd60a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is a lot of activities in our life.For example, we can play sports, we can play games, we can sing songs etc.But there is difference between these activities.Sometimes,we don't think this problem, we only think it can relax ourselves.
Some activities is not good for us, maybe we would get bad habit or knwolege bad people.The influence would go with whole life of us.So chooes a fit activities is very important to us.If we can join in a healthy activities, we will profit from this. While I play football with my classmate or friends, I can take exercise, I can increase friendship between us and relax our mind.It is a very funny and good activities. On the countrary,I take part in a entirement activities ,but it is not fit for young people such as gambling,so we could be addicated with the gambling, it's terrible.
As a college student, we should distinguish which actibities is fit in us.The true judge is important for our life.We should get experience from social,we need to read more books,but we also contact with people aroud us or in whole world.I believe activities is integrant for us,when we get tired ,we need it; when we have bad feelings, we need it; when we feel lonely,we need it.
Come on!Let's do good activities!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2e4b6302-8697-3d71-a7bb-777fbbcd613e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our modern life ,there are a variety of entertainments,not only games and sports,but also online chatting or kolaoke.There is no doubt that we can use these amusing activities to relax ourselvesby releasing our pressure.However,not all of them are good for our life.Some entertainments like sports can strongthen our body and make us healthier.while  others like some online games maybe cause someone, especially the students, ba addicted to it so that it is really bad for their study and life.
As a college student, it is certain that we should focus on study and improving our personal skills.But in spare time, we usually can't help watching some movies or palying the interesting online games in our personal computer.THe entertainments are exactly necessary in our life,but we shouldn't spend much time on them.Sometimes we may also go to the library to quit us amusements.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8251e2a9-2d46-3a19-95e1-df645b1145eb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all known,there are a lot of relaxation in our life,such as watching TV,playing computer game,traveling and so on.As human,everyone wants to relax himself but not work all the time,so relaxation is important for us.
There are many adventages about relaxation.First,we can relax ourselves by relaxation to reduse our stress of work,family and so on.Second,when we feel sad,we can traveling and maybe we can forget the bad time so that we will be in a good mood.Third,if we spend time on relaxation with our family,we can build a good reletionship with our family.
However,some relaxation are good for us,but some relaxation are bad for us,such as playing computer game  whom we spend more time on,it will have a bad inflluence on our study and helthy.
In my opinion,as college students,we should banlance the relaxation and study.Study is our important thing, but we can relax ourselves sometimes.Some relaxation are good for us,but we should not be addicted to relaxation,especially some relaxation that is bad for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID af971f86-f1c3-3105-b13f-46d46784491b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the develop of the society,we have lots kind of entertainment to relax ourselves now in our life.For example,we can lisen to music,go to travel or play computer games.
But I think every things has it's advantage and disadvantage.The same as relaxing,not all of these entertainment are good for us.As we know,go to travel is a good way to relax.When we are traveling,we can find there are many beautiful views.And then,from these beautiful things,we can feel happy.And we will feel our life fill up with sunshine.Also,listen to some light music or go out to have some sports is good.
But I don't think playing computer games is a good way to relax.If we stay with the computer for a long time,we'll feel tired.And then,it's bad to our eyes.lots of people will addiction on the games,then they will far away their study and work.
So,we must choose a good way to relax.It's the most important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 00271836-e2e8-3d24-aeb3-4f55183ec5ae> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is many kinds of amusements in our life. we can do some sports , play computer games or do some other activities to relax yourself if you are in trouble.
but every coin has two side. Some activities are very healthy and appropriate , but also some activties are unreasonable and dangerous. For example, If you had an addiction for play computer games,  you may do damage to your eyesight and even wilder yourself.  However ， if you build up a good habit for entertainment , you will benefite from the activite
on my opinion , as a university student, we should be cautious to choose our habit and daily activities. we need to do more beneficial activities and give up the bad activity so that we can live a harmony life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0d578388-1a5b-360f-8a27-063aae649c9f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there are different kind of activities.We usually play basketball and running.And we also can listen to music and play games.Everyone has their hobbies.
Everying has its pros and cons,to participate in recreational activities are no exception.Playing some sports can make you keep healthy and energy.Reading books can make you rise knowledge and edify sentiment.Listening to music can make you relaxed.These are the benefits of joining in the recreational activities.But there some disadvantages.If you lose in the computer game,you may mot study and forget everying.And you will get unhealthy.
As a student in college,I thinking we should join the recreational activities propriety.And don't wallow in.And then,we can live healthy and our life get content.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 952fb8fd-55ec-3eaf-8291-2c6522cd603b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays,people always have many tings to do.Of course,entertaiment is very importment.It is so attractive that people always take many times to play with.with the scientifice development,the entertaiment changes moer and moer multipiex.Some people just could do some simple soprts,but some people may spend much moer money for entertaiment.People just want to relax themselves.
We are all known,One thing has two coins,some entertaiments are helpful for us,and some are harmful for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4a9facab-ad0b-3782-847a-b6aefce3b394> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are variety of entertainmemt activities in our daily life.Such as playing computer game or other games,play baskketball or other sports,talking on line or doing other thing surfing,and so on.Alll of the entertainmemt activities make up our beautiful daily life.
But,not all of the entertainmemt activities are good for us,what is more,it is sometimes harmful.
As an university student,I think we should have our own view about what is good and what is not good.We university students should control ourselves.At lease I think we can not drove in the variety entertainmemt activities.Maybe,sometimes it is our duty to make the life brighter,and we should join in it activity but not totally dorove in it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1f3ee1ae-bd13-36d6-9564-26b84f956e90> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various kinds of relaxation activities in our life.
In one hand some relaxation activities is good for you,but in other hand some is no good!even dangerous.
As a university student,in my opinion,the relaxation activities is more good than shortcomings,relaxation activities is good for you very much.Firstly,when we felt stress at work,at home and in our daily life!relaxation activities can reduce our stress,we can get some relaxing.secondly,some intertainments like sports can strongthen our body and make us healthy ,At least,relaxation activities can explore our scope and abroad our filed of view!
as an old saying"our life need relaxation"so,i think that the relaxation activities is more good than shortcomings,it is great!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d654791b-e4db-302a-9ae8-3a07cb230b03> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Along with the world changed more and more fast,we have more and more kinds of relaxation in our life now.When my parents in my age,they have only few relaxations like reading and sport.
Those relaxation change our life style forever,they make us more happy than before. But not all the new relaxation are good for us,some people are addicted to computer game,they stay in front of computer all day,this harm their health.And many yuong people like to go to bar,they dinking、dancing and meeting new friends in there.But in bar people usually come from diffriends society order,that means in there may have some dangerous people.
As a university students ,I thinke have kinds of relaxation is a good thing,nowdays people always can find a relaxation suit theyselfs.The only thing we should notice is to carefuly judge of the relaxation you have,"does it make worse of me",if the aswer is "no",go ahead,enjoy it!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 56fae0e5-9608-31e2-960d-804d98aa653e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our life,there are more and more activities in our life,which make our life more beautiful.For example,singing,dancing,hiking and so on.The entertainments are becoming more and more common in our life.
It's beneficial of us to take part in some activities,such as playing basketball.It can promote our health and strength our body.Through these activities like sports,we can relax ourselves.However,taking part in some activities is not suitable for us,even it's bad for us.For example,if you spend a lot of time playing computer games,you will lost yourself in it and you can't study your lessons well.
From my point of view,as a college student,we should learn to regconize the activities
whether it's good for us or not.What's more,we have to learn to control us,not losting
ourself in something bad

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f4b18919-fa50-3c2a-ab43-53c5b986423e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society, many kinds of entertainments appeared in our daily life. More and more people take part in it, and very enjoy it.
Though we need relaxation in our life, the entertainments are not all good. There are some entertainments good for us, like dancing,singing,sporting together and so on. These activities are not noly good for our psychological health, but also good for our physical health. Anything have opposite, there are also some improper entertainments in our life, like many computer games,gambling,drinking together and so on. These are not good, even have damage to ourself. But many people are addicted with that, so they have no mind in study and work.
In my opinion, as a college student, we should distinguish the advantages and disadvantages of these entertainments. We  should relax ourself in a health and comfortable way, and we also should tip off the people not addict in that improper entertainments. Let's have a good relaxation in our life!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 46fb6531-e9e6-3780-bbea-ab8587c2785a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In modern life,our life become rich and wonderful.There is something new that we should learn and enjoy it.At the same time,people feel nervous about their life,so they really need kind of entertainment activity to enrich themselves.
In these entertainment activities,some of them is good for us,such as sports,cards,and so on.Young people like make a party when they are together,they sing,they dance,they play games,this is a relaxation way to have fun.But the important thing is we should take good use of it,no drinking,no smoking,make it healthy as we can.And we can go shopping,go to ktv with our friends to spend weekends.It`s a good choice for everyone.Some people like playing computer when they are free.They play games every day and night.They wear heavy glaases.In fact,their body get worse and worse that they can`t imaging that.This is a uncomely entertainment activity.The demage is  more serious than we thought.
As a university student,we should have a clearly attitude towards this.We can have somthing fun in our spare time.Take healthy activities,enrich our school life,be a grate one who develope in all-around way.Don`t make the damage influnce us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 123a2efd-13f9-30b3-8433-7f5d1e968d4c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of actives in our daliy life.such as basketball,football,tennis and so on.
In fact,there are some actives are bad for our lives.for instance,some people think drug is a kind of way to relax,but it is not true.drug not only makes you poor but only makes you fell boring for the life,then you will be revenge for the social. so we should take part in some actives which are have good impact in our lives.for example,we can enjoy some physical actives,with that we can attain a better body and a up spirit.
In my opinion,first of all,we should distinguish what is right or wrong,then we can take part in diverse actives.although there are a lot of temptation in our lives,we should protect ourselves at the same time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3272da05-33f2-3432-8564-a3aa30e7271c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In this recent times, vareities of entertained activities are around us in our common life. They bring us lots of fun and happniess. Because of it,our life is becoming abundant.
As we konw,entertainment is getting more complex and confounding with the rapid development of our modern soceity,people hold different positions on it.As a coin has two sides,some of it is benefical,others are harmful. Playing instruments,climbing mountain and going to have a trip which are many people like to do,benefit us a lot.We can not only feel comfortable,funny and relaxible, but also learn a series of skills ,enhance our relization of teamwork and strengthen our physical body.Both our mentality and body can be profited a great deal.However,We can also see the bad effec obviously.Some teenagers go to the pub and initiate some bloodshed.They even lose their life.Besides,there are many teenagers go to internet bar and indicated in it.
As a high school student,I see it object. We should improve our abilities to distingushed the things around us.A good environment can be build for us to have entertain activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a6708d74-be37-344f-bf45-8e8975c39a4f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of enjoyment in our life.in our busy life ,we can learn to make us relax, so we can make us work harder. some enjoyment is very helpful,but some aren't right ,eversome are harmful.we can leave choose .
As university students , we always work hard every day ,never have much time to make  us relax.It makes us be worried.we can learn to how to relax life .for example ,we always play basketboll ,never think it very dangerous to play it.it is very exciting ,so every player is excited .at last , some people are hurt .i think wo should lenrn to ptotect ourselves from it .wo can choose to walk .it  not only  makes us safe,but also make us relax.every day we have a five minutes,wo will make us happy.wo also can walk with classmate  ,so we can emplove our communication.
Long before ,we can have our own work ,   then we can will not have much time to relax life .now wo are students ,wo have a lot of time to relax our life .why not make a good use of it?

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e120385f-9759-36c9-9f5a-37e49ad6cc41> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Everybody have such a lot of  fun activity.    Some fun activity is useful, but some fun activity out of the way.  Even have harm.
As university man, my opinion is: ourselves ought choice  adapt to activity. Do it face to face availability of activity. Don't blindness go make out fun activity, capable it no fit for you. Just the opposite to what one wishes.
Choice fit to youself, just is right way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID dc097809-3cb7-3f82-a5e1-dc939f8a2aa3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
At the life we have a geart many as good as play disport activity ,exempli gratia card games andascending net work.if this play disport activity excessive nor good,  because everthing have advantages and disadvantages .
For exempli card games , we have improvelife at the life ,but play card games meet

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 134e10b5-ba59-34b4-9995-ca05260a591e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,ralaxation in our lifes are very important to us,because that can make us relaxed after heavy work.There are a lot of enjoyed activities in our lifes,some of them are good for us and have a wonderful effect on our futrue lifes.However,every coin has tow sides,there are also some ralaxations are harmful to us.As university students,i think we should make a wise choice about the ralaxation in life.
Sports,such as playing football,playing basketball and swimming, are good ways to ralax ourselves,because that not only make us happy when we are enjoying in those sports,but also let us become healthier and more active.For example,i like play basketall with my good friends,that make me understand the importance of teamwork and the ad's words:nothing is impossible.However, some ralaxations are not good to relax ourselves,such as playing computer games too long time.i am not really interested in playing computer games,but my classmate,Tom,very like them,he spent a lot of time dota,a kind of war computer game,that made him be come more and more crazy,even spent the time to play dota instead of eating or sleeping.i have  told him that it was harmful to his health and study.but he still spent a lot of time on dota,that make him become weaker and weaker,in the end,he got a bad ill.
In a word,ralaxation in life is interested and improtant,but some are good for us and some are bad,so how to make a wise choice is depend on ourselives.let's choose healthy and interesting ralaxations to make us have a better life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID de4ca08c-fabb-3bd6-a030-c275fe35ec3a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many ways of entertainment in our daily life.We can surf the Internet,chat with friends and do some sports.As we are the part of the world,we must have some friends.Many times we have to play with friends.I think it a good way to relax.And we can also play some online games,it is also good for us except we are additived to games.
Moreover,we may go to the KTV to sing our stress out and we may go shopping,too.In my opinion,that's good.But if we drink and take the drug for ralaxation,it's stuip and it's a waste of life.
As a college student,we may have our stress from our family,study and part-time job and many  other aspects.A good way for us to relax necessily.I think,we have the right to relax and we have to promise to take it in a good way.Take me for example,I'd like to have a cup of tea and just sit in the sun,doing nothing,when I feel tired.Sometimes I would play my compter games but I never spend too much time and energy on it.
Many of my friends are fond of the game named"dota".They play it in days and nights,ignoring their study.As a result,they failed at the final exam and they have to restudy this term.So, in one word,we can have entertainments but we have to take our study for first.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 621f9963-1dda-34af-b5d6-2bf367eee8a5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many recreational activities in our life.Some of them are benificial for us,but some of them are unproper,even harmful.
As a college student,i think we should pay more attention to choose activities which are really appropriate for us.For example,we should keep away form smoking,drinking and so on.
But now many college students smoke and drink.In fact,there are many other benificial activities like being volunteers to help others.
Sometimes we may feel diffcult to refuse others' invitation,but actually we should try to persuade them to do something better but not inappropriate entertainment.Maybe colleges can orgenize more meanful activities and call on us to join in.As we all know,college student hope to be free form regulations ,which make them fell uncomfortable.But if some meanful activities can help them find their own value,they will join in actively.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 701a1dd8-3976-3488-822e-233a064cdad0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In life,there are abundant relaxation.Some may be good for us, while some may be improper,and even do harm to us.For exmaple, many youngs are addicted to online games,which include violence and eroticism.They spend too much time on them and then fail on their study.
As a undergraduate, I think we should treat them reasonably.Every cions have two sides. If we take advantage of them properly, we would benefit a lot from them. Otherwise it will be harmful. For a instant, many people consider that computer games is just a waste time.In fact, play computer games could train our brain and if you play team games, you could learn teamwork.But if you could control yourslef and spend most time in them that may have bad influnce on your life and study.
In a word, when we feel tired and want to be relax, any relaxation is Ok. But the relaxtion had better to  fit on us, and have time limited.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9d250bad-2eb1-376c-9486-d378a9783585> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
People always work hard for a better life,so that we need to relax ourself after work.There are lot's of relaxtion on our life,different people choose different kind of relaxtion,some people like sports,some like watching TV,and some like surfing the Internet or playing computer games.
Of course,some relaxtion is good for us,on contrary,there is also something harmful.Doing sports,wo can relax ourself as well as keep fit.Keep doing sports is a good way to relax.On the other hand,if we play computer games or watching TV for a long time,it wouldn't relax us,instead,wo would feel more tired.
As a high school student,I choose kinds of ways to relax myself.If I can find a partner,I would go out for sports,if not,I would just stay at dorm and play computer games.though playing games is not healthy,but I just like it.And sometime,Iwould take part in a assn activity.Or go out with friends for a walk.These make my college life colourful.So, what's your choice?

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID acee3923-38ed-3c98-a98c-c6de0b1c6643> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Today, as our human being society become more and more stronger, many people feel pressure in our daily life. For example, many people fear lossing their work, fear failing in their exam and so on.
So we try to relax our self in every way that we can touch. For example, some people will relax by playing balls, some will make them lose in the computer game, some will go to see the doctor, some will have a nice tour, some will talk to their friends, and even some people will relax themselves through sex.
But, when you relax yourselves in those way, have you thought about the harm of your relaxing way? As we know, many way that we try may do harm to us. For example, if we make us lose in computer games, we may can not turn the result into good, instead we may make us feel worse.
As a college student, I think that if we want to relax ourselves, first of all, we should think whether the way we try will do harm to us or not. Then, when we have selected the right way, we should try to make ourselves get into it and have the value short -time joy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 371afc98-9a90-3b92-bf26-00182b694d66> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of enterainment activities in our daily life such as playing basketball,watching movie and so on.
However,every coin has two sides.Also there is difference between these activities.Some of them is beneficial to us but some of them is not very appropriate,they even have a bad impact on our body and mind.
As a college student,Ihave my own idea.We are pressured too often in life so we need to have a break and do sone fun activities for relaxion.But we should have a balance between enterainment and work,only in this way we can work better and play happier.And we ought to choose the activities which are suitable and beneficial to us.We should avoid those bad relaxation and try to have ideas on what is right and how to choose.
Finally,relaxion is necessary in life,but more important is the way we choose.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 62523f5d-dee9-3641-96e2-cedc489c0991> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our modern life, there are abundant kinds of entertainments to relax physicall and mentally. We can easily
take playing the musical instruments for an example. When we playing the musical instruments, no matter whether we
play the violin or the piano, we both calm down and can get the enjoyment from the music. I think that is a good way
relax ourselves.
But not all the relaxation is good to us. Some entertainments are but the other entertainments are unproperly, even
are harmful to our life. For example, many super stars take drugs to forget their sorrow, frustration or relief their
stress and get the instant happiness. However, they don't know drugs will comfort them only for a little while but will
bring them endless addiction.
As for me, a college student, I do think that relaxation plas a very important role in our daily life. Without
relaxation, we will get so tired and so boring. Proper relaxation enables us to live a happy life. So when we face the
various kinds of entertainments, we should choose the good ones to relax us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7e2dc285-b6a8-34ad-a73c-25c5aa8c3966> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As far as we are concerned,all the people need the time to relax and play with others,though in the army.
In the time trained in the army,I have realized this deedly.In the serious time,we are all very tired and sleepy after the trainning,but we can all beat in the next trainning because our coaches always set the relaxing time for us.So that you can see,our contry has thousands of millions people.you can size up that how many kinds of relaxtions we have.
But every coin has two sides,we should not overlook the danger in the relaxtion.For example, playing computer games may be the most popular relaxtion,we can see that the excelent player has been proved to be a very expected place.But now we can see that many people especially the teenager,have addicted in the computer games and can not pull themselves out.
As a student in the university,my point is that we should pay more attention to the relaxtion in the reality than the one on the net.The relaxtion in the reality can let us play more with others and take in the friedship or the familyship.And the dummy game can not do good to us but train our fingers

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3e71fced-0fb5-399a-a2df-8e5e50c6dc94> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As wo all know,there are a variety of ways to relax oneself.such as playing basketball,listening to music,talking to your best friends,playing computer games,ect.But some bad effects are included in some activites with the relax resulting from activites.playing computer games is one of the examples.
now,as a college student,we have more and more free time to do some things we want to.Someone can not control themselves,which results to the waste of time.I think college is the best time to improve ourselves.In face of all kinds of amusements,we need to choose some that do good effects on us .As these which may affect our life or even do harm to us ,we should give up them firmly.
For our ideal,facing all kinds of enterainments,we should keep calm ,and do some that are good at our grown-up.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 97148b1e-692b-37d8-963f-f1ab24c67913> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
there are many kinds of activties of relaxation in our life，for example，listen to music，play games with friends and do sports。
some are good for us but some are bad，even it will harm us。when we be addicted to the bad games，the worse we will cannot get out of the harm of it and lose control of ourself。
in college，most people are busy on their study，but some not。them may lose himself in games or others。but as far as i am concerned，study is the most importance in our life now。we should pay more attention to it。
as a university student，i think we should be choose the good activties to relax ourself，maybe some bad games are funny，like computer games。but after we play them we feel tried and uncomfortable。i mean we should have control to play computer games，donot play computer games without sleep and meal，there are many means of our life，not only games。we can read more books to enrich our knowledge，play sports to enstrong our body and make more friends etc。

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 928b54e5-31c5-342e-b419-94c5e597fdc1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the devolepment of our dailylife,more and more entertainment have been appeared.
some entertainment is good for us,but some doesn't or even have imperil.
as a undergraduate,in my opinion, firstly,we should see clearly which amusement has good influence to us and which does harm to our life and body.such as some sports,as we kown,they  can build up our body and health,and improve our work efficiency.sporting is good for us.such as playing computer games,many people spend a lot of time in it,and spend only a little time in studying,so their grades come down really quickly.some people even skip classes and cheat parents in order to have more money to play games.so playing games overmuch is bad for our study even our family.
secondly,we should learn to control our desire of taking part in entertainment which
have bad infiuence to us.and usually attend some funny activities.
goood relaxation in life is very impotant to us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID dc715188-194c-3909-83cf-4f40efd2793f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, people now are more stressed than before and they need some relaxations to relax themselves. Thus there are more and more ways because of people’s needs. As students, we often go to KTV or watch a movie. Because they are not much too expensive for us. But some students would like to go to bar. In my view, that’s not benefit for us students. First, it waste too much money which we got from our parents. Second, there may be many bad things in the bar like drink and drugs. So we should find some suitable activities. In my opinion, doing some exercise is a good way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID dca218ec-2e82-3eeb-966c-e650fadcbea2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Sports,parties,singing,hiking...We are surrounding by too much fun when we have free time.But not every way to relax is right,some are good,some maybe hamful.For    example,swimming after study and work will relax us and make us healthy,while playing computer games all night will hurt our eyes and make us tired.We must learn to choose.
As a college student,i think we have more ways than other people to relax.Although wo have many chooses,we may not make the right choose.As i know,many student waste their free time on compyter games.Playing computer games is an good way to have fun if we can stop in time.But we all konw that someone will lost himself easily when he start to paly computer games.If you don'n have strong mind you'd better choose another way.We can read books,listen to music,play sports and so on.You find the good way to have fun and you will feel ture happy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 095df1a7-bd14-39fe-9a5a-cb2730f47e3e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Noeadays,more and more relaxation is going to our life.The relaxtive activities includes many different activities,such as sports,music and movies.They all bring us fun.
However,those activities are different,and all the tings have two different sides,just as the relaxtion. Some of them are good for us,and can bing us benfic,even improve our IQ.But the others are bad.They will make us be away from the right way and turn down.In all we should be smart when we do some relaxtion.
In my opinions,as a high school student,we shuold try to learn the relaxtion,and try to be a friend with it,not just use it as a way to relax.If we treat the relaxtion as a friend,we will learn from it when it relaxs us.But if we just treat it as a way to relax,it will be bad to us instead of relaxing us.In a word,we should try to be a friend with the relaxtion.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bd0ed57e-6ffb-310b-af2f-d978f86afff9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Living in modern society,we have various amused activity to choose.Some benefit us,but some doesn't and even some are dangerous for us.So as a academician,we must keep some tips on our mind.
First when we choose a activity,It must be suitable for you.then,you should keep you clear headed in case of you get lost in it,for example ,computer games would waste you a lot of time.Maybe you will find your pursuit ,when you enjoy a activity.You can try do that regularly.If you are so luckly,you can do that better than other.Maybe you can cosider doing that as a career.
On the one hand most of us choose activity just for fun,on the other hand activities are diesgn to relax ourselves and make our life more beautiful.When we choose a beanficial activity,it will good for us forever.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2ecac1b6-c899-36c0-b861-ae8293454f94> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As far as I known,mang kinds of relaxtion exist in our life.But like a coin has two sides.Although most of these activity are good for our health,some of them do bad to us even  do harm to us physically and mentally.
So as a college student,I took a deep thought to this  problem once.I have come a conclusion that there are so mang tempts in our daily life,but we should possess the ability of refuse these bad activity.At the sametime,if someone get deep into these activity,we have responsibility to help he out.I believe these activity will  reduce even disappear through our behaviour of making great efforts to resist it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2e930615-5a3e-37d0-bf89-e15878d21a16> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are lots of different activities for fun in life.Though these relaxations seem good for us,it does have other disadvantures.
As a college student,I think most of the relaxations do good to us cause of the benefication which can enjoy us.But some of them is bad for us.For example,drinking and smoking is unproper for us to relax.
In my expeirence of life,I do meet a lot of people who had been lost in some activities.Such as playing snoker,dota,3c and so on.But I really believe in those who have perseverance to get rid of the bad things.
And we can do other meaningful activities such as being a volunteer to help others.
I still remember a saying ,that is God help those who help themselves.As a matter of fact,we can control ourselves to avoid those bad relaxation.
In my opinion,we should keep our mind alive so as to be far from those bad relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6e58e0c2-a7be-3a8a-99ea-d4aa62b5dbb0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of  things you can do in your spare time to relax yourself.For example,sports like basketball,baseball,ping pong.Somebody may like play computer games
sing songs or play instruments.
Activities are the way that people want to relax themself from the stress of life.But sometimes activities also play a bad role in your life.
Many students indulge themselves in playing these computer games.Sitting in front of the computer  for hours on end is dand for the player's eyesight.And students may lost in the games and don't want to student anymore.
But most of acivities are good for people such as sports,play sports are good for both your physical and mental health.
As a college student,we should choose our activities carefully.Do not lost ourself in  relaxations which are bad for our health.If you have a quality relaxation ,you will have a quality life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 03297c3e-2b7a-333f-b484-5cfe34556473> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We have various ways to relx ourselves ,such as basketballs,tennis,chess,computer games    and many other ways .Now more and more people complain that they are facing a lot of complex
works and they need holidy to have a rest .BUt ,in fact they dong't have enough time.So they
need to choose appropriate relaxation.
Some of the relaxtion are good,the others are bad.Play sports are good to health .Sports can help us get a strong body .Too much computer games are bad to health.As a result they will make you feel more tired,get short sight and many other serious problems.
As a university students ,I think we should choose healthy ways to relax ourselves,such as
play sports or sing songs .Maybe we can reading a lot of good books .We can do intersting
experitiments to find fun to relax .We shouldn't play computer games everyday. At first we
can't tell these two kind relaxation but we should try our best to choose healthy ways.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1be3ff0e-b7dc-3f72-ae23-4a5c5def0b58> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are mang relaxations in life,we can have a relax when we are tired of busying school time.
Every coin hasx two sides.Some relaxation is really good for us and we will get better after relax.When we go to sports ,have a travel,or watch a movie,we well be benefit from it and have a happy mood.But of course, if we go to club and have drugs to relax, it's must hurt us.
As a studet,especially a collage student,I must have an admission of fact that we are easy to be enticed.But I insist that we need to make our mind and never do bad relaxations which will damage us.We'd better have positive aactivities so that we can have a shining fulture.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3db033cb-5ffb-36da-9a57-89b9e0aa730d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people enjoy a better life than before,people just want to have more entertainments.So the development of the relaxations become more and more important.More and more funny and interesting relaxation become a very important part of our daily life.
But poeple have different views on this point.Some people think relaxation is positive.They think poper relaxation could help them to decrease their pressure,so that they can work better.They also think they could learn something they cann't get by other ways.For example,they could take exercises to get stronger and keep sickness away.
Other people think more and more relaxations do harm to us.They say that too much telaxation will make us negative and lazy.People won't work hard,they just want to have fun,some of them will wallow into it.
I think wo should take poper relaxation to help us study better,wocould enjoy it,but shouldn't wallow.In this way we will benefited from it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7743bda5-9297-3d6b-9b20-2929a6f37064> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the improving of our society,more entertainment activities which help us relaxe play a more and more important role in our life.There are a lot of entertainment ,such as sports,chess,chatting,hiking,etc.Different people choose different kinds of activities,for example,some like the challenged activities while others like softy ones.
Because of the variety of the activities,there are something good or bad for us.Some people want to get a total relaxation so they get themselves down for a few days,which make a bad effect on their health and their family.On the opposite,some events such as going hiking,doing sports,talking with families and friends,can do good to our body,It would make us relaxed,encouraged,and let us feel confident in dealing all kinds of jobs.
As a student in university,we should make reasonable choices according to our own situation.The most importantly,we should not follow other people to do things which harm our health,like smoking.In conclusion,some reasonable relaxation should be taken to benefit our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bfa89898-0293-3265-9c56-7365efb0f384> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many recreational activities in our life.Some of them are benificial for us,but some of them are unproper,even harmful.
As a college student,i think we should pay more attention to choose activities which are really appropriate for us.Sometimes we may be unable to tell which is right to do and which is not.In fact,there are many other benificial activities like being volunteers to help others.
I suggest colleges orginize more voluntary activities,which can help students find their own value.If these activities can really help them ,there is nothing to worry about that thet're not intested in.On the other hand,there are many orginizations in every college,they can make a difference and they can provide many meanful activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 416ca38d-e909-3f62-af7b-e75c7a03c271> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society,many kinds of entertainments appear in peoples daily life,especially the university student.recently,the last thing the university student need is entertainment.
There is an odl saying,"each coin has two sides",it is an experience drawed by our ancestors,but it is correct in many cases even today.As we all know,with the exclusion of a few entertainments,a great variety of others is benefical to us,such as basketball ball,football,chess and so on.in my opinion,at the normal sense,as a university student,we should choose the entertainment which can improve our abilities rather than the one which is just for fun.but if you have an oppressive conition of physical,mental or social disterss,it is a allowable phenomenon that take some easy activities in order to relax yourself.don`t let stress and anxiety control your life,which is similar to sluttery.Learn to manage your life in your own way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a320cacf-2b73-3f70-9399-4dde09ce6171> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,with the develop of the society,people are busy for their life and job.At the same time,the people try their best to relax themselves after the work.So we have many mathos to comfor ourselves now.
However,everything has two sides,different ways of relaxation have different influences.Someone maybe play sports which can strenth their body as well as relax while someone play computer games which couldn't relax but take times.
As an universety's student,it is important for us to find a proper way to relax ourselves when we finish our study work.the universety's students are the tomorrow of the country,we should make ourselves best in anytime.in my opinion,we could regard read a book or go to running as a relax way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 76398b62-96b8-3a7b-bdc2-b65e30b4f3e1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are many relaxation in our lives,such as play computer games,watch movies,drawwing and so on...
in today's day and age,there are many things can able to make me relaxed,if there is something make me unhappy,i will running,running is my favourite sport.of course,somebody will laugh at me,there are so many things to make you relaxed,why are you choose this way? i think,this is a esay way,if i play computer games,i'm afraid i will sink into it,play computer game is dangerous for me.there are so many relaxation's is good for us to do and many are not conductive to us.even some of it is dangerous
as a college student,i think we should learn how to choose a right relaxation is very important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cc27930c-3358-354d-a9e8-7e0ebaf87e0e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many sorts of amusements in our life and it is true that we need to make some amusements to enjoy and  relax ourselves.
There is no doubt that some relaxations are helpful for us,however,some may do harm to us.For example,to some groups,especialy for courage students,takeing cigeratte and drinking beer may be the greatest enjoyment and relaxation.But if they get adicted to it and theat it as a habit,it will lead to many problems.For one thing,they will become more and more unhealthier,for anther,they may no longer positive and dynamic.
As a basic of this,I think that we should theat our relaxation in life seliously.Not only should our courage students take some amusements to relax ourselves,but also we should take proper activities which are helpful for us to enjoy.Such as doing sports,listening to music or writing some essay.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 90aabff4-c018-3414-8783-39495c893c83> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the economic,more and more games have invented to our students to relax.So we the sthdent in the university heve much most way to relax ourselves than before.
However,some activities is useful to us . It impacts our life too much.But some fun actuivities have bring up the feaful influnces to us .
As a college student ,when we were worried about our study and we don't know how to make us to become flesh among the anxious,in my opinion ,we should pay a little time to take part in the school outdoor activities with our friends,such as going to play table tennis ,basketball and so on .But if we lose ourselves in the compurter games ,we may be tired than before.So I think the emotion and reason is necessary to us when we choose a way to relax .But We shouldn't take it for grante that the outdoor activities is the right.So we must realize our emotoin and feeling and choose the right way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0f206cf1-b1d4-3194-a51b-0a90996af036> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In nowadays,we are living in busy days,such as work and study.So relaxation means a lot to us. There are many kinds of entertaining exercise.Some one wants to get rid of their work and some one is just for fun.As many entertaining exercise are benifit to us,some of them    are not suitable.what's more,them may be bad for us.To select a good way to relax is so important.As a university student,I think we should combine work ,study and entertainment
well.We should know what we need to work now and when we should stop to have a rest.relax yourself to charge yourself,then do your best in your work.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b50521f5-a86d-3d65-9f51-1ebd4086b5bb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
So much relaxed activitives in our life.We love to do many things in free time for lighten the pressure.Most of relaxed activitives are good for us,but some activitives are bad for us.As a college student,I think that every thing has a good and bad way.So we can't ba easy to refuse a ralaxation.We should know somethings are good or bad,so that we just do it.As a matter of fact,if we spend too muach time  on a relaxed thing,it must be a bad thing.So we should spend our time rationality,and then most of things will be great.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 86942eaa-b1eb-3883-8ffd-e6dc53ec8b0b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As us konwn ,there are many  ativities that can make us happy and ralax. Such as outdoor ativities and indoor ativities . doing  exercies is concidered as a good way to have  fun ,for swimming ,dagging ,running and so on .As for indoor ativities,people can watch TV,play computer games.
But as the saying goes ,every cion has two sids ,ativities is no expetion .we can take advanter at ativities for happiness and relaxation ,but sometimes ,many ativities concluced many bad information,expecailly computer games .take comeputer games for example , for one thing ,playing computer games can broaden our mind ,but for another thing ,playing computer games sometimes might do bad thing to us ,becaues it can take up our study times ,what's more ,it sometimes buring bad things .
as for a universite student ,I think ,if can make good use of our time to study ,many things can be avioced .If always do outdoor ativities expecailly exercies ,everything can be OK.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a1fbef71-54a4-31cf-aebf-a72a0fd16315> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many entertainments in our life.At weekend or in our spare time,we may feel a both phsical and mental tire.So it is time for us to relaxe ourself in some particular way of our own.But a fact we can't ignore is that much of our experience told us that some of them are not suitable for us ,sometimes even bad for us.
As a undergraduate,I think there are indeed some activities we shouldn't participate in only to gain some relaxation,such as gambling and surfing on the Internet for
a long time.This two entertainments are not unfamily for us and most of us may have
done them before.So you did konw its badness.Sometimes we are even more tired than the beggining.So in my opinion, you should choose your relaxation way more wisely.
In a word,relaxation counts but choose some suitable and healthful way carefully.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d4e9ba5c-a19e-3a40-842d-0f6973d71523> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is know to us all nowadays there are various kinds of relaxations.just like playing chess,playing football,sing song,drew a picture,and so on.
some of these relaxations are beneficial for us.But some entertainment is not proper ,or even harmful.
As far as I am concerned,as a higher education students .we must learn to balance the advantage and disadvantageof relaxation in our life.Moderate entertainment ,has the choice of entertainments.Of course,appropriate relax is necessary ,but we should pay much more attention to as well as avoid those harmful activities.Make eforts to improve our ability,not indulge the bad entertainment like the gameas alcohol,drugs.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f6132034-64a4-322b-981e-a528f6f4366d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
we  can  do  a  lot  of  activities  in  our  modern  society.  For example  ,the  teenage can  play  basketball in  school.  The adult can  trave all over  the  wolrd with  their  children. Some  students  could  play computer  games  all  day. Though some  activities  can  bring  amusement  and  realx  our body  ,but some are  not  good  for  our  body.Such as some  students leave  out school  work in  order  to   play  computer   games.  Some  students even  stay  up.  some students are addicted  to games .I think it is not good  for  our country .As  a  student ,the work is  to  learn  knowledge not play .the  parents should  use the free  time  to  communicate with their children  and  kown  children.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a017ab64-5972-3c55-be9e-e582a2b5827e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,the society developed faster and faster,following the step of it,and depending on different people's need,there borns a lot of entertain actities.
These activities aregood and evil people mixed up,some activities are good for
our life,like palying basketball,football,snooker and so on.These activities can build
up our body and make our life more colorful and healthful.On the other side,there are alos
some activites are inappropriate,these may not have directly effect on us,but as time goes
by,we will lost out soul on it,such as playing viedo games,accidite in the Internet.And finally,some activities are harmful to our life or the whole society,like gamebling,these
will make us lose a family fortune.
On my point of view,we are all university men,we should have the abilities to distinguish all this activites,we learn for the future of our motherland but not for these
unreasonable activites.Not only we shouldn't to participate in that,onec we found our friend
was a member of that,we should persuade him to quit.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 41c3132e-29a5-33fc-a592-696fdf53d93f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
From middle school to college,we can have more time and more feedom to do things we like.There are many kinds of activities in our life ,such as doing sports,taking part in dancing party ,doing volunteers,going hiking with classmates or others in your organzition and so on.
But we should know,some activities are better for us,and some are not suit for us ,even more can make bad infuluence on us.We must learn to choice,we can take part in the activities that can improve our learning abilities or can make our healthier.for example,we can go to the English Corner to practise our english,we can join the about playing football or other sports.we can also take part in the activities that we interested in and that can help others,this can make our life more valubale.
As a student of college,i think we need to take part in some activities,but we can not do all of them,we should choice which is better for us,and give up the activities that not necessary for us or bad for us.and i think activities is the part of our college life,but not the most important part,we should make our major as the frist thing to do.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ec56c17c-3182-3e5c-bd89-6169453d3b39> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the improment of our life quality,there are lots of relaxation we can choose to play.But as we know ,every coin has two sides.Some of relaxations are quite beneficial to us ,while some are really harmful.
As a college student,I completely agreed the oppion above.First,relaxation like listen to music,watch movies and others is pretty good.It relax us after one day's work and study.Second,as we facing a faster and faster society rhythm,people are suffering a terrible  situation.Relaxation are needed to change this situation.And finally,relaxation help people people made friend with each other.
What is more ,relaxation are also can do harm to us.for example,students play coputer games day and night,and forget their important study.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5216402a-32e2-349e-9112-f5fb7cbfa137> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays more and more entertainments flood into our eyes. It makes the relaxing time colorful. So in class, we can see many students play mobile phones; in the dormitories, there are more people use computers to chat with others or play games. But does everyone use them properly? Of course not. We know many boys are addicted into the Internet games, and the increasingly students play phones instead of listening the classes. Actually many entertainments users even can’t control them well, they can’t limit themselves about what can do or cannot do . As college students, we should join in the activities properly. For the relaxation, sports is a good choice, and you can also play computers but remember: don’t be addicted!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 624fad68-63b3-3240-9a7e-93b74ed735a6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many outdoor or indoor activities which can make us feel ralaxed.Most relaxation
in life is good to us ,such as doing sports,participate in sports meeting .Playing tennis or
going swaming is a good chiose .It can not only make you healthy ,but also keep fit .
But some Relaxation in life is not good .I have heard some news that many sportsman get
injured in the race .so when we get relaxed in the life we'd better pay attantion to our safety.
In my view ,as a uniersity student ,we should do more outdoor activities instead of staying at dometory .To build up friendship we must go aroud with others .although playing comperter games is relaxed for someone,I think give up it ! If we do relaxation properly,we will make a diffrence in our life .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 48ecfc0b-aca3-34c5-b200-3067aa228ab9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
When I first came to university,I found there are a lot of spare time that we can do things we like.What is more,maybe study task is not so heavy as it is in high school,so it seems that everyone participates in many activities,such as:go camping,play tennis and so on.
But some activities to relax ourselves are not so healthy.I still remember one thing that I have ever heard.Because of too much free time and  lack of self-management,a boy was addicted to playing games so that he did not attend any class and gave up his study.I think we all know what would happen later.
So from the point of my view,finding a proper way to relax ourselves is so important to students.Not only can we relax from some activities,but we can build us up and be in a good mood in order that find a passion to live better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2e6d290d-6bde-34f4-a62e-b7151ff3ae8b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,a variety of intertainment activities are full of our life in this modern socity,such as singing in KTV,going for sightseeing,playing basketball and so on.As we praticipate in them time after time,however,our actitude toward them that how to deal
with intertainment seems to be significant.
What kind of pole do these intertainment activities play in our life?The answer is not single.For one thing,some intertainment acticities are contribute to us and relax ourselves
.Them bring to cheerful body as well as healthy phychology.For another thing,there are still qualtities of them

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 218991db-7b63-39c2-8280-02a9359a7b74> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Living in the colourful world,there are many kind of interest entertainments surrouding us.as we all know,a coin has two sides,so everything both have advantages and disadvantages.
Some entertainments are good for us,on the contrary,somes entertainments are bad for us.For that, as a university student of me,I have some opinions about it.
actually,good entertainment can make us get along well with our friend and cheer us up.Of couse,good entertainments also promote the ability of our communication skills.
but on the other hand.some entertainments waste us time.To be honest,some people would adictied in entertainment too much time that ignore the work everyday,and it is harmful to himself and others.
In all,we should realize the advantages and disadvantages of the entertainments and do well in ourself.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7ada87ca-5825-3b51-917d-604a5d7cff66> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Everyone can not ignore the fact that there are so many sorts of recreational activities
in our lifes，such as ，surfing，snowboarding and skydiving。
As we all know ，these activities can help us relaxa ，espically after the day work ，what
is more，it also build our bodies up！Nevertheless，all activities are not beneficial for us！
We are supposed to tell the good of them！
As far as I am concerned，we，as college students，should take the beneficial activities
not the bad！we ought to prevrnt us from being addcitied in the bad recreational activities!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a89dd4f7-923f-3417-ad60-27326215fb67> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are kinds of relaxation in our life,some people think those relaxation are
great and necessary,because they can help people relax physically from the hard work
and study.some ofactivities,such as hiking,jogging,can help people relax physically;
while some ofthem,such as surfing the internet,can help people relax mentally.
However,many kinds of activities may have a bad effect on our lives.some people
may notresist some temptations from those relaxation,and indulge themselves in those
activities.at last they are lured away from their study and works.
In my opinion,as students,we should pay attention to the advantages of various
relaxation  and make most of them.meanwhile,weshould learn how to those relaxation positively, and make
them ahelpful tool for our development.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 68141e25-61a4-32aa-892c-da3e0c514424> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
THere are many entertainment in our lifes,like some sports games、or computer games、or even,you know,reading or eating also can belcome the relaxation in our life.
However,you should know the proverb that'every coin has two sides.'Entertainment also has good ways and bad ways.
You can drink to relax youself,with a little drink,you body can be benefit,but with to much,it's harmful to us.You can play computer games to make funs,or you can play it all day to delay the other things in you life. The relax degree make a  decisive in wether the entertainment is good or bad.
Nowadays,more and more young people begin to find some fresh and exciting entertainment,like parkour,i think it's so dangerous.
As far as i am concerned,we should control the relax degree ,in this way ,we can really relax our body and mental.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3a7610c8-aaa2-3c90-8058-d34867eec67a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the improvement of living standard,there are various activities.Althougt they make our live wonderful,everything has ti's disadvantages.
Such activities are beneficial as well as harmful to as.Like the Internet.Today,the Internet is one of the most powerful tools throughtout the word.No one can deny it's affect,however,children using the Internet has become a big concern.There have been many cases where children have been lost in online games.
As far sa I'm concerned ,recreational activitives should be done within a certain limit so that we can keep a proper balance between recreation.As a college student,I think we should take actives which are good for our physics and mental health .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a8ec5942-9133-393b-9990-5f7e1eff7da6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of recreational activities in our lives.Take myself as an example.Before breakfast,I often listen to the radio.After lunch,I enjoy music while having a break.In the evening,I surf the Internet by cellphone after finishing my homework.Sometimes I play basketball.If I am at home,there are more activities.
They can make you relaxed,but some of them are not proper.They will even do harm to you.I have seem a boy who was very clever.He got good grades in the final exam so his father bought him a great laptop.He installed many games and played the games day after day.Then he left his study and dropped out of school.Many people think the games corrupted him.
Every coin has its two sides.In my opinion,no matter what we do,we should control ourselves.We can't go beyond the limit.If we can keep ourselves clear,most activities will do good to us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 58b344d6-140b-3c98-b030-af0875b44273> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the improvement of living standard,there are more and more activities in our life such as playing computer game,playing ball.Some of them are beneficial to us,exercising do good to our body health,reading good books is good for our mental health.But at the same time some of them is harmful to ourself.As you kown,some people addict themself to online game which do harm to their body as well as mental health.As far as I am concerned,I think we should chose as much activities as possible because that will broaden our horizon and wilden our interes,and at the same time ,we should do the activities which is beneficial to ourself.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3eb7b113-220e-312a-b6d9-b2ebc49b38b7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society develops,more and more amusement means comes up to our daily life.We can do sports,enjoy music,play computer games and so on.
As we can see,not all the means are good for us.Some will help to relax well and let us to go back to study with enough energy.But there are still some means existing harmfulfor us.They may take a lot of time and energy,so we will be lack of time and energy for study and work.What's more,some means like computer may make people being addicted.It's terrible.
As a student,I think we should take part in good amusement,enjoy our life and keep away from  the harmful means.Only in this way can we have a good memery of our university life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a17ba736-0797-3509-a74c-dbf998b10c90> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Well,there are a lot of entertainment activities in the modern society ,such as singing, dance,see the movie and so on.And this can make the people relaxed after work.
But everything have two sides.Though entertainment activities can make people relax,it can also make the people tired at the next day and have a bad influence on the work.So we must take the activities properly that it can have a benefit to us.By the way,to the undergraduates,we should have entertainment activities too,but we can not take up too much time on the entertainment. And we must remember that study is the most inportantting to us.So we should blame the students who wasted a lot of time on the entertainment.
As far as I'm concerned,I have wasted too much time on the entertainment activities.So I must change my attitude to the study and make the entertainment activities as the way to ralaxed,not the whole thing in  my life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 31ff9f35-9bfa-3f35-b8e4-2cf84c5a1c3d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In modern society,there are many kinds of entertainment activities in
our life.The most entertainment activities is good for us for they can make
us relax.At the same time,there are some entertainment activities is bad for
us even harm for us.As for the students,it's important to choose the  health
entertainment activities to relax.Especially the college students,they have
much free time than other people and they will have more entertainment
activities.In my opinion,we should learn to control ourselves like don't play
the gangerous activities because it not only will harm you,also others.
In our campus,we can do many benefitical entertainment activities,for
example,we can play sports with our classmate.I think it is a best way to
relax ourselves because it not only can make us more health,but also can
traning our teamwork.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5b5dc215-6896-34df-80f4-0074da96b587> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,there are different kinds of entertainments for people to enjoy.
Some of them are good for us,such as all kinds of sports which is not only good for health but also let us relax oursely.But every cion has two sides,there are also many entertainments bad for us. For example,some people go to gambling house,some go to bar for a drink.It is true that these activities can be enjoyable and people can relax themselves after work.But these activities also have many disadventages,such as wasting time and money and even causing some problems.If one addicts to it,he will not be able to work well.What's worse, it will add our econimic burrdan if we addict to it.
As a college student,I think we should put more attention on study but not entertainments.Some college students think that college is very freedom and don't have to study.But actually we have to work when we graduate,well study will help us.There is no doubt that entertainments are also important.Doing some exercises after study is also a good idea.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cf4dfb4f-6e40-3b27-b29b-ec3cb521bb40> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various of relexation in our life,we often choose the way by our interests.After one day's busy work or study,we'd like to find some way to make our body ralaxe.Most people will choose to surf the internet,watch TV and so on.when the weekend's coming,we may go out for breathing the fresh air or at home with wour family.when we hear "relaxation",we usually feel happy becuase it's a good choice to get away from working and studying.
However,not all kinds of relaxaion is good for us.Some activities are unhappy even harmful to us.For example,addicted to computer games will make person lazy and be dangerous for health.Therefore,it is really important for us to choose a healthy way to relaxe.
As a student,I usually choose reading and surfting the internet for relaxing.Some of my classmates choose to gou out for a meeting or for shopping.In my opinion,one energetical week needs a perfect relaxaion.The proper relaxaion will give us the power to meet the whole week.But worthy of attention is that we must learn to contrl ourselves,we should realize our major life is studying.We shouldn't relaxe all the time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 39db1e7e-9c4c-34bc-897b-c0116d91cd2e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In these days,there are more and more activities appearing in our life.And these
activities are becoming popular around people.But some activities have benefits to
our bodies,some are dangerous.
As a college student,we should have a right attentude for these activities.Activities
are nessecary in our busy life.taking activities can help us to relax ourslves and make
our study life is filled of happiness.what's more,a big activity,like a party,would make
people have more friends ,and it is also a good way makes all the people take together.
therefore,  some people may have a lot of perssure so that they attentend some dangerous
activities.I don't think is a good way,becase some times they may hurt theirselves.
In one word,activities play an important role in our life ,but health is the most
important,we should keep our body first.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 726ab877-1381-366f-97ad-8c9cf7799cff> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are mang kinds of activities for fun or for entertainment in our life.
On the one hand,they make our life become different and colorful.They are good for our life
For example,mang young children and even adults like basketball,football and lots of activities of ball,they
think them an important thing in life.They love the activity,the althete,because of these,
people become strong and health.But on the other hand,some of these activities are bad for us.
For instance,some of computer games on the internet make people  become addicted to them. As a result,
their study or work have got down.It is so bad for them.In my opinion,we should have a balanced plan
for entertainment.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5272b3c9-6594-3eaa-93cf-09789e666b44> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of country's economy,there are more and more spots about relaxazation.Parents,students and
workers do have much pressure in there life.So they ofenrelax them by some activities.Some of activities are good for them ,
but others are not so satisfied.
The activities are so absorbed that many people want to do do it .I Just want to play basketball with my friends
when I want to relax .It can not only free myself out ,but also build my health.People who do mang relaxing activities can
keep good mood and have a helthy body . But there are also mang bad activities that are unhealthy.For example ,one of my
friend like staying up to playing computer games. I am disagree with him.
As a college student, I think people should do healthy relaxations.Especially when they are very tired.The good
actions,such as doing exercises ,taking a trip are very good for them. The shouldn't do dangerous and harmful activities.
It's bad for them.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7f74069a-497b-3098-9dc3-d1e43d6320ec> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,we need some relaxation to make ourselves comefortble when we are
tired.But what way can relax our best?How can we find the banlace between relax and work?
That's all the problem.
Some relaxation not only can make our comefortble but also can make our body health,
such as swimming,runing.We should choice this way to relax ourselves more.It also have many
other advantages.It can make us know that we should never give up when we meet trouble.It
make us know that we should keep a happy heart to face every day.
But there also are many bad relaxation in our world.I don't refuse it can make our feel
better,too.But,it always bring something bad.For example,playing computer games can give
people happiness who play it.But,many young people play it everyday,even they forget what's
the real life.What bad thing the computer games bring us not only this.It also make our eyes
bad.So we should choice the relaxation carefully.
As a student in university,I belive I can do myself best.I think I can choice a good way
to relex myself and do my work well.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 20b57a00-7cad-3489-92e3-45ee158ffa5f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are some kinds of enterainments in my university life.For example,reading books,
playing basketball game,surfing the internet,having a party with friend,chatting with roommates
,watching film at the weekend and so on.It's very colourful and varied in our life.
The advantage of it is that we can get relax.It can help us release pressure.But some
kings of entertainments are harmfulfor us.Like surfing the intermet too often is not a good
thing.It may influence our study.
As a college student,we should connect study and play properly.We can relax after learning
tasks.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e2ae0c56-d8d1-3c43-9271-d3b72f90e60b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We can see there are many kinds of entertainment-activities we can participat in ,in bour daily life.
However ,while some of the activities are benefit to us ,the others are not sutiable even do hurm to us.For example some of the advanture activities will bring us in risk.
So as a univesity student ,my view is that people should be careful when they are play in some entertainment-activities no matter how ordinary it was.And before we go to have activity,we should make a comprehensive view on it,in order to make a decision whether it safe ,or not.That's the most importent things.
Secondly,we should do entertainment suitablely,which means we should better not be addicted to the entertainment.Because those activities ,which influent our study,job or daily life are not benefit.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2b68f031-9421-3ff9-a81e-f988ae1435c8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is many kinds of entertainments in our life, and as university students, we have access in many of them such as computer games, KTV, card games and so on.
Some kinds of entertainments are good for us but others are not. For example, a little computer games could train our brains but gamble only will make us putting all of our money in it. And all kinds of entertainments are same in one point: not too much. If you fall into it, you will got nothing but yourself being hart.
In my opinion, we should relax our self in a fitting way and never forget we are students and the study is our main job.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 775dc7d2-2364-3e6c-b658-3a6f09bf2696> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Do you work very hard? do you have time to relax? do you find some relaxation in our life?
In fact,you can find lots of relaxation from what you aer doing in the life,such as thinking
a question,teaching kids to learn something new.If you are carful you will find more.
however,everythings have towe sides.Some relaxations are usefull.For example,doing sports can make
our body be very health and playing with our family will reduce the promble among the family.
But,some can be harmful.If we didn't solve it in right way,it can lead to bad relute.
As a student,I think wo shouldn't do the relavation that we find it harm to us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d9abdabf-6d1b-319c-8ff0-6dd3c12ea512> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As time wents by,more and more relaxation are affecting our life. Most of them can make a difference in our life.Just like swimming, playing basketball go sightseeing etc. On the contrary ,there are also negelace effect of some of them. For example, drunk in bar and playing games all the time.
Most of us know that negelace relaxations will do harm to our body as well as mind. However , we still drawn ourselvesin it since what they are loading is too heavy. They will become crazy without relaxation.
A good friend stay, keep doctors away.We will be  I think that we can overcome any hardship with the help of friends.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f5882f4a-e96a-3c76-8239-c61baaef2956> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many amusement activities in our dialy life,such as singing, dancing, playing
computer games  and so on.Some of them are really good for our health besides bringing happy
and funny for us.while there are still some amusement which not only won't take any useful
thing but also do harm  for us.
As for me,I always sing my favorit song when I feel pressful,because it can help me relaxe
myself and help me out of the dificult circustances.It really convinience for me.But some of
my friends feel that playing computer games ,going to bar is a good way of relaxation.they spend
a lot of time in itand didn't aware that they have been addicted to such computer games.
Relaxation are benifit for us and harmful for us as well .
Therefor,we 
college students should learn how to pick them out and follow the useful one.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6e61eb9d-44cb-316c-86f7-be654a4795e5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As wo all know,relaxation plays an important role in our daily life.We will feel tired after school or work.Relaxation can effectively relieve the pressure.
Every coin has two faces.Relaxation has advantages and disadcantages,too.On the one hand,we can't live without relaxation.On the other hand,if we can't relax properly,we may lost ourselves in relaxation.What's more harmful,relaxation will make people fallen if they choose to relax by playing computer games.
As for me,I think it is necessary to relax properly after one-day-study.And I relax myself through playing football,listening to the music and reading books.Playing football can make me strong,listening to the music can make me calm and reading books can make me wise.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 117c4b7b-6e1a-3603-b454-e7ef3b30a19b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are a lot of entertainments and activities in our life.And they really make a difference to our life .Some entertainments such as basketball,dancing can build up ur bodies and strength our health.On the other side,we may got lost in some entertainments,especially for teenagers.They may be addicted in playing computer games and reading novels.
As a college student,I think we should take part in outdoors activities actively. Because we have a lot of leiuse time in our college life ,we should make good use of our time ,instead of only speading time on oue homework and study.Proper relaxation is good for us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d6ab62bc-bc3d-312d-8114-011a6458f7aa> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Maybe sometime we feel so tired in our life and do not want to do what we are doing anymore.
so relaxation just is what we need in our life
we can play some games in spare time for relaxation,what is more,listening light music is also
a good choice,but what above are not the way for my relaxation ,playing basketball is my
favourite,it is known that every coin has two parts ,it is not always fine for us ,such as ,
some body just is drowned in playing games ,forgotting what they should do .what is worse,
it makes them drop out of school and makes their fimaly get a divorce .
Therefore it is necessary to know what and how we enjoy our recreations.personally,making a
time limit for what we doing for relaxation is quite good ,and we will enjoy ourselves .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a3004d7a-66dc-3e2a-bf81-8111c3bb1df4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many different activities in our life!Such as sportgames,coversatians,talent shop and so ,we have many choices to rich our life!For example ,i like play basketball game with my friends in the weekend,i thing that is not only exercise my body but also good for my study!it can let me relaxing after  my study and good for my sleeping!Of course ,in the game ,i can coversation with other player too!It also good for my team cooperation ability!But,there are also have some bad for us ativities!Like take drugs!That really bad for our healthy,and also let our relative far away us !So, i think ,as a student,we should have good senses!Choice good for us activities very important,and far away bad activities also make we our life best!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7fca85c2-c4aa-31be-86a0-37132769420b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In my life,there are lots of relaxtion around me.The university is so free that we can do everything
we like.After class,we can go shopping with the roommate.strolling along the boulevard is a good idea
to relax or riding bike for travel instead.At night,A lot of peolpe togerther to play the card.Of course,
KTV is such cool in life.
so I think that doing relaxtion in a proper way is good for our life.
But not all the relaxtions are good for us,some of then even lost fitness or get into the habit.Such us
playing the computer,drinking , staying up late to do something and so on.Some relaxtion will affect health
and study.on the other hand,if we don't stay up late and do some interst and meaning we can let us relax.
Our life wiil be rich.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d9a6cfe7-5983-343b-b7b5-733480dc4c73> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of amusements activities in our daily life.
Some activities are great value but some of that will be a serious disservice to us.
In this problem,the opinion are individual to individual.But in my opinion,the rights
of the individual are considered to be the most important in a free society.We can do
anything which are within the law.Everyone want to have a fun time.Some one want to
have fun at the party tonight and some one like fishing.As we know big cities have many
amusements.We catch Something that can make us feel amuses, entertains, or pleases.
Also,amusements cannot be regarded as a mere entertainment,but in fact we can learn
from it.If you like fishing,you may know more about fish.If you like sport,you must
pay attention to the news about sport.So the amusements,not just as a mere entertainment,
but also the activities we can learn more in it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 67a03763-24ed-3ce5-b8ce-7bcbd5d26303> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,there are all kinds of relaxations in our daily life.
Just as a old saying goes,however,every coin has two side,and the relaxations are no exception.
Some relaxations have played a great important role in our life and contributed to us,while others
may have a bad side effect on our soul.Therefor,itis essential for us to choose it.
AS a college student,I totally agree with the first opinion.As far as i'm concerned,
firstly,enjoying a entertainment is a good method to relax after a tired work.Secondly,you can
make more friends when you played the games.Last but not the least,it is meaningful for us
to have a great time with our friends.It can build up our soul.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 24a89ea1-b44d-3796-a194-4f78494489d8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there is a plenty of amusements in our life,such as doing sports,watching TV,
and searching the internet.
As an old saying goes,evey coin has two sides.There is no eception in amusement.On the one hand ,
entertainment can help us getting ralaxed;On the other hand,it will take our attentions away from
study,especially make us lose ourselves in doing something goodless.
According to what i konw,i think entertainment is a neccessary part in our life.From my point of
view,i suggest that everyone should have something to amuse himself,Because it is the entertainment
that help us out of pressure,which make us put more attention in work when we are excited.
However,there is no doubt that lots of examples show that entertainments do harm for us.but i
think it is because we relaxed us in a wrong way.the more someone spend time in entertainning,
the more harm he will get.
All in all,as a student in university,we should deal well with our time,even when we amuse
us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 01459e35-3bb7-37c7-ba0c-79dd28ea5eeb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are lots of interesting entertainments for us in our life.
Many of them are benefit for us,but some are bad to us,which would hurt us if we do them.
As a undergraduate,I think we should attention something.
First,we should do the benefical activities in our free time,and refuse to have the bad thing.
Second,if we notice friends around us who is addicted in the bad things,we should help them up,
and suggest them changing into the good things.
Third,we should learn form our model or idol,then we can develop ourselves.
What’s more,I think the government should have some laws to protect us,and make the society better.
Finally,we should start more campaigns to publicize the disadvantages of bad things and prevent undergraduates from damaged activies.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 02195f8a-07bc-316a-9ec3-4bbf27f99214> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are all kinds of activities which is interesting in our life.
Just as playing basketball,playing football,watching TV, playing computer games and so on.
Some of these activities are advantaged for us,while some of these activities will do bad
for us and even cause serious things.
As a students in university,I think we should deal with our activities correctly.
We should know what will make our life more interseting before we take part in any
activitise.As a boy,I also think we should not spent too much time to palying computer
games.At our spare time,we can run with our friends,do some other healthy sports.
Only when we deal with these well can we learn more things in our life and become
more and more happy.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 935f33f0-b24f-3aa3-aa49-23bd3c145865> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we are living in a busy world,relaxation has become more and more neccessary for people who
is living a modern life.
There are varies of relaxation in life.Such as sporting,hunging out with friends or surfing the
internet.But one thing that we should attention is,relaxation wasn't always benefit to
us.On one hand,relaxation like proper sporting or some shopping make us feel better after
a whole day working or studing.On the other hand,some kinds of relaxation such as excess sporting
or playing some video games which spent too much time are really do harm to both our health
and our study.
To be a qualified college student,ny oppion is let the good part remain and let go the un benefit
part.What we have is the right to choose our life,so choose a better one

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a00b9dbb-7b5f-371e-8c92-bfc615357f8f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Many activities are around our live.After one-day study,we will choose some amusements,like reading,running,playing basketball and playing compurter.
Amusements can make our relaxed.For example,when you paly basketball,you will
get rid of tired and stress.You will get more healthy.However,some activities are
not so good,such as playing computergames.Nowdays,more and more people fall in love
with it.But plying conputergames is really a bad way .You will tireder and won't
want to study again.If you do it long-time,you will get weak.
So, we should find a best way to relax.As a college-student,studing is our duty.
We can running or playing some games if we are really tired.We will continue our
work after it.Don't remenber that not make ourselves too tired,because we are a
student.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9468ca5e-6574-3221-a4ae-6e1c35cd1655> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are all kinds of ways for relaxation and amusement in our life.
people study and work on their everyday life,sometimes they would get tired. so they choose
some activities to relax.for example,they watch tv at night everyday.and cmputer is commom on most
people's life,so many people would surf on line and play computer games.according to these way for
relaxation,there are notonly some good ways but also some bad ways.do sports is a perfect  way for us .playing ball games
and runing are the most common sports that the people do .doing sports will make us relaxed,and
more,it will make us become healthy and happy. on the contary,there are many bad ways,too. many
people like to go to some unhealthy amusement place,and more people sink into internet.these bad
way for reiaxation influence people's normal life and what's more ,it make people downhearted,
we should avoid these ways for fun.
as a student,I think we must choose some healthy activities to relax. it need us to self-control
and do some meaningful things .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 84788649-f5ba-37a7-88f1-701fb7b3e77f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,people's life are richer and richer.So there are all kinds of entertainment activities in our lifes.
Some of them are interesting and good for us.For example,taking exercise not only makes us relaxing but is good for our health.Nowdays,our lifes are getting faster,so we usually need to relax us.Morning running,playing basketball,volleyball,tennis are all good ways.
However,some others are bad.they may be dangerous for us.Such as smoking,drinking are bad for our fit.Some of them even hurt our spirit.
Therefore,we should treat them truthly.
As far as I'm concerned,we are supposed to do some activities which are good for us.For plenty of activities,we should have our own principle.We need to choose those which is fit to us.We can't hurt ourselves because of some entainment activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d51da826-05f0-3be3-9b11-b29ebc0eaf55> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,there are many relaxation in life ,expecally the eletronic relaxation.Not only reading,the chess,the card ,but also surfing on internet,playing video games can relax us.
We live in a colorful modern world.
Jack will become a dull boy if there is no break.After working hard a whole day or in the break between the work,some interesting activitise can make a man relax and get more power to do the next work.According to a Canadina crology study,some games can let human's brane have a second-developing.
Every corn has two sides.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 57e1ac40-ca9a-377c-b9e8-176a424893e2> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are lots different activities in our live.In among of those activities,
some are be of befit to us.Such as doing sports,it can make our body stronger;
and making friends,as we all kown that we can't live without friends,with friends,
we can share both happy and sadness;and also some other positive activities.These are
all good to our body and mantal health.But ,as the old saying does:all coins have two
sides, there are also some activities will do harm to us.Such as dinking,come to blows,
and even take drugs...
As a university student,I think when we want to bigin a acttivities,we shoul think about
whether it has positive meamings and good to our health or not. we shoul be careful with it
we shoul take more positive activities and get away form negative and dangous activities.
Only in this way can we live a health life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 53862711-918a-379a-8429-034e0da78d3b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As it know to us all,there are lots of relaxations in our wonderful life, like computer
games ,basketball games ,travelling ,listening music and so on.Defferent people will get
interest in  defferent games. As for me,I like travel than other all.
However, as the coin has tow faces,not all those relaxations are good for us,they also
have the bad weakness,It not only cause bad influence to your health ,but also damege your
life style,too.For example,if you play CP games in a short time,you will feel your brain
become more relaxed then before. But if you play CP games day and night ,you will see you
are getting more and more weaken then before.
As a undergraduate,I think every thing has two faces,you should make a paln before you do
this relaxation,or you will sink into it misleading.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f0ad915c-537f-3e01-a72f-d0d9337f6168> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many entertaiment in our daily life,such as computer games,sports,dancing,singing ,dancing,gambling and so on.But,Not all the entertaiment is good for us,something even take harm to you  physcialy and mentally  .We should take it serious or we will be absorbed in it .Expecially we shouldn't try to gamble .Not until you lose all your property you are regreted . In addictong, games as well as some music could make us relax and give us fun ,it is fit for us to entertain when we are tried of learing.However,we should not waste too much our time in  playing computer games  . We should make balance between working and entertainment.The entertainment time can be one to two hours a day ,and then we will have more energic to have a good day.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 30d265ea-6803-3e58-a989-e739d11ccb01> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of activities in life to relax ourselves,such as reading,watching
movies,playing computer games and doing sports.Some of them do good to us,
but some are not good or even do harm.As a university student,I think we should learn how to
tell wrong from true and choose the former.In fact,everything has two sides.Even in reading,
there are something not suiting us,like the "yellow" books.So,how do we know what's the
right thing we should do?As far as I am concerned,there are two keys.First,ask youself if
you havelearned something done something to make you get progress in some areas,such as konw
dliges and health.Second,ask youself if you have made others happy or ,at least,not done
harm to others.If the both answers to the two questions are "Yes",then ,I can say,you have
relax youself in a right way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3a49bb1b-dd9b-3fad-ab74-613e448698f1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Everyone has his own relaxation in life,and there are many deferent kinds of activities to have relaxation.Some of them are good to us,but some activities are unavalible.
As a university student,I think we should keep a good habit in doing good activities such as  playing computer games,watching movies and sleeping.They are the best way to relax in my opinion.I can exercise my brain and keep fit in doing these things.I love them.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID aea30f55-76fd-34a8-935e-68b183c2c7d8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many relaxation in our daily life.When we are facing too much stress
and need to relax ourselves or take a ease,we can rely on some relaxation.Sometimes
we can make a big crowd to go to KTV to sing, just shouting our stress out and relax
ourselves .But if we sing over,maybe we can be tired more.In addition to that,we can
have a body match with our friend or our roommates,such as playing a baskeyball ,
swimming or just going shopping and to buy what we want as we like.And,we can also just
have  mental relaxation.Go outsite,and take more deep breath than usual.
The relaxation must be choosen compatibly,as some of them are beneficial some are not.
AS a university girl,I think we need to lighten our stress which is from our study ,our
social contact or our life ,on time.And as our economic is limited,we can choose to make
a good contact to nature.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID deb99bc8-fd1e-3335-9c0f-4e6bffadc761> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
The society developing fast, people are forced to get accustomed to high pressure and less
leisure time in their life. Hence the relaxation activites in daily life take a more
and more significant role.
In fact, there are abundant and various entertainment activites in life. On one hand,
many choices on physical entertainment are always available for us. Thanks to the technology
traffic and economy develop, we're able to travel on holiday; we enjoy great fun in hundreds
of playgrounds; we will never be bored with some hiking or gymnastics practice. On the other
hand, life is filled with mental entertainments. Thoudsands of moves are always available;
museums always provide us with good exhibitions; hobbies relax you yourselves even at home...
However, some of these activities are beneficial while otheres are not reasonable even
harmful to us. For the beneficial ones, we relax in a healthy way. Futhermore, these activities
have the function that providing knowledge or inspirations to people. But as some people only
cares about money as profit chasers, they create some harmful ones. Take gambling and watch
violent or porn videos as examples. People,especially children and teenagers, enjoy no relax
but recieving terrible misleading.
Being a university student and educated well, I put great emphasis on making wise judgement
while relaxing. No matter what your hobbies are, what your age is, it is obvious that you should
never forget to stay in critical thinking and correctly recognize the surroundings. Hence we
should relax ourselves in a right way and choose healty activities. Only when you do properly
can you get real relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 40d54a75-a1d7-3e4c-b9c7-d6f23c2d3415> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Everyone needs relaxation,from which we can keep healthy and enjoy our lives.There are a
lot of relaxations in our life,for eveything that make us feel relax can be relaxation.However,
there are some problems with what kind of rlaxation people can choose.
As there are many kinds of rlaxations,such as sports,reading,and watching movies,the mojority
of which are benefit to people,there are still some relaxations that have bad influence to
people and can even ruin one man.Some students make playing computer games their main relaxation
which can not only ruin their health and body,but also their spirits.The relaxations for instance
betting,hitting the pipe and playing computer games are easy to make people addicted to.Those
relaxations are unapt ,though some people say they feel relax when doing such things.
Being a colledge students,I hold my view that relaxation is nessesary but we should choose the
rught ones.As the saying goes,all work and no play make jack a doll boy,relaxation is important.
and choosing the right ones is even more important.We can choose reading,going for a trip or
sports ,which can relax our body and give us more knowledges.
All in all,we should chooose the right ones that are benifit to us to be our relaxation .
Only in this way ,not only can we relax ourselves but avoid the effect of bad relaxations.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1737f14d-0fad-3524-b54f-12d96edf0b46> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of entertainmental activities in our daily life.Such as playing sports,
listening to music,going shopping and so on.It could make us totally relaxed after a tiring
working day.We could find happiness in these relaxing activity and get back to work better.
Most of these activities are positive and give us good influence.As we all know,we live
in a modern life now.Maybe our work will give us a heavy pressure and make us extremely
tired in our brain.Some good relaxing activity,for example playing basketball.It is a great
way to release pressure.After relaxing,we can go to work with a better state the next day.
However,there are also many entertaiments with negative effect and even make our life
worse.For example,after a whole-week study,I really want to relax myself on the Friday night.
So I play computer games and abandoned to it.I couldn't control myself and play it day and
night in the weekend.When I get back to school on Monday,I find myself forget everything
and feel tired.I even think about my computer games all the time and have no willing to study.
This is not a correct way to relax.
In my opinion,as a college student we need entertainments to relax ourselves and enrich
our daily life.But we should learn to control ourselves so that we will not be abandoned to
it and influence our study.Anyway,we should have a correct relaxation and lead a bright life!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 07797586-afec-3065-8a84-bf8fe394374c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,various kinds of amusements filled up our lives.Some of the activities is beneficial to us.For example,travelling can not only enlarge the vision of our eyes,but also can pleasure our minds.Others are not properble,even harmful.
Therefore,as a new generation student in university,I prefer to doing some oxygen-sports in our daily lives.Look,though we students are young and strong now,it's dangerous to take some thing that one thinks adventurous.Recently,some students take it for granted that they are skillful enough to swim anywhere and they go to the lake or river to take a swimming.As a bad news always being broadcasted,some of them didn't go back from the water.And so on,we shouldn't do that even just make a try.
Last but not the least,we have numberous other activities such as playing badminton,basketball,vollyball and etc.Not only ourselves keep on doing sports,but also we can appeal to others to enjoy the fun which from taking the benefical amusements.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 92b4989f-7200-37b1-a5d5-2cee025bf405> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In this modern society,there are all kinds of amusements for us.A lots of amusement were
built by people,such as zoo,kursaal and emporia.People are able to enrich their life fully
tby hese amusement.
However,we can find that some amusements are benefical for our phycial and mental health
and some amusements are able to do hurm to us.For exmple,many teenagers are addict themselves
to computer games so that make a bad influence for their study and family.
In my opinion,as a university student,we should learn that how to reject the bad amusement
and make a choice properly.It is importent for us take an active part in the benefical amusements.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b4fbda22-7eff-3174-a9e0-02ef1250e2e7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We are now living in a increasingly complicated society, in which every individual's work tends to become more complicated and therefore our stress is expanding. This reality results in a enormous demand of relaxtion, which thus engenders a exceeding variety of entertainment and activities in our life. Traveling, sports, concerts, movies, novels, chatting, internet, games -- Our life is never bored as it is filled with countless and diverse activities.
Some activites are beneficial, yet some others are improper and even deleterious for us. While there are a great deal of decent relaxations in which we can learn a lot of knowledge, such as reading, sports activities, traveling, etc, detrimental entertainments are also numerous and fataly tempting. Alcohol may relief some stress, but too much of if only makes us drunk and harms our organics; Television is educative, but spending too much time on it, especially on dramas, only makes you a "couch potato"; Computer games actually contains abundant knowledge and inspiring ideas, but too many become addicted to the virtual world and therefore resist the real word. It is true that we cannot live without relaxation, yet harmful ones may also ruin our life.
As a university student, I find it increasingly important to properly deal with relaxation. To distinguish what is benefitial relaxation and what is not, is crucial for those who are pursuing knowledge. In fact, improper relaxations often come from addiction. Most entertainments have educative sides, yet they affect our life in negative way if we put too much time and vigor into them. In fact, the best way to deal with relaxtion is to control our human nature of over-relaxing. Only if we preserve a proper ratio between study and relaxation can we properly handle with our campus life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 956f4e88-64d7-3711-9082-fda650ea34f1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the economy develops,nowadays we can have all kinds of entertainment such as playing computer games and traveling.As a saying goes"Every coin has two sides.",the way to relax ourself will have advantages and disadvantages.As you know,addicted to playing computer games is a common problem in China,many adolescence are playing computer game day and night so they leave their schoolwork aside.In the other hand,I think traveling do good to your mind,traveling not only can relax yourself but also can give you a chance to see the beautiful place all around the world.As far as I am concerned,we must relax ourself in our life,but we should be in a suitable way.Nowadays,we are more stressful than before,so how could you say wo shouldn't have relaxation in life and the point we should be cared about is whether the way to relax is do good to you actually.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 799804dc-57b0-3b7f-9bae-32e3c5583de8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know ,there are many environment around us,such as singing ,chating online and camping.It goes that just working not joying makes Jake stupid.No doubt,it's important for us,which makes us relax so we can do a well job.
Evey coin have two sides, so environment is.We know that we can get brief from environment  just like chatting online.Everyone is aching for being popular in crowed.Chatting online makes us relax and easygoning.Besides we can make more friends and exchange our imformation improving each other.But some ones aren't fit us even are harmful for us,for example staying late to play computer games.Some classmates maybe take their all time on computer games,which obviously waste their study time and equal to killing themselves.
From wher I stand , as a colleage student ,on the one hand we are suppose to pay much time on our mojors and attend some social practise .On the other hands ,we should improve our intests and take part in some environment.That is ok.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 16210abd-7a99-314f-8127-9186a375515e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There're many relaxation activities in our life.Without them all we will feel that life is dull.But, as we know,not all relaxation activities are beneficial to us.Some of them will waste our time,money and energy,what's more,they may let us lose our passion to the real life.
For the example,playing the football can strenghthen our body and train our team-cooporating ability.But,playing computer games may more take us far away from the real life.
As a student in a university,I must analyse the problem objectively.I don't be completely against playing computer games or other "dangerous" activities,but we have to control ourself to reduce the time of them.In the same time we should put ourself to work,study or other benificial activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID aef776b2-efc0-39bd-bbbc-efb10771ebb8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
During our life, we not only get around and do our work, but also have entertainment and relax ourselves. So the relaxation is quite an important part for life.
There are a abundance ways of relaxation. For instance, we could play sports or play the music instrument, while we could go to see a film or organize a party.So we can see, with different hobbies and interests, we can choose a variety of relaxation.
However, we should admit that, though many ways of relaxation are nice and do good to us, but some ways of it is not good indeed. If we get ourselves into the harmful relaxation, we may get addicted to them. Even in some ways of relaxation, we might do harm to other people and the society.
As for me myself, I think people shoule devote to those good ways of relaxation and get away form the harmful ones. Otherwise, we college students will waste our time and become evil.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 7324aa9c-0ce3-3388-ab21-52cfc27ef0dc> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the fast development of economy ,a variety of entertainments are becoming the
reflection of our colorful life.Playing sports,dancing,singing,watching TV and so on,
all these entertainments make our life a kind of different taste.
Concerning  you are tired,sorts of entertainments are advantage to you.For example,
listening to soft music can relieve your stress from work or study and make you relaxed,
so soon you will desert the unhappiness and feel energetic.Apart from the relaxtion,doing
entertaniments can make your own body stronger and more healthy because you do more
exercise during them.
However,the degree of doing entertainments should be well concerned.Some entertainments
are out of the way.If you do over-loaded entertainments when you feel stressed and let
yourself relax without limit,the entainments will not return your the feeling of
satisfaction,instead,the bad influence to your body and the disadvantage to your own
psychology.
And as a college student,in my opinion,a variety of entertainments make more choices when
we feel tired or stressed.Some entertainments are good for our physical and phychological
health as long as we can well control the degree of doing them.In other way,if we can not
doing entertainments within measure and relax ourselves without reasoningly consideration,
the bad impact will break down the walls of our valuable health, making your body more
stressful.So let the entertainment do well for our beautiful life!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b6774040-cc8a-3f30-9e85-cd749a883e3d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various entertaining activities in our daily life for us to choose.They
vary from each other so much that are of importance for us to have a wise choice.
Some benefit us, such as playing chess and playing ball games etc.But others are
inappropriate or even harmful to us. Some activities are held by school unions which do good
to our study and of course ability. Some activities are just for fun which waste a lot of
time and money.They may seem interesting from the surface but are meaningless in nature.
As a college student, I am of the opinion that we should make a wise choice from so many
entertainment. We should pay more time on our study not on fun. Life is short,we cannot
spare it on time-wasting and meaningless things.But this does not mean we should sit there
reading books for 24 hours. When it is time for relaxtion, we should put down our books and
plunge into the meaningful social activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9e6419b2-0d27-3b42-8d16-1ae43a3659d7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society and technology,plently of fun has arisen . People can
have fun easily in spite of the limitation that used to be. Otherwise ,every coin has two sides
.nowadays, quantities of people have been addicated to some bad fun.Such as being addicated to
computer game or drug.
Science development always give us surprise that even beyond our expectation. Imageing that,
a hundred years ago ,how did they spend their free time .They might listen to some music,of course
without MP3.they may play some bar games, which is really boring for us.In contrary, the fun we have
now not only only changed in number but also the quality.
Meanwhile as I said,technology brought us problems as well. We should handle this.
From my point of view,we should face the chanllage in a positive way .Firstly, yes,the problem
appeared because of technology. Then we should realize it is not a big deal. If we handle this right
we can broaden the goods and avoid the bads.We can make full use of it. The difference exits in ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d5d35b17-998d-39b7-8f1a-a3d86d3c298a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are all kinds of relaxation in our lives. Without doubt, everybody love the
relaxation to make themself relaxed and happy , because more and more person live in
a busy life.
But whether we should take a chance to experience any sorts of the relaxation or
not ? The answer is surely "not" .However, there are relaxation hurting us at the same
time they relaxing us.
Like the sporting,the singing,the dancing... They are good for us especially when
we have a lot stress.What's more,they make us so happy and forget something unhappy.
But the things often have two aspects.There are some bad relaxation around us,like the
drug ,the long time surfing and so on.They can make us happy in a few minutes.Then, they
are ready to damage us not only the body health but also the mental health if we have a
addiction on it.
In a word, we should choose the relaxation around us to experience .And we can't
spend too much time in it so as not to have a addiction.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 65a67275-5338-334d-b0fa-8d8ed1f2ed3b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the social development,the entertaiment activities we can choose are more and more diversitied in our life.For example,most people just could do some simple sport or some
activities those are not speed too much money when they want to have a relaxation years
ago.but now everything has changed.everyone can choose the way and the  activities they
enjoy ,although they are not rich .
However,everthing has its own advantages and shortages,not entertaiment activities ' diversity excepts.that's no deny that most entertaiment activities are helpful for human's
health.But what isn't incredulous is there are virtually so many irrelevant entertaiment activities in our life.
As far as I'm concerned,the most important thing is how us university students to improve
our ability to identify what's bad or helpful. At the same time ,we should develop our active interests as possible as we can .Therefore,when we feel sad or stressed we have more
choices and enjoy ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f1cd79ce-8ddb-3a0f-87cc-231a7690fb46> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Because we are humans, we all need relaxation to help us refresh ourselves. And there are
many kinds of activities for relaxation which we can choose.
Some activities are quite good and meaningful.For example, we can read books when we feel
tired. This activity can not only make us feel relaxed but also help us learn new things.
What is more, we can have mental education while we are relaxed. And to some degree, doing
exercises is also a good way for us to relax. We can do some sports after sitting in front
of the desk for a whole day. I think that can be called a kind of enjoyment.
While some activities are good for us, some may even do harm to ourselves. Playing computer
games too much can be an example. This can make our eyes hurt and what is worse, we may be
addicted to it. In turn, we can not concentrate on our studies and work. Sleeping for too
long is also unhealthy.We need to relax indeed, but we also need to relax properly. Breaking
healthy lifestyle may lead to diseases.
As a college student, I think that we need to learn how to relax properly and this indicate
that we need to do some activities which is good for us for relaxation. We can read books,
do sports and so on. Because of these great activities, we can have enough energy to study
better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 017cbd4d-c363-3386-aea7-4d74403d1211> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various kind of entertainment in life.Nowadays,people have a lot of choices to
relax themselves because of the development of society.Surfing the internet may be the first
choice for many people,especially teenagers.Besides,watching TV is popular as well.As for
people like outdoors activities,doing sports or going to the theatre are what they enjoy a lot.
We can relax ourselves through different ways and some of them really do good to us,however,
some activities are harmful.Take surfing the internet for an example,it has both sides.On one
hand,surfing the internet helps us obtain information as much as possible.On the other hand,
teenagers may easily get lost in the unreal world and as a result,they lost their interests in
other things.So we must brighten our eyes to distinguish the pros and cons.
As a college student,my point is that everyone should have a standard to whatever they do.We
just can't give up some important issues and we should learn to control ourselves and balance our
life and work.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2de3d3ad-d344-3672-9f65-bce431269894> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life,there are all sorts of entertainments around us,such as Kala OK,dancing
hall and so on.The huge stress from study,work and life we must face is why these relaxations
exist in our society.When we take participe in it,we enjoy ourselves and get rid of the
unhappiness and upset in life.Therefore,there are many individuals being keen to such
entertainments.
Everything has two sides and the relaxation is not a exceptation.Some of them do good
for us,like doing some sports,singing and ect.However,some of them are harmful,which may
destory our physical and mental health directly.If we are addicted in some harmful relaxation,
we may form some bad habits without sense.For example,drugs are the most destructive matter
for us a life time.What's more,there are others like smoking and drinking alcohol we may
absorb.
As a student studying in the university,we should undoubtedly choose the relaxations
which can not only refresh ourself but also benefit us.With a varieties of the classes and
works,giving many of us enomorous pressure,we ought to take a break in our spare time for
grade.However,as the saying goes,"The youths are the flowers and hope of the country",we
must take meticulous care of ourselves.Therefore,we should stay away from some kinds of bad
entertainment and take more benefitial activities.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a211bbe1-995c-3927-9612-f48f758e4e7d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern time,due to the great development of the society,we can enjoy plenty of
entertainment of activities.Many school have arranged lots of sports for students.Besides,some remote villages are also developed enough products for sports.So,we are havivg a lot of chances to relaxe ourselves.
Unfortunately,most people incuding the students in universities,lose into their work and do not tend to spend some time on exercise.Naturally,it leads to a bad condition of some people'health.So,it is a must for these people to choose a sport to keep their body.
But there are healthy sports and unhealthy sports.Doing the unhealthy sports may do harm to your healthy beside your imagination.Consequence,it is no doubte that we should make a insign of every sport.
As a student of the university,I think we should spend enougn time on doing healthy sports.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 18eb70a1-37d6-35b6-8b11-aec81f3aec63> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there are many way can ralax ourself,like sports,computer,TV.
Most of this activities is good for us,but also some are damage for us.For example,we can
play basketball or tennis with friends after class.It can make oueself keep health.We also
can surf the Internet,we can learn many useful knowledge.We also can play some games to
make ourself relaxed.But in other hand,some people play computer games everyday,they don't
go to class,they never study.It's waste of time.
As a freshman of university,I will put the study in the first.Although I play games,too.But
I will study when I need to study.Every cion have two side.Proper relaxation is good for us,
but excessive relaxation will damage us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 41c3132e-29a5-33fc-a592-696fdf53d93f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
From middle school to college,we can have more time and more feedom to do things we like.There are many kinds of activities in our life ,such as doing sports,taking part in dancing party ,doing volunteers,going hiking with classmates or others in your organzition and so on.
But we should know,some activities are better for us,and some are not suit for us ,even more can make bad infuluence on us.We must learn to choice,we can take part in the activities that can improve our learning abilities or can make our healthier.for example,we can go to the English Corner to practise our english,we can join the about playing football or other sports.we can also take part in the activities that we interested in and that can help others,this can make our life more valubale.
As a student of college,i think we need to take part in some activities,but we can not do all of them,we should choice which is better for us,and give up the activities that not necessary for us or bad for us.and i think activities is the part of our college life,but not the most important part,we should make our major as the frist thing to do.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 62cf44d4-b394-3d6a-98a9-52641e0a9d1d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We have a lot of things to do in our life.such as working,studying,learning.But we
also have lots of activitives for fun,so we will fell relaxed.Many boys  playing games or
watching animation for fun.Lots of girls watching TV,listening music,eating food to make
themselves realxed.
Because some peaple is too boring,they will do many recreational activitives.If we running,
go hiking,riding a bike,play some games,sleeping,singing,eating delicious food,we will have
fun and get benefitions from them.But  druging,palying too much games,killing animals,
treat others,it will hurt somebody and is not good for themselves.
As a undergraduate,we must find a good way to fresh our life and make our world get more
fun.So we can go traveling to know more about the world,reading book to get knowledge,chatting
with people,finding boyfriends or girlfriends to make our life be full of love.So we will
get a power to study.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 28b3655b-843b-3fac-8851-84fe5124661c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are so many kinds of entertainment and activities for us to relax ourselves when we feel tired in our busy life.That is no doubt that we feel comfortable and relaxed after the entertainment.
However,every coin has two sides.Some entertainment are beneficial for us but some of them have a bad impact for us.For example,some students try playing computer game when they need to relax.To be honestly,I won't think it could have a bad influence if the students can restrict themselves to play.Unfortunately,a lot of students get addicted to the computer games,which do harm to them.
As far as I am concerned,we should restrict and pay attention to ourselves.Don't let the entertainment be out of our control.Only in the way can we have a healthy relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ce9e42df-cfa0-3aa8-8514-28639eaf26d5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays many of us live in the boom cities where always will hold a lot of
entertainment activities for their citizens.To be honest,there are so many kind
activities can be goood for our life and we can relax ourselves by taking part
in them.But some entertainment activities are not so appropriate to be hold.Like
the Dating show.In the one hand,this kind of activities are waste of money.In the
other hand ,these are difficult to show the people' real feeling and emotion.
Besides,there are some kind of activities are control by some people who are want
to make a big profit from the activities.
So as a college student ,we should soberly know the entertainment activities'
advantages and disadvantages so that we can enjoy and the activities which are
good for us ,and we can relax ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1c97838b-a7a3-303b-be22-0394834331af> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are variety of entertainment in our life,which offers various choices to us when we
are tired or just bored ,wanting a break or relaxation.
As we have mentioned above, the choices are many.Some people usually spend their spare time
on reading books,playing instruments or doing exercise,which is beneficial.Some others prefer to
go shopping or chating on the net,which is hard to say advantagous. There even come some harmful ways of relax-
ation,such as surfing on the net or playing computer games,throwing their time into some useless
and dangerous activity.
As an undergraduate, I have my own view on relaxation in our life. We are supposed to take ad-
ventage of those benificial relaxation ways and do our utmost to keep ourselves away from the
harmful ones.We are not only going to have relaxion but also to improve our level physically
and mentally during the relaxion period.Only by this mean can we enjoy our life in a more appropriate
way.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bc5f383c-a849-311a-a7ec-842baee63be0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society developing fast towards future,many people are suffering high pressure
in their daily life.So there are happten to various activities to relax us.But not all of
them are good to us.
For example if you being addicted to computer games,you would be harm to your body,and can
be affect your studies and lifes.Of course there have profit for us.If you are tired
listening music can make you feel better.And appropriate sports can do great pro to our
mental and physical health.
And as a college student,in my opinion,various activities are good.Every coins have two
sides,it's depend on how to use it. If you can good operation these activities,it will be
good for our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 55416bef-c079-3b16-9302-a1b988c79684> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Our life is cheerful and colorful in which there is a variety of activities.However,we
have to to be careful and hold a proper and rational attitude towards them due to the fact
that with the beneficial activities come inproper ones even harmful ones.
It is those benefical activities that beautify our life and please our minds.As you can
see, people are taking various benefical activities such as aerobic running,swimming or any
other sports.Also, dancing,singing,reading,going to the theatre and gathering together
happliy will be taken into consideration when we have spare time.These activities beyond
doubt add happiness to our life and help keep our mood in a pleasant state.
On the contrary, the inproper ones even the harmful ones may cause damage to us both
physically and mentally if we do not pay attention to.Take going to the disco as an example.
Some people go to the disco hall to find their enjoyment there,where drugs and violence are
more likely to happen.If we are exposed to such an environment,chances are that we may get
infected with those drugs and get into the habit of smoking and so on.
As far as I am concerned, we college students should avoid such inproper even harmful
activities.As the future mainstream power in contibuting to the society,we should cleary
be aware that it is of great significance for us to boost our strength and elevate our mind.
Needless to say how they can lay a negative impact on us.And how our study and normal life
are greatly affected.Consequently,we should pay much more attention to as well as avoid
those harmful activities,while take an active part in beneficial ones.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6052725b-6741-3319-8759-5b2dd6a836a1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all konw ,there are lots of kinds of relaxtion in life. such as listneing to music ,doing exercise,
piaying computer games ...
Not all kinds are healthy and good. Everything have two face,and relaxtion is not except.
Some kinds of relaxtion do good to us, both mentally and physicaly.But some is not good,even
do harm to us.
As for us collage students,we should divided the relaxtion into different parts. And then,we
can enjoy the part which benefit us.we also should be away from the part that is bad even can makeus be addict to it. what's more, we need to encourage frends doing the relaxtion which is goodto us and warn them be away from that part of relaxtion which can perplex us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4ab39466-c84a-34bb-bf89-73cfb20f33cd> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
To live a whole life, we can't just keep working without a break, we must take a breath
to relax ourselves and get ready for the next work.
As there are kinds of ways in our life to relax ourselves, it's necessary for us to tell
the good one and form a good habit of relaxation.
Besides study or work, there are many other things that people could do to relax themselves.
If you look aroud, you could find out that your friends all get their own ways to have a rest.
Mary, a pretty girl, would like to shopping as her relaxation, just like she always says,
shopping calms me down.
Lucy, a lovely girl with a little overweight, would stay in the room and watch movies, and
when she gets tired, she would just go to sleep. by her words, she thinks this is the most
comfortable life that she could imagine.
Tom, a healthy strong boy, relax himself like other sports boys. He loves basketball and
football, which makes him healthy and happy.
These relaxation seems common in our life, and they do relax people in the mean time.
But in our life, there are some other ways of relaxation that would do harm to ourselves,
and even ohers.
For example, some people would smoke when they are tired or nervous, which not only do
harm to their own health, but also do harm to others'health.
In a word, to form a good habit of relaxation would not only benefits our life, but also
others.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a9544196-b379-3673-a756-95b2cd4e542e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
people have to live with others in our society . consequently , we always
take participate in lots of games and entertainments . It's good for us to strengthen
our friendships and interconnections .
many parties and games can have a good effects . For example , Playing basketball
and other sport games can always not only make our body better ,  but also help us know
eath others a lot . Besides , Taking part in academic activities and matchs can improve
our knowledges and build up our friendships as well .
However , activities are not always benificial for us when major part of it is good .
Taking bar as an  illustration , we can see people drinking alcohols and taking drugs in
the bar . We don't know how to refuse these invitations and cannot control ourselves when
we're in the bar . Thus , we make acquainted with baddies , we do harm to our body , we do
something illegal . It will makes us abandoned by the society , as a result , we will lose many things in
terms of physical and mentally .
So , be careful of yourselves , be clear about what avtivities we can take or not .
every coins has two sides . So control yourselves well , never go down the drain .

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2376535a-66e2-3b24-b760-84c96b85fbbc> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are activities in our life ,they bring us happy,bring us friendship,bring us kowledge.We all live in the activitives world,they make our life more and mord enrich,we can not live without them .
But we also knowe that ,many activities are helpful to us ,but others are harmful to us ,for example ,the bet and so on .
In my opinion,as a univerciti student ,we should improve our eyesights of the "good and bad ".we should kowe that good activities shuld be for most peopel not for few people.The government should manage them reasonablely

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d72b7dd2-4ec9-3089-9a23-9849905e86a6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many relaxations in our life.However,not all amusements are good for us.Even some relaxtions are good for our physically and mantal health,but if we take too much time or attention to it,it will do harm to our body,too.
For example, playing basket ball is good for our body.But if we spent too much time on it,we will feel tired all the time and easily to get hurt in the game.Smoking might be a relaxation for some people.And smoking is definitely bad for our lung and other organs.
As a student of the university,I agree with the opinion that we should have proper relaxation in our life.Nearly every one in the modren life have suffer from the stress.And if wo do not take some amusement to relax ourselves,we may become mad.And people who are under heavy stress,have lower efficiency.But some relaxtaions which are bad for our health,should not be taken,like watching the blue movies,smoking,or even taking drugs.
Anyway,I think that having the proper way to relax is of great important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 72e03c17-bcc8-318a-b0e6-1c2cfd0fdb3c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
After a week's work and study,we everyone may feel a little tired.
So we need to learn to relax at this time.
As we all know,we may have a lot of choices to be relaxed in our spare time.
For example:Playing sports,chatting with others,surfing the internet and so on.
Among all these ways to relax,some of them are beneficial while some are not.
The internet is a good example:we read newspapers,do some shopping,chat with others...
all of these can be done on the internet.so we can get relaxed and feel great on the
internet very easily
but in reverse,there can be also some bad effects once we misused this tool.
We may heard many news which say someone or another was absorbed in the internet,
they didn't care about the truly life around them.
At last,what they get from the computer is not the relaxation but pressure.
That's really a bad consequence!
So,In my opinon,we should choose a good and right way to relax ourselves,which is
not only good for us but also for those who care us indeed.
Then,after we make our choice,we can not lose control at the same time.
Just as the old saying goes: A coin has two sides.
One of the best idea may has its bad effects if we can't use it correctly.
Therefore,Relaxation is an art in life,we should learn and enjoy it!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d0981318-7b7c-3044-96b4-09532c31eb36> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various relaxations in our life. However, some of them are impertinent
and even do harm to us. As a university student, In my opinion, we should choose our
relaxations selectively.
Bad relaxations bring us unhealthy habit. It could be seen that students staying
up whole night to play computer games, or they choose cigarette to make them feel at ease.
The behave of them shouldn’t be advocated. We can choose what we like,and I think these
entertainments can help us to hanve a better relaxation.And we often have them with our
friends,which can almost make everyone happy.
Healthy relaxations bring us a well-liking lifestyle, such as breath walking,
posture exercise, listening to the music and so on. Let’s take music for example, thanks
to the music, we can get rid of emotion baggage. Always remenber that amusement is only a
small part of our life, enables us to relax in the spare time, and you can benefit from it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e271a515-f8ac-3551-ade4-0010645ca1bb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, There are all kinds of amusements in life with the development of technology.
On one hand, we can benifit of some of the amusements, for example listenning to music, doing sports, watching TV and so on. As we all know, we human beings all have limited energy, so when we are tired, we need to have a rest and do some amusements.
On the other hand, some of the amusements are not appropriate and can even be bad for us. These days, we know that lots of teenagers are addicated to playing computer games so that they do not study at all and some become sick and even dead because of continuous games. Similarly, manys young guys stay up late for reading novels, watching TV and something else.
As a college student, as far as I am concerned, relaxations in life whether be good for us or not mostly depend on ourselves. We can relax for a while to get tid of tiring but should never aaicated to. In a word, We should make sure that the purpose of relaxation is to make us work well and learn to let relaxation in life in our control but not be controled by relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8c832f51-b49b-3342-b550-bf84e2e2b324> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid development of economy,a growing number of people start fullfiling
their mental life.Thus,more and more entertainments appeare in our life for people to relax.
some entertainments really do good to us .For example,sport activities not only make us
relax ourselves but also make us healthier.playing computer games properly make us more
alert.Life is boring without these entertainments.But every coin has two sides,some
entertainments is not reasonable,what's more, they are iust bad for us.Such as gambling,
it's really welcomed by a lot of people,it make people corrupt.If everybody is addicted
in it,our society will be hopeless.
As an undergraduate,I think we should take active part in helpful entertainments to
relax and evaluate ourselves.We also have the duty to say "No"to those harmful activities
to make a little contributions to our society.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fc9d7dde-a86e-3d5b-8a54-127523041b63> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kind of relaxant actives that we can do  in life.Even though the world is similar every hour,every day.
Even though the burden in our shoulders is hard to stand ,we would better be good to ourself.when we feel unhappy ,tired,
pain and sad,we can something interest to ralax ourself.such as play football,sing songs,dance,paly computer games and so on.
Frome where I stand,there are deep distinguish between the good actives and the bad one.As we all konw,everything has
its two different side.We must realize the good aspect of the relaxant actives and the bad aspexct.Only in this way,
can we do well in relaxing ourself when we feel tired.so, don not be so pessimistic when you are sad or tired,just raise
your head,and take a look at the babyblue sky.Then you will feel better.
As above,when we rest properly we can also learn something that isn't written on paper.
when you heart ,and adjust your mood ,then you find every day is fresh.So just relax yourself when your tired.
And then you will find everything gonna be good!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3a2919f0-8bf9-3fdb-9a90-87d0c18d44af> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
It is widely accepted that there is a lot of relaxtion activities in our life.These activities are used to ralax ourselves in our busy life.However,not each of them are good to us.We should distinguish what is useful to our body and what is harmful.
To begin with,there are lots of relaxtion activities contributing to good health.For example,playing sports can build our strength as well as relax our body,listening to music will refresh our mind,joining in outdoor activities enabling us to
communicate with nature.To conclud,those who don't have enough time to relax themselves will have time to have illness.Therefore,we are supposed to take beneficial relaxtion activities to keep our body energitic.
Evry coin has two sides.Some of relaxtion activities are bad for us.Since some will waste our time and do harm to our body
we should give it up.For example,some students spend much time playing computer games,so it is not only wasting their lifetime but also bad for their eyes.What's more,some people like somking when they are under pressure.It's bad for our body.
As a student,we should distinguish different relaxtion activities to make our life better.We should drop those bad and hold on the good.Only in that way can we relax ourselves better.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 45361b98-e705-30f2-86ed-f74718981f72> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the qulity of life improved,people do not need to struggle to survive that hard any more,and instead,they become
to focus their sight on relaxation more,thus flooding large varities of relaxing activities in society now.
However,it is a common principle that good things come with bad things,and the activities can be of no exception.Act-
vities like doing exercises,listening to music can help us relax in a large sense.But things like playing computer
games will not be good to us in that wonderful way for most of the time.
So how should us colledge students treat those relaxing activities right? In fact by my view,we students need to rel-
ax in life besides studying all day long,we have the rights.But at the same time, we're no more kids,we have responsib-
ilities to take,and most of us should be able to judge dos and don'ts,good things and bad things,we just have the abil-
ity to manage ourselves well--refusing the bad things and relax ourshlves well.Balancing study and relaxation well,then
we have the opportunity to enjoy wonderful life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 3ad4f340-6e09-3ed3-a50c-3ee1722ecf90> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As science and technology are developing rapidly in resent years,there are much more ways
for us to relax ourselves.Besides some traditional entertainment,such as playing a ball game,
watching a movie or go hiking,we have iPod to play music and Play Station Portable to play
video games.Our relaxation in life become various.
However,every coin has two sides.On the one hand,a diversity of relaxation can lessen our
stress which comes from our study and work,giving us a better mood to continue our work.More-
over,many kinds of relaxation make us frequently contact our friends thus strenthening our
friendship and perhaps making more friends.On the other hand,as relaxation is more appealing
to us than our work and study,many have been addited to it so that they spend much time
playing regardless of the undone work.What's worse,some people relax themselves too much so
that they don't have the passion to overcome the difficulties in life and go for bigger
achievement.
Form my angle of view,relaxation is essential in our life,for it brings us more happiness
and help us improve our efficiency while working.But it should be pointed out that it is
also necessary for us to relax ourselves in a proper way so that we can benefit from relaxation
instead of being the slaves of it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 6112a437-4228-345e-b5b2-920b902841a8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of economy, our life is becoming more and more colorful, filled with
variety of amusement.
However, not all of the amusement is good for us, and some even can destroy our life. Take
playing computer games as an example. Nowadays, most of the youth choose to play the computer
games as their first choice, or even the only choice at their spare time. It not only cause
the problem of physical health but also mental. On the one hand, staring at the computer for
a long time can cause short-sighting. One the other hand, it's not a news to hear of someone
sit at the computer for days and then die. As for the mental health, it's easy to lose yourself
when playing computer games. Once your are lost, you won't care your study or work, you won't
care about your family, which presents that you are ruining your life.
As a student, I think that attending all kinds of amusement can make our life happier and
can reduce our burden. But we should learn how to choose. Outdoor activities is always better than
indoor ones. Besides, it's not the kind of amusement itself bad for us, but our attitude makes it.
No matter sports or computer games, or some other kinds of amusement can ruin our life, if we
can't play it temperately. Always remenber that amusement is only a small part of our life, enables
us to relax in the spare time, and you can benefit from it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8cfc74a7-76d3-34a4-900b-f3283c593cb4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that a pretty number of ways can be used for us to relaxe in our daily
life.some like playing sports to make themselve relieve.However,others get sick of sports,but they
still have ways to relaxe themselves,like watching TV and going out for a walk and so on.
Becuase of the development of technoligy,we can relaxe ourselves in different ways.Relaxation is
of great important in our life.It's a fact that nowadays we are drowned in strong stree ,which is
harmful for us physically and mentally .SO we should relaxe ourselves.However some entertainments are benificial for us,
while some isn't good for us even harmful for us.For example, playing computer games is also a way to relaxe .However playing games
will get our eyes in a bad condition and make us addicted to computer games.So if we want to get out of stress ,we should pay attention
to the way we relaxe ourselves.
As a students in colleage,i consider talking with my parents and friends and watching TV as my relaxation.As a student,we should also
learn to how to get out of stree and make a new start.Every time when i come to the real life after relaxe myself in a happy world,i feel
stronger to star my future.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0e959ddd-2be1-34ef-8d48-a25f16cb8fd1> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society, more and more relaxation come into our life and take up with our spare time .These activities fresh us after a long time of tiring working or studying.
As the saying goes, every coin has two sides. However ，not all relaxation is benefit to us. Some of them may happy us for a while, but do harm to our health on a very long time or root some harmful thought in our mind. For example, alcoholic abusing and smoking make some young men lose themselves in real life and result in badly accidents.
So, as a university student, in my opinion, we should keep our mind awake and keep ourselves far away form bad relaxations. On the other hand, we should take part in some beneficial relaxation from time to time and develop ourselves. Moreover, it is a good way to make new friends and have fun together.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a8c50270-8e0c-30aa-ac50-8f7593c9e674> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Since there are all kinds of stress in life,people get all kinds of relaxation to
release themselves.Being stressful,different kinds of people have different relaxing
choices.Some like playing sports,others like doing some light activtities,such as
watching movies,listening to music,traveling...still others may get some more excited
but dangerous jobs to do,like taking drugs,speed up their car,drinking,and so on.They
are all want to entertain themselves,but choose different manners,so the conclusions
would be quite different,too.
Among the entertainments above,some are fun and healthy,but some sounds harmful
and dangerous.As far as i am concerned,what people want is just to get relaxation,it's
notnecessary make their health or life in debt.Different relaxations are taken to do
goodto people,man should get the control rather than what people chose control people
themselves.Make up our minds appropriately,so that we can feel really comfortable from
the relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f9077750-3061-3dc7-a215-94c3b78a1d67> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
there are many relaxations in our life,so there are always a lot of happniess and fun with our living
we can relax ourselves in many ways.when you are undered a great pressure in study ,to do some sport wi
th your classmates is one of ways that can help recharge your batteries;when you have setback in uility
,to go to the KTV and sing aloud is helpful;when you break with your girl or boy friend and think no on
e love you,to have a dinner and talk to parents is a wide chocie.
The more relaxation we have,the more we shouldn't let our defense down.as not all the ways to relax o
urself are good to us.some relaxation is good to us, while some are bad,even harmful to us.for example
some people relaxed theirselves with drug,which can help them relise from the unpleasant things .this w
ay to relax is harmful and may kill your life. there are many persons's lessons for us.many famous stars
lose their brillant future because of drug.
As a undergraduate in the college,we should relax ourselves with right ways.we should recharge our batteries
and fresh ourselves in healthy ways.life can't without relaxation but only in the right ways to relax can we really
relax ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 872a5cb4-d28b-3dd8-a830-f0dc1fa67459> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Our life is full of many kinds of relaxations,which makes us enjoy the fun and the
beauties in our life. We can play sports with our friends ,we can go hiking in spring to
feel the breath of nature, and we can read books in a slient place with a cup of hot and
delicious coffee.
As a saying goes,"every coin has two sides".Some entertatments benefit us a lot,such
as playing sports can strengthen us and make us relax, reading books can broden our views
and makes us wise and so on, however, some relaxations are not suitable for us,even they
make a bad effect on us. Take playing computer games for an example. Once we start to play
computer games, we will be addicted in it very soon, which will wastes us a lot of time and
does harm to our mental and psychological health.
As a university student, I have my own oppinions on the relaxations in life. In order
to relax ourselves and esape from the control by heavy pressure, we will alter some relaxations,
but we should choose the reasonable activites, but not the harmful activites. We can go for a
walk with our families ,we can play sports with our friends, we can listen to music and so on.
Choosing the reasonable and right relaxations not only can relax us ,but also can make us learn
much and more healthier, which is called" kill two birds with one stone"

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 081bcbfe-98fb-3cd3-8ee9-26139667cf1a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
nowaday,there are all kinds of amusing things in our life to let our life become funny and happy.
most of these activities are good for us to have fun.  but at the same time,as all of us know,it isn't always good for us.
sometimes it threatens people's normal life.for eaxmple,many chidren are addicted to play games all the day.
they even could not get rid of them.they don't talk to there parents and become carenessless about there study ,
because they are busing with there games.what's worse, there are even some dangerous events,such as pudge jumping and roller
coaster.
of course we need some relaxe in our busy life .we need time to have fun ,to spend with our friends and family.
but we should choose the way in what we spend time.in our social life ,we should forbid those bad games which have bad
influence on our life,and do more healthy and safe things.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 66cc2d62-cd9d-3863-b3ee-8e18ebaa1aaf> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many different kinds of entertaining activities in our life. Some people prefer
reading books, watching television and playing video games, while others like staying
outdoors doing sports.
Entertaining activities are not all the same, so are their influence on people. It's true
that some activities are of great benefits to us, but we can't deny the fact that some of
them are inappropriate and even do harm to us both physically and mentally. First of all, extreme sports, which are very popular nowadays, may cause severe injury or death to the players. Moreover, some movies and video games that contain a lot of violent and sexual scenes will gradually push teenagers to the edge of committing crime. Such examples of bad relaxation are too much to tell.
As a college student myself, I strongly suggest that proper measures should be taken to
limit the bad activities and develop good ones. Government must spare no effort to ban those illegal activities and resources. Schools and parents should cooperate in order to keep their students and children away from harmful entertainment. And we college students can publicize healthy entertaining activities to our families and friends. But most importantly, everyone needs to tell the bads from the goods instead of becoming addicted and doing nothing.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c057ca21-57ab-3aa8-8370-7918994d38b3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
When you feel tired,there are kinds of entirements for you to relax yourself.
As you can see,some rangs of relaxation can benefit you,like running,climbing,swimming,hiking
and etc.These help you build your energy and reduce your stresses in the same time.However,
sometimes some when people face great burden,they want to relax themselves right away,at the
time,the way they choose may really harm them.In modern life,we see so many people drink too
much,smoke a lot ,even get drugged.Maybe,they feel free free then,but they ignore the hurt
these relaxtion give them.
In my eyes as a college student in school,I do understand the stress we will face,and also,
I worried a lot very offen.So when you feel really bule,try to calm down and listen to some music.
If possible,travle to some beautiful and quiet places.when you view some fancinating sights,you
will get charged.When you work into night,your sleep really matters now.Do some exercises,have
a comfortable shower and lie on the soft bed,these ways can help you relax a lot.In life,you will
meet many difficuties,chanllenges and obstacles,finding some right relaxation is a good way to help
you succeed.
Let your anger flow,try to get more relaxation,and you will feel free more.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f65e358c-d976-3460-9111-ddc23846e704> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a varied of relaxation in our life. Some people like sports out of house, some people think that having a lunch or dinner with closed friends is a wonderful relaxation in the whole world. Some one mingt think it a great relaxation--in the house,having a sleep,without any pressure.And obviously different people in different stages of life would have their own relaxation in life.
But,not every relaxation is good for you,there are a few of unproperty relaxation among those good relaxation. Worsely, some unproperty relaxation will even make bad influence upon us. For example,if you finish a tired workday and want to relax yourself,so you might take a shower or listen to the music. That's OK. These are good relaxation. But, if you plan to use drugs to forget your pressure and if you take it as your relaxation. Then, the relaxation will make you a bad and black future.
As a academician, I think a good and property relaxation is one of the most important things in one's life. A man must know how to relax,then he can work or study or living a life happier. So, we must learn to make choice. We should pick those bad relaxation out of all relaxations. And then,choice relaxation which suit us well. Keep away of bad relaxations forever. If you have a healthy relaxation in life,I believe you will have a happier and brighter life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cfc8137d-7bc3-38f1-b1d3-1cf6124d8a4a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are different kinds of relaxations in our life. Some of them are good for us,such as
reading books,listening to music,playing basketball and so on.We can learn something new,
relax ourselves or build our body.
However,there are still lots of relaxations have bad influence on us.For example,computer
games will take us much time.If we spend too much time on it,we will lose ourselves
in unreal world.Those relaxations are not apropriate,even harmful to us.
From I attended college,there has always been many activities around me like various
competitions,speeches,parties and volunteer work .I should consider that if I can benifit
from it or if I really have interest in it.I also should keep a balance between activities
and study.Then I make decisions and just do it as what I want.
As a college student,I think we should make choices and arrange our time wisely.On one hand,we can
attend some of them to make more friends,improve our own ability or just make fun.On another
hand,it's necessary for us to keep calm and not devote too much of time to anyone of them.
In this way,I think we can have a meaningful life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9a0050cc-8ba5-3ec4-911f-f2929cb1745f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
People often feel tired and stressed after working for the whole day, so various recreation is very significant and necessary for them which can provide them with a quiet and relaxing chance to forget everthing that bothered them. Althoug there are kinds of recretions, they are diverse from advantage to disadvantage because they may ruin people's ambition and ideal, gambling, for instance.There's a well-know saying which is used by many psychologists to promote better attitudes towards recreation goes that" Don't be recreated by recreation".Indeed, many people do not understand the true meaning of "recreation".
As a college student, I think people should hold rational ideas about recreation.
First, limit the time, recreation will never be the most important part in your life and it's your health, family or work that matters.Second, find a proper and benefitial way to relax yourself such as sports, music even eating your favorite snacks.Third, being a volunteer may be a great way because not only you can help those people in need but gain happiness and relaxion from the work.The most important way is to keep a healthy lifestyle and learn to ease yourself in daily life!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f0d797d4-9c8b-3314-8fcd-9bea451a151c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to us ,there are lots of entertainment in our daily life ,but it is
commonly that every coins have its two sides!
As for us,sports and computer games are our main relaration ways, but sports are
of benefit to us,such as playing basketball,football or table tennis,it can keep our body
healthy,but on the contary ,if we often play computer games,it is harmful for our eyes,
what is more,playing more computer games will let us feel tired,even worse,it will let you
addicted to the computer games!
As a undergraduate, in my opinion, with the rapid development of economy, there are
plenty of amusement methods, as a matter of fact,there are only a few entertainments being
good for us,for example,sports and running. These helpful amusement ways are necessary for
our happy life,because a good relaxation will help you form a good habit , besides, it also
can keep you a good mood,all in all, a good relaxation will give you a beautiful life !

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 2c7f5025-d5dd-34b3-89a1-1611224c7f1c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,we have lots of ways to have fun.With the growing of society many great things have been
created.Like internet,TV,psp,varieties of sport games and so on.
Obviosly there are some good and also harmful in the entertainments.For example if we surf the internet
for a long time we will feel tired and our eyes will be kind of hurt.And what is worse is that if you are
adicted to it.It will influnece your life.It will make you not willing to study and want to
paly badly.But if you like sports,you will find the ture happinise.In the sport you will exersise your body,you
can make yourself happy and the most important is that sport will make you confident in your future life and work.
As a university student,I think we must have the ability to control ourselves.There are many students in university
adicted to computer games.They do not want to have classes and play games all day and all ninght.But i think it is harmful.
chosing a sport as your daily entertainment is the right choose.like me i like basketball i can learn something in the teamwork.
so i think chosing a way to relax good to you is important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9579954d-4248-3765-9bc4-d78328c7b9da> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
The world is colourful,the same as our life,one of the reasons is the various relaxations,like playing sports,
listening music,play computers,take dinner together with many.However,there are some advantages,also disadvantages.
Playing sports is a very good relaxation,which can make our body stronger and healther.Listening
music can relief our stress in study.Using computer to look for information is also fast and effective.
Take dinner together can improve our friend relationship.The above is the advantages in taking part in
these activities.Due these,our life become more enrich and more interesting.
Everthing has two images.when we enjoy the relaxations we can not forget their disadvantages,like taking
up the learning time as the common short.In fact,the biggest short is not wasting time,but make us addict in
it.Many students play computer games in the study time or use the computer watching film.These can make us
feel learning is boring,the do not study.Meanwhile,taking dinner too ofen can waste our too money.
So,as a student in university,we should banlance the relaxation and study,using time more reaonably.Relaxation
is necessary,but we can not do it too ofen."Balance" is the key.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 8cb7b7ce-7557-3469-8cf9-6f0837be09e0> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are various of relaxation in life.Some relaxations are beneficial to life,such as sports,travelling,hiking and so on.These
relaxation not only relax youself,but also do good to your health.However,some relaxations are not applicable even harmless.For
example,spending lots of time watching TV will have a bad effect to you eyes and you may become more negative to life.In addition,
many dangerous activities seem to be excting,but the security is threatened.So these relaxtions should be avoided.
As a collage student,I hold the view that we should weigh the advantages and disadvantages of the relaxation.We can not follow
others without thinking about it.We should choose the relaxation which is beneficial to our life and reject the negative activities.
So it only depends on whether the relaxation have a possitive influence to life that it should be suggested. I strongly recommend
to have a healthy relaxation,since it will improve you efficienty and do good to your life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 89e54b44-5bf7-3107-9b71-d0f9a764dce5> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of activities to relax us when we are very tired ,such as music ,
sport and so on .
Although some of them are good to us ,there are still some activities which are not
suitable for us.For example,playing computer game is one way to relax us,but if you always
play computer game on the Internet,you will get addicted to it so that you don't have enough
time to study,causing your terrible exam result.So it is very important for us to find a
porper way to relax us,maybe listening to music is one of the best way for us.
As a college student,we are energetic.I think the best way for us to relax ourselves is
exercise.Because not only does it can relax us ,but also it can build up our body,and show
that the Chinese student are energetic to the world.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a8dbc65f-822c-3682-a2e0-82b686a8b189> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
A variaty of entertainment activities we can take to relaxe ourselves. Some of them can help
us keep fit. But on the other hand ,some of them cannot benefit us and even they would send us
to trouble.
As a university student ,I think every student should do some right exercise,such as playing basketball,
playing football,driving bicycle and so on. Of course, we can also play computer games and some advanturous
activities if we have the adquate preparation.
We perhaps take some injurible exercises sometimes becacase we are young.We donnot consider the reponsibilities
for our action.I think students should have right relaxing plays in right time.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1b197db8-b1a5-35c8-8629-308aff44f565> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are various entertainments in our life,such as sports,reading or even playing computer,ect.And there is no doubt that they are playing an important role in our spare time.
However,although the entertainments can entertain our spare and help us to relax ourselves,it is easy to find that they also make a large infaction in our life.Some entertainment like reading do make an active sense in ourselve,if we reasonably make use of the spare time.But,sometimes,another entertainments also have a bad influence in our life.They take up our mainly spare time,so we just feel busy and have no time to finish our work.
As a modern college student,I think make a good use of our spare time is very important .We know without such a large prassure from the homework and eleven-plus,college students have more spare time.So if we not use the time reasonalbly but just wast time,we will never make it.In my words:just make your entertainment reasonably.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID cdff2fd3-8277-34a4-aae6-4163a804df6d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
After working or studying for a whole day ,we are so tired .But it is OK.Because there are many kinds of way to relax .We can choose any way of amusement we like .
But some of them are good while some are really bad for us ,such as smoking ,fighting ,drinking,and so on.
In my opinion ,we really need to choose a healthy way to relax.Take me for example, I will
read magazines ,listen music ,watch TV,see films or just go to sleep when I need relax myself,just like many poeple do .Ithink the methor I take is good.I can not only relax but learn something and it is good for me ,no bad for others.However ,lots of people like to drink after they  suffer wrong .It is relly not a wise choise.Alcohol could do harm to our body.A good way to relax can help us a lot while a bad way maybe hert us .We need to choose a good way seriously.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c385c4ee-ff22-3db9-912f-204cfa6d73f7> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our lives,there are so many entertainments,such as playing sports,listening to music,
watching movies and so on.Some entertainments are beneficial to our lives,however,some
entertainments are inappropriate and even harmful to our physical and mental health.Some beneficial entertainments
can make our lives much better and relax ourselves.We can learn the meaning of teamworks
when we are playing sports with our friends.We can enjoy the beautiful sound and relax
ourselves when we are listening to music.Also we can learn the different experiences from
movies.However,some entertainments are harmful to our lives.Some people are addicted to
computer games.They play computer games day and night and they just fall into the world of
games,They even don't study and communicate with others.Being addicted to computer games is
harmful to people's lives.
As a college student,I think we should arrange our spare times appropriately.We shouldn't
just know study day and night.We should develop ourselves and improve our abilities.We
should participate in beneficial entertainments and relax ourselves.So we can study much
better.Also,we shouldn't be addicted to some harmful entertainments.Because when we are
falling into the harmful entertainments,we will lose control and lose ourselves.Maybe you
will feel the short happiness from the harmful entertainments,but you can't gain the true
happiness in your lives.So all of us should participate in the beneficial entertainments
and relax ourselves appropriately.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bc1e4ed9-d4cc-3fd9-b1df-375d755ab097> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays there are so many recreations in our life that draw us to set free from stress
to relax,which are diverse from advantage to disadvantage.
For positive,such as playing chess,playing football,playing piano are very helpful not
only to our physical health but also to our mental health.They improve our attitude towards
life as well as our mood in daily life.For negtive,they would easily draw us addicted to them
which make us avoid realistic life and ignore our study,for instance,playing computer games,
drinking.
In my opinion,we higher education students must learn to balance the advantage and disadvantage
of relaxation in life.As well controling people,we should refuse to make us lazy and negative,
instead,we should be positive to everything.Of course,appropriate relax is necessary in this
competive society.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f9856db5-b139-38a6-a4ee-164a8a643f6a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Living in the modern competitive society,most people often meet with great pressure in daily
lives.So,it is undoubtfully we need some amusement as relaxation to make ourselves some room in lives.
Luckily,there are several kinds of amusement in our lives,though some of which are benific,some are profitless or even harmful.As a high school student,what I my view upon this question is that we should take a proper attitude towards different kinds of amusement ,know exactly what we really want as relaxation and finally do the right choose among so many attractions.
As for me,what make a amusement become a useful relaxation is that it must be de delightful and healthful for us,both mentally and physically.But actually,some amusement which make we feel relaxed just bring us delights without health.So,it is obviously that some of these amusement may bring us great harm.Take smoking as an example,most of the man under great pressure take it as effective amusement to relax themselves,but actually it bring a lot of healthy problem to themselves,which will finally make them more annoyed in their lives.So choosing a heathy amusement as a proper relaxation become a key,and what I hope is that people won't ignore this point while finding their own ralaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 59e8f158-0358-3d73-bbfb-550b4cc2de6e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
in our life ,we always feel very tried and stressed because of the work or the study ,so we need to relax ourself. there are many relaxtion in our life ,such as play sports ,see movies,and go to sing in KTV.
but every coin has tow side.some realaxtion are good for us,and some are bad for us,even has many bad infullence to to our healthy .if you choose playing computer games  as the realaxtion way,many people can't control themself,and they will think the games all the day,and take more time to play.
in my opinion,as a academician ,we should choose the realaxtion in a right way.we should choose the realaxtion which are good for us .we ofthen play basketball after our classes.in this way ,not only can we reslax ourselfs,but also can take exercise and make more friends.let's choose the right ways to realax ,our life will become more beautiful.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 87b4d724-bf59-36f1-a475-b10f1e26cfee> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Currently,there are so much relaxation in our life,such as surffing the internet,chetting online,playing sports and so on,amoung which some ones are benefit for people while some are negative for people.
From my angle of view,it is important to choose the relaxation that are benefit for us.
What the positive relaxtion that are good for us must can make our progress in some way.For example,as the saying goes'reading can make person be sapiential,and maths can make person be brillent.'By contraries,negative relaxation will get into way of success,just like gambling will make people lose their volition.
In my opinion,before we choose which relaxtin to attend,we can ask our parents' opinions.If we can choose the correct relaxtion,it will play a important role on us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 544bad78-7660-33d7-ae39-3b701097b4a3> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the life level is becoming higher ahd higher nowadays,varies of ralaxation formations are provided.We can listen to music when tired,go sporting after working for a whole day,or sing songs in the KTV with friends at weekend.Choises are of a large number and of various ways.
However,there are not only advantages in these relaxation ativities but also disadvantages which is even unhealthy for us.For example,when you singing in the KTV all night long,you may reduce your work pressure and comfort yourself,but beer and staying up will damage your health.
In my own points of view as a university student,I think we should choose healthier way to relax ourselves.Sports can be the first good choice as we students now use computers more and more but lack excercise sieriously.Besides,we are now using our parents'money still,but not earning it by our own hands,so we should choose cheaper ways to achieve the aim of relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 90c3e509-5c2c-3288-8196-d7ba15eba8b8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life, we can get entertainments in many ways which can relax ourselves,
getting rid of tired spirit. The most comment way is to do sports, such as running,
swimming, playing balls and going gym. When you are getting yourself into dong sports,
you would probably forget all of the trouble things and thus fully relax yourself.
Other kind of activities such as singing, dancing, chatting can also get relaxation.
Physically or mentally, there always be lots of ways you can find to relax yourself.
However, not every way to get relaxation is appropriate, there are some can even hurt
you. The extreme way is to take drugs. Some people are addicted to taking drugs to relax
and feel themselves in high spirit. Indeed it can get you some power in short time,
but the effect is even worse. It dose harm to your body, making you weak.
It dose harm to your spirit, you would not want to face the real life anymore,
what you want is to take more drugs and escape. Its effect can be described as horror.
This kind of relaxation is one kind of destroy.
Then what should we do to get relaxation? As a college student,
my point is to keep your mind clear and choose the healthy way to relax.
Reading books is a good way for us, of course not the text book.
Other ways like watching movies, listening to music are the most popular ways to
relax among young people. All in all, the destination of relaxation is to
give your a break and get more power then getting into work with full energy,
rather than getting addicted to some activities and could not pull yourself out anymore.
Understand the nature of relaxation is very important.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID be1e05db-ce1d-3695-955d-2e6340c19326> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are mang relaxations in our life. such as play computer games listen music and so on
when we fell tired, we will find some activities to relax us.such as me ,when I fell tied, I w
ill listen some music or play basketball with my friends. I think these relaxations is useful
to me.
But there are some relaxations is bad. some my classmates think that playing computer can
relax them. SO when they fell tired, they will play computer games. But after they play games
they look more tired, because they play computer games too long.
In my oppion, evrrything has two sides. The same as the relaxations. if you play a relaxa
ation too long. you would fell more tired not fell relax. such as listening music, if you list
en music too long, youwill fell you ears was tired. but if you play comuter games in a right t
ime, you will fell relax. so my oppion is playing relaxation you like best in a resonable time
to relax youself.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID edf77a62-eb96-3bd4-aa69-be3818a7b5eb> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our daily life ,we may have kinds of activites,but what things is useful or halpful
for us? At percent,many younger like go to KTV with their friends in week.they are not only
singing or playing in KTV,but also drinking and smoking. you know,smoking is bad for our
body ang it is worth money. As a health man,we can take more healthy activites,like playing basketball,reading,riding
bike and so on.body to a man like root to a tree.we must have a strong body to live.
As a university student,in my view,we must do right thing not bad thing.just do it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID d9c56d05-fa1a-3acf-91bd-c7563a0b5ee9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,we can meet plenty of activities of entertainment in our daily life,however,
many of them are good for us and many are harmfulto us.
Many students like sports,that's great.Many sports, just like sports,can make us healthy
and strong.During the time of activities,we can meet many great people and learn so much,such
as,teamwork,communication and so on.so.As a student in the university,we all need to take
action part of these kinds of enternment.
At the same time,there are several activities that are not suitable for us,many are dangerous
as well.Some students always go to the ballroomfor fun.Sometimes they will take drugs,which
are harmful for our health.So we need say no to these kind of entertainment.
From my prespective,as a student,we need tell the good activities from them.choose the
good,refuse the bad.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 784d35ce-81a6-393e-ba68-9b4c6bf3681f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our minds,there are many entertainments in our daily life,such as watching movies,
reading books or drawing,etc. But with the development of the economy,more and more negative
entertainments are developed,just like playing games or taking drugs,as every coin has two
sides,some entertainments have adventages,and benefit us a lot,while others have great harm
to us.Therefore,we should take a serious attitude towards this problem.
As a college student,I insist that we should develop good entertainments and defend us
from bad.Entertainments exist in our life not only because their can relax our hard pressue
from life,but also can improve the standard of our life,providing a higher lifestyle.However
the negative entertainments should be regarded as the decline of our life,and swallow our
passions and ambitions.If people are addicted to this bad entertainments,they life will become
a mess and lose their right ways.
All in all,we need to join in these kind of entertainments,like running,which do good to
our body health;like chessing,which makes us smarter;like listening music,which could give
our soul a break.Obviously there are other great entertainments also can give our life much
fresh energies,so we should never give up chasing the noble entertainments!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID e3f8f42b-c30e-36cf-9651-ebf53e9e0a41> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
We are now living in a world filled with competition.Whatever role we are playing in the
society,we are suffering much pressure in our life.There are varieties of activities that
we can choose to relax ourselves,though.
Some of the activities is beneficial to us.For example,travelling can not only enlarge
the vision of our eyes,but also can pleasure our minds.Moreover,reading is a good way too.
It will help us forget the annoying things,and let us fall into another world with happiness
and kindness.
Others are not properble,even harmful ,i think.People sometimes choose to drink wine to
avoid the facts in their life.It's dangerous because driving with alcoholic drink will lead
to accidents.Some stars are addicted in drugs,as a result,they destroy their great propects.
As a college student,at first,i think,we should often talk with our friends and teacher
to voice our sadness.They can give us advice and encourage us to live with confidence.
Secondly,we should be aware of the harmfulness of some activities,such as alcohol,drugs.
Thirdly,taking part in the meaningful activities will do good to us.In the process we can
make new friends and get lots of knowledge.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c2ee1654-f469-3279-b902-433da1329fa8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As our life becomgs more and more rich and stable,there are more and more relaxation
styles to fill up our life.Those relaxation styles include going to theme parks,visiting
zoos ,singing songs with friends,eating out with families,etc.Of course,they inrich our
life and make life more interested!
However,not all style are advantaged for us.Take a instance that someone view drinking
ochol drinks as a way of relaxation style,and we can see that it is not a healthy lifestyle.
Anothor example like playing compurter games,it not only cost much money,but makes us addicat
ted to it.Especially to us students,not equipped with enough self-emagement,it is likely to
destroy our studies.
As for my opinions,i think that we shoulde firstly make us realise which style is proper
to us and witch is harmful to us.Olse,we need sugestiongs from adults. Only we learn to
choose proper realaxation,can we grow up healthly.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID a0a2ca89-ad0c-3f2a-8c0b-31bb650bc5d6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all known,there are many kinds of entertainment in life which can relax us and take us out of the busy work or study.You can do sports such as playing basketball,football and badminton,and you can go sightseeing with your friends or go to KTV rooms singing songs,what's more,a funny book or a smelly coffee also can bring relaxation to you.
However,as every coin has two sides,some ways to relax will do bad for you.For example,some are looking for ways to relax themselves and make them feel excited so they start to have drug which makes them sit in the prison,some will be addicted in gambling and finally lose all the money and even lose all their families.Some ways is not workable to relax and people should sharpen their eyes to make a right choice.
As for me,like a student in university,there are so many ways to relax in our life,we can play sports whenever we like;we can surf the Internet wherever we are;we can take part in any activities if we are interested.And the most importantly,we should make sure what we choose will bring us and what we can get from the relaxation.And control ourselves when we have relaxtion avoid being addicted in them.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 81879cd5-7ade-3ae2-bfb9-dd4315aaaa76> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are lots of entertainments in our life, such as singing, doing sports,
talking with friends, and so on. If you're tired, take a rest and doing such
entertainments are the good ways to relax yourself.
However, too much entertainments make us too hart to choose a right one to relax ourselves.
Some of them are good for people's health while the others are not so good and even could
be dangerous. For example, one feels stressful when he is doing a hart work. To relax
himself, he may choose to do some sports, like running, playing basketball, or something
like that. So he could ralax himself and, at the same time, he get healther. But if he doesn't
choose such a good way but drug, then he must be dangerous and even could be died.
For the reasons above, as a college student, I think we should be careful when we choose a
way to relax ourselves. Frist, when you feel stressful, you must get to relax yourself so
that you could get better feeling. But do be careful that there are all kinds of relaxations
so you should make sure you choose a right way. Of couse insterese is an importain reason to
choose a relaxation but the most importain one is safety. Only if you are safe, you can get
relaxed as well as heath.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 94dafed6-4ad0-3896-b987-5e8ed966d82a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the level of life improving, there are more and more entertainments with which we can
enjoy ourselves.We can play sports,watch TV,play computer games,join a party and travel.All kinds
of entertainment do make us have fun,but not all of them have benifits to us.
As we all know, some entertainments have benifits to us, but others do harm to us.For instense,
playing sports can make us stronger and more herlthy, so we can see that playing sports is really a good
entertainment.Well,playing computer games is very populer in teenagers and even adluts now,which will do harm to their sight
and waste their much time.We shouldn't waste much time on this useless thing.
As a collage-student,I think we should choose entertainments which are good to our body and mind.Many collage-students
enjoy playing online-games and even addicted to the games!What we should do is learn knowledge as much as possidle!Well,of course,
some entertainments are necessary.I think entertainments that are fit we students are travelling and playing sports,by which we can
improve ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c4ba9663-f114-324c-96e0-34e20e2201d6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There's various of relaxation in our daily life.relaxation has a wide definition.You may call reading books is a kind of relaxation while others may think it is not true because it still needs our concentration and the brain can't release.
General erelaxation in our daily life can be sortet into physical and mental.A study has been made that physical relaxation may give us more happiness and it is the quickliest way to relax our body and brain.That's one of the reasons why doctors sugust us do more exercises in our leisure time.
However,it is not ture that every relaxation is benificil to us.For example,I may not agree that playing computer games a lot,going to the bars and KTVs often are helpful relaxations.Some people lost control of themselfs and this is only one of harmful aspects. If people get addicted to certain relaxations,they may lost themselves that they  won't willing to study or work as diligent as before.What's worse,the socity will lost its production capability and its econermic will even shrink instead of rise.
As a university student,in my  own opinion,every coin has its two sides.We should not avoid to relax or entertain due to its disadvantages. Instead,we should distinguish vaious relaxations and don't lose our heart of it.Once our friends or we get lost of it,we should stop our steps immediately and ask for help.
In a word,we should distinguish and make good use of the relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID b163294f-b39e-31ea-94b4-0f822e7003d6> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our relaytion life ,there was alot of enjoyed games we are love .Now many of my classmates like to surf the internet in there free time .I think internentcan bring us both advantage and disadvantage.For example if I have some trouble  studying, I can surfe the internent to find more and more information and I can make more friend on it  .Some of my classmates say they feel happy when they talk with more friend with many similar hobbies .
However internentcan make some problems at the same time. if you spend too much time on it  ,you will became lazy and  can,t put your heart on study .It will be even worse if you feel yOu can not live without internent .so we must be careful when we use the internent.
All in all,we need to join in these kind of entertainments,like running,which do good to
our body health;like chessing,which makes us smarter;like listening music,which could give
our soul a break.Obviously there are other great entertainments also can give our life much
fresh energies,so we should never give up chasing the noble entertainments!

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0b0a272d-f0b7-3332-a592-a5e9517d664c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are a variaty of entertainment activities in our daily life.But some of them have bad infect on us while the others contribute to our grouth.souranded by them ,how to choose them is  extremly important for us
As a collige student,i consider study the most important role in our collige study,so the entertainment activities should not take up too much of our time.As study is a long way of our life ,it is better for us to take part in the activities which can make us help us to be wisdom.As we know,there are many activities which are not only waste oure time but also do harm to our life.Such as the computer games.Almost all of collige students have computerand some of us are induged to it so that they dont have classes and dont play with classmates or friebds.if this contitues for a long time ,we will lose ourselfves and we will learn noting in this foure years.
In conlusion,we should choose the activities  reasonally and make them friends who help us group

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 9f5dae55-36f6-3b9d-b915-bf3b8e8c95f9> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all known,there are many types of relaxation in our life,such as games,music and so on.But everything has
positive effection,then has negative effection.relaxion does have.
Some people hold the view that relaxation is good for our life.Bacause our work is very boring and tired.  But
relaxation can make us relax ourselves.It make us have a good energy to counite to work,and some relaxation such as
music is a good enjoy for us.
However,some people hold the oppoiste view.They think some relaxation is boring,and some relaxation even do harm
to us.For example,some students addict thierselves to computer games.They don't study because of computer games.
To my opinion,I think relaxation does good for our life.It makes our life filled with fun.And after hard work,it
relax us.So I think relaxation is good for our life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 728682b9-cea8-32f9-8738-bc0d8792828a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,we have more and more different kinds of activities. And we can have fun with even every
person in the whole world by some ways.
In our space time, we may often pass time by chatting,playing sports or listening musics etc.But do you konw  which of
them can benefit our health and our life?  As we know,And next I want to share some ideals with you by some examples. Every
students amostly like playing computer.But computers like coins have two backs. For one thing,computers can benefit our life.
If you are busy,you can shop with it easily.If you are tired,you can take a breath by listening music.besides,you also can se-
arch important information and read it with "high speeds".For another thing,Some students may play computer games so that they
don't complete their homework.Therefore,the disadvantages also should be importantly thoughtof by parents .
As far as I am concerned,we should have a right atittude to our activities.We can treat them as a way to relax ourselves.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 60ffc623-f718-3331-8958-2aa8648b6943> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As is know to all,there are many kinds of entertainments and activities in our life.
From these entertainments and activities,we can make friends and relax ourselves as well
as challenging ourselves.What's more,taking exercise of our body and even our heart are the
other benefits.However,though some of them are beneficial to us,some of them are out of the
way that even damage us.
As a university student,in my opinion,enough entertainments and activities is necessary
for us.In our study life,too much study would make us so nervous that not only study
inefficient but also would lose in our life.So,we should have some relaxation to relax
ourselves and wakes us up from boring study life.But we shouldn't be addicted to the
relaxation.
Having some relaxation,make ourselves relax and productiveness.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 87156ac7-bf92-38e3-b394-84784bddf831> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our lives,we have more and more entertainments.Such as singing,dancing,playing games,playing balls,
and many people prefer  to go to the bars.ect.We can choose what we like,and I think these entertainments can
help us to hanve a better relaxation.And we often have them with our friends,which can almost make everyone
happy.
Although many entertainments can help us to feel better,not all of them can do good for us.Some of them
can give us healthy relaxation,but actually,some of them will do harm for us,especially for teenagers.Many
teenagers are addicted in playing games,which not only make a bad difference in their studies,but also make their
parents very sad.
As a colledge student,I think many relaxation in our lives aregood for us,we should make full use of them to
make our lives better.Everyone should have many healthy hobbys.But,above all,we should konw  what are we doing,we
can't make bad effect to our lives because of them.We must konw which is most importent for us.
In a word,relaxation can make our lives better,or make it worse.It all depends on us.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID c36aed3d-3ab0-39ce-a2a0-7ca1cbc1f07e> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many kinds of relaxation in life because of the improving living standard of people.Relaxation can not only active our character,but also strongen our bodys.
Howere,some kinds of relaxations do really benefit us while some kinds of activities do harm to us.These relaxation takes much long time so as to take up our sleeping
time,or they will spread some bad consiousions.
As a university student,we have a step off from entering the society.It is more important to think about the good or bad of relaxation.In my opinion ,relaxation is important
because:no play but all work makes John a dull boy.Morever,in some place of taking relaxation we can meet other people from different fields and make more friends,it helps when we have some trouble in life.BUT do not do relaxations too much.Our
tession is learning and enriches our kownledge,it's benificial for us to think about it from two sides.Take properly relaxations,it is my surggestion.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 97611eb6-fdec-3273-b21a-4a53407ed3b8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In  our modern society,there are many kidnds of relaxing activities.We almost take part in the
activities everyday.We get a lot of fun from it
The number of the relaxing activities is difficult to conculate.But it isn't mean taht every activ-
ties are good to join for us.Some of the activities are not very proper,and some of it is almosthaemful
and will give us bad influences.
So it is very important for us to check out what activities is goood realxing activities and what
activities is not very proper.I think every body needs some activities to relax ourselves,because we
study and work eveyday and easy to get tired.Proper relaxing activities could let us found interests
in a so busy society.It also helps us to work better.But as some unproper activities we should refuse,
because when wo get in it ,it in difficult to get out .We maybe spend a lot of time and money on it but
finally we get nothing.AS a university student,we have many oppotunities to join varities of activities,
it is more important to choose the good activities for us.If we don't get it in a right way,it will influence
our whole life.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 4d121397-7aa8-3875-9a00-22361f3c6264> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society developing fast towards future,many people are suffering high pressure in
their daily life.Varieties of entertainments come to stage and becomes necessary.You can make
a choice from all sorts of entertainments like reading 、body exercises、TV programmes and
surfing the Internet.
Some of them are helpful,which relaxes our mind and body like hiking、sports etc.They
offer us a chance to exercise our body as well as enjoy the beauty of nature.While we still
have  some relaxing methods that are harmful and needed to be confined ,vedio games for
example.Some people become so addicted to it that they quit their work to stay in front of
a computer and play games all day long.Some even resort to their friends for money to support
their game habit.
As far as i'm concerned,there's must be a request for the society to call on people
relax themselves outdoors.Everyday we spend our times working in front of a computer or facing
piles of paper.Our minds desires natural scenery--to see the green trees and hear birds singing.
The tiaditional relaxing way is healthier and "environmentaly-friendly".

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID af2e5d21-a6d8-3bfe-a26b-032a527ff0fe> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Sometimes we just feel stressed because of the heavy work and the intensive competence in society,so at that time we need the relaxation  which can make us comfortable and peaceful.
In our daily life,there are various of entertainment activities which can help us relax.As we know,every cion has two sides.Some of them are beneficial,like the hiking and kinds of sports,
which can make our body strong,and some of them are harmful to us,such as staying in bar for a long time and playing computer games without restricting the time. In this situation,
we need to improve our discrimination ability,which can help us tell the right way of relaxation.As a college student,we all need to  relax ourselves.But it does not mean that we can join
all of the entertaiment activities.Learn to choose ones fit for us and healthy,beacause all we need is reliefing ourselves and we dont have to sacrifice the health ang our valuable vigor.
We are adult,and i think its reasonable for us to deal with this thing.In a word,learn to choose the right method of relaxing and enjoy the happy moment after work.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ba2cc605-e08c-38d6-ba37-cda5b9578f0b> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As everyone knows, one's life can't always be too busy or keep a high level of all the attention as the striking arrows. So
relaxation is quite necessary in the daily speedy lives.And to meet people's relaxting needs, more and more entertainments
have appeared, seriously keeping people's eyes. All these activities can bring bored people some new feelings or experiences
which can seldon get from busy work and they are becoming an unreplaceable part.
Some relaxations are quite healthy and beneficial to people. As for my family, enjoying a fantastic movie in the cinema or
climbing mountains on a shining morning are all good choices for us to temporarily keep away from unhappiness or anxiety.
Some of my friends prefer to photographing in city's every corners alone by taking a camera to catch all the meaningful
moments of life, realizing that lives can also have such beautiful angles, not only the common respect we see before. These
relaxations depend on people's own interests, and they are relaxing enough to bring peple a better mood and can be widely
adopted by more people.
But some relaxations can't truely provide people a comfortable life, or even do great harm to both physical and mental health,
though temporary enjoyment are attractive to people. For example, some young people rely on playing computer games day and
night without any limitaions or controls, neglecting their study or families at all. Besides, many people would like to staying
in bars to relax themselves by countless alcohol or strong electronic music and crazy dances. This "enjoyment" is not only
a waste of time but also acting as "drugs", damaging people' health.
As a student, I think we should clear up our eyes and choose those meaningful and healthy relaxation which can really have
entertaining and relaxing effects to balance our busy lives.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID fe65ab3b-0392-3eef-b9b0-b2ebd66aee2f> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there are lots of activities in our life,such as playing basketball,going
hiking,swiming,playing computer games and so on.Some of them are beneficial to us.For example, playing basketball
not only can strong our body,but also can it let us make more friends and inprove the
comunity of your partner.Most of the sports are similar to the basketball game.Sometimes,
there are some friends Who have already long time no see ,they can playing cards together
and have a relaxe time,it's so harmony.
However,there are also some relaxation in our life is not suitable to us,some of them
even though are harmful to us.More and more students have already been addited to the
computer games or the QQ,they spent their spare time on the internet,chatting with the
strangers,playing online games,serching some harmful imformations and so on.Some students
even are escaping from the lessons in order to surfe the internet.How terrible it is!
As far as I am concerned,we should  spend more our time on taking part in some sport games,
choose the most suiterble relaxation to ourself,exercise ourselves.Try our best to help others
to give up the harmful relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 98f68362-13fb-3321-acdf-474235bbf6b4> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
No one can avoid stress in life so there are sorts of recreative activities in our daily life to refresh ourselves. Some one may chat with his or her friends online, while others may play football on the playground.
But there is a phenomenon that some recreations are beneficial to our physical and mental health yet some others can be quite harmful.For example, you have just studied for long hours and stop to listen to some relaxing and soft music. When you get back to study, you'll find mind more clear and tireness fade away. It is the music that recharge your energetic. however, some students play too much computer games when they want to relax. After  playing they may not feel good at all because they may be defeated in the games and they waste precious time for learning or exrecise.
As for me, a freshman in university, recreations are essential for us but we must relax in a proper way. On the one hand, we should spare some time doing some pleasant things if we get exhausted in study or work. Just a walk outside is even better than stick before the desk. And remember not to  be absorded in it. on the other hand, we can develop more interests or hobbies rather than playing games or chatting all the time which whould make you feel dull at last.
In one word, we must relax in a proper way but not waste our time and health on it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID f77b8a88-8f37-3aa1-a80e-6d865dd96cdc> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Recreational activities and study do not contradict each other,in fact,they complement
each other,As the saying goes,"All work and no play makes Jack a dull boy" ,I strongly
voice all the evidence justifies an unshakable view that our trans-century college
students should choose recreational activities appropriately.Therefore in a sense.only
when we pay close attention to it can we see a meaningful extraordinary and harmonious
future sooner or later.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 0c3154d2-a38c-3c30-974d-3463be815c40> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
One man can not work all the time,he needs rest and relaxation during the break.The rest,sleeping or just sitting,everyone does the same.But ,when it cmoes to relaxation,different people have different appitite.Such as playing tennis,watching movies,or having a drink in a bar.
Every man has his or her own ideas when having relaxations.But not every way for relaxation is right.If you feel tired after a lot of work,you may have a cup of tea and listen a peaceful music,and then you can play your guitar.These really make you comfortable and make your brain cool.They are very good relaxations.But if you choose to have a large amount of drink in a bar and then fight with others due to a spit,the relaxation is not a good one.Your relaxation cannot be based on others' pain.You can make friends in a bar.If so,you get a good relaxation.
In my opinion,all types of relaxation is good if they don't hurt or disturb others.You can really have a big drink with your friends,it often makes you tight.And,if you play your guitar at 2a.m. it will make noise and disturb others.Then,it won't be a good relaxation.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ffe1cad2-9260-39d5-9b43-1918877a144c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many intertainments in our spare time,and what would you like to join in?
Some peple think it is good for us to do this,because we can not only have  good
experence,but also can have a good communication with our friends or families.And if you
do a sports,you will get a healthy body which leads to a possive attitude to your life and
work.
But others think it is bad for us. Why? Because it will take up a lot time ,so many
other things will be delayed.There are many risks for children to play,for example,some
children will swim in the river which is deep.
In my opinion,taking part in activities has advantages and disadvantages.In one
hand we will have a strong body and good mood, on the other hand we may be in the risks.
So we should think a lot for it.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 1f1f4890-3401-3050-8eaa-56827d5097e8> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life，we have different kinds of amusements.Some of them are of benifit ,but some of them which  irrelevant are not good to us.And as a university student,Ithink we should treat amusements in the right way.First,we should develop our intervests and fing our strengths.we should konw what can I do .Second,we had better to learn which amusement is relevvant and then we can develop that activities.At last,we should be aware that amusements can amuse us and make us keep to work or study.So we needn't spend too much time on them.On the contrary,we should pay attention to our study.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 57afa925-39b0-3237-ae76-77c45915d616> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
everybody has their own ways to relax themselves,the ways are differnt.Like singing,hiking
play balls and so on.they are good for their healthy.but also have many ways which people
chose to relax are bad.they will bad for our healthy or our metal.like wine,so they are
wrong choose to relax.
In my opinion,we need to relax in our life,it can help us activity and happier in life.but
we must choose right way to relax ourselves.If you choose wrong way to relax ,it will be bad
for us,and we can not keep healthy in our life.If you choose drinking to relax yourselves,we
will cost money to buy something which is bad.so I think choose right ways to relas ourselves
is necessary.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5eb78184-00cd-36c3-a01e-560b973a663a> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our life , there crowded of pressure. In order to release their pressure , people invented
variovs of activities to relax themselves,such as : watch movies , listen to music , have a trip
and so on. As it a fact , many of us we take these activities because we live in a hurry life
and we always have pressure on study or work and we just need relaxation.
However not al of these activities can help us effictive and even some of them make damage to
our society,like:computer games can be so attractive that some people additiced in it.What more
so movies was fulled of  violence and sex , which lead a lot of teenagers can not be relaxed.
As a student of universt ,I think we should have enough awearness to judge what is fit us and
will not  affect our society.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID ee3a2683-2e78-378d-8cbd-7d1131f8705d> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
In our society,in our life, we have many kind of entertainment activities.There are surfing,boating,swimming and so on.But as we all know,there are still some unsuitable and sometimes even harmful activities among the activities we take part in,while there are many beneficial activities.
As a university student,I think on the one hand,we should have the ability to tell apart the bad and good activities befort we go to work them.We should be capable of making clear your life principles and make effort to avoid harmfulness brought by the disavantage factors in some activities.
On the other hand,the government should actively take action to advertise the healthy and useful activities,like most of the gymnastic activities and at the same time, they should fight against the bad impacts the harmful activities bring about.
In a word,wejust want to have more happy and healthy life to create a more suitable place for everybody to live in a happiness and invent more new things to make the society and our lives more beautiful.So only when we take the essence of the activities and choose the good activities,will we achieve our purpose in our lives.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID bb648713-5f5d-3fc9-8b87-f661ba6a818c> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society and economy, people now have different kinds of relaxations.
Some of these relaxations are good to people, such as sports, music, outdoor activitise and so on. Sports can not only  benefit your physical health, but also can do good to your mentle health. Sports can also help you make a lot of friends. Music can relax you, especially when you are anxious or angry. You can find the beauty of nature and life through  outdoor activities.These relaxations will make you relaxed and refresh your mind and soul.
Some of them can do harm  to people.For example, smoking and drinking a lot will be harmful to one's health. People may play cards during their spare  time, it's interesting and it can help people have a good relationship with each other. But some people play card for  money. Sometimes that may bring troubles. People may have a quarrel even a fight just for a little money. These relaxions cannot really relax you, what's more, it's harmful to people even society.
In my opinion, there are good relaxations and harmful relaxations. We should figure out what're good for us and make the right choices.

<TITLE Relaxation in Life> <ESSAYID 5869d9bf-7ecd-3fb7-93b1-4a09b5c1a3be> <SCHOOL SCUT> <SCORE ?>
Some people said live is just like a war,there is so much competion in it. So everybody could suffer from much pressure,maybe right now ,or maybe tomorrow. Therefore, let yourself relax some time, making sure you are not unhappy all the time is good for you to move on and move on.
This is why there are so many kinds of entertainment arround us,like suffering on the Internet, playing basketball, going  swimming ,etc.All kinds of entertainment really bring happiness to us who are tired,just like sunshine.But some of them can really be hamful for us.Such as being addicted to computer game is no good for us, and there are more.
So you may ask yourself what I supposed to do and how to pick up the good way to relax ourself.I think I can share some oppinions of mine with you.Firstly,no matter what the entertainment is,keep it far from your work or study.It means that when it's time to your work you should put down the relaxation.Secondly,don't ruin the clock in your body.If it's time to sleep, you just do it.Letting the "guy"  standing in the way to your bed will make you addicted.finally,the best way to relax is doing some sport.On one way, you can one hundred percent to relax your brain.On the other way, you can have your body looks good,and you will be more confident and more happy.
In one word, life need time to breath, because it want to move further.



